27687935
Human_impact_on_coral_reefs
File:Mvey0290.jpg|thumb|300px|right|Island with reef off Yap, Micronesia. Coral reefs are dying around the world.(Coral reefs around the world Guardian.co.uk, 2 September 2009.)Human impact on coral reefs is significant. reefs are dying around the world.( In particular, coral mining, pollution (organic and non-organic), overfishing, fishing and the digging of canals and access into islands and bays are serious threats to these ecosystems. Coral reefs also face high dangers from pollution, diseases, destructive fishing practices and warming oceans.() In order to find answers for these problems, researchers study the various factors that impact reefs. The list of factors is long, including the oceans role as a dioxide sink, atmospheric changes, light, acidification, biological virus, impacts of storms carrying agents to far flung reefs, pollutants, blooms and others. Reefs are threatened well beyond coastal areas.General estimates show approximately 10% worlds coral reefs are already dead.((Save Our Seas, 1997 Summer Newsletter, Dr. Cindy Hunter and Dr. Alan Friedlander)() It is estimated that about 60% of the worlds reefs are at risk due to destructive, human-related activities. The threat to the health of reefs is particularly strong in Asia, where 80% of reefs are endangered.IssuesCompetitionIn the Sea and tropical Pacific, direct contact between coral and 4070% of common seaweeds cause bleaching and death of coral tissue via allelopathic competition. The lipid-soluble extracts of seaweeds that harmed coral tissues also produced rapid bleaching. At these sites bleaching and mortality was limited to areas of direct contact with seaweeds or their extracts. The seaweed ten expanded to occupy the dead corals habitat.() However, as of 2009, only 4% of coral reefs worldwide had more than 50% algal coverage. Further, there is no recent global trend towards algal dominance.(Competitive seaweed and other algae thrive in nutrient-rich waters in the absence of sufficient herbivorous predators. Herbivores include fish such as parrotfish, surgeonfish, tangs and unicornfish.(PredationOverfishing, particularly selective overfishing, can unbalance coral ecosystems by encouraging the excessive growth of coral predators. Predators that eat living coral, such as the starfish, are called corallivores. Coral reefs are built from coral, which evolved with large amounts of the wax palmitate in their tissues. Most predators find this wax indigestible.(Benson AA and Muscatine L (1974) Wax in Coral Mucus: Energy Transfer From Corals to Reef Fishes Limnology and Oceanography, 19 (5) 810814. Download) The crown-of-thorns starfish is a large (up to one metre) starfish protected by long, venomous spines. Its enzyme system dissolves the wax in corals, and allows the starfish to feed on the living animal. Starfish face predators of their own, such as the giant triton snail. However, the giant triton is valued for its shell and has been overfished. As a result, crown-of-thorns starfish populations can periodically grow unchecked, devastating reefs.(Predators and Prey PBS.org. Retrieved 11 December 2009.)()( (PDF))File:Charonia_re.jpg|The overfished giant triton eats the of thorns starfishFile:Crown of Thorns Starfish.jpg|The of thorns starfish eats coralFishing practicesAlthough some aquarium fish species can reproduce in aquaria (such as Pomacentridae), most (95%) are collected from coral reefs. Intense harvesting, especially in South-East Asia (including Indonesia and the Philippines), damages the reefs. This is aggravated by fishing practices, such as cyanide and fishing. Most (8090%) aquarium fish from the Philippines are captured with cyanide. This toxic chemical is dissolved in sea water and released into areas where fish shelter. It narcotizes the fish, which are then easily captured. However, most fish collected with cyanide die a few months later from liver damage. Moreover, many non-marketable specimens die in the process.() It is estimated that 4,000 or more Filipino fish collectors have used over   of cyanide on Philippine reefs alone, about 150,000 kg per year.( A major catalyst of fishing is poverty within fishing communities. In countries like the Philippines that regularly employ cyanide, more than thirty percent of the population lives below the poverty line.()Dynamite fishing is another destructive method for gathering fish. Sticks of dynamite, grenades, or home-made explosives are detonated in the water. This method of fishing kills the fish within the main blast area, along with many unwanted reef animals. The blast also kills the corals in the area, eliminating the reefs structure, destroying habitat for the remaining fish and other animals important for reef health.() Muroami is the destructive practice of covering reefs with nets and dropping large stones onto the reef to produce a flight response among the fish. The stones break and kill the coral. Muroami was generally outlawed in the 1980s.(Fishing gear damages reefs via direct physical contact with the reef structure and substrate. Gill nets, fish traps, and anchors break branching coral and cause coral death through entanglement. When fishermen drop lines by coral reefs, the lines entangle the coral. The fisher cuts the line and abandons it, leaving it attached to the reef. The discarded lines abrade coral polyps and upper tissue layers. Corals are able to recover from small lesions, but larger and recurrent damage complicates recovery.Bottom dragging gear such as seines can damage corals by abrasion and fracturing. A beach seine is a long net about  with a mesh size of  and a weighted line to hold the net down while it is dragged across the substrate and is one of the most destructive types of fishing gear on Kenyas reefs.(Bottom trawling in deep oceans destroys coldwater and deepsea corals. Historically, industrial fishers avoided coral because their nets would get caught on the reefs. In the 1980s, rockhopper trawls attached large tires and rollers to allow the nets to roll over rough surfaces. Fifty-five percent of Alaskan coldwater coral that was damaged by one pass from a bottom trawl had not recovered a year later. Northeast Atlantic reefs bear scars up to  long. In Southern Australia, 90 percent of the surfaces on coral seamounts are now bare rock. Even in the Great Barrier Reef World Heritage Area, seafloor trawling for prawns and scallops is causing localized extinction of some coral species.(With increased human population and improved storage and transport systems, the scale of human impacts on reefs has grown exponentially. For example, markets for fish and other resources have become global, supplying demand for reef resources.()PollutionFile:Cwall99 lg.jpg|thumb|250px|right|This image of an bloom off the southern coast of England, though not in a coral region, shows what a bloom can look like from a satellite remote sensing systemReefs in close proximity to human populations are subject to poor water quality from land- and marine-based sources. In the Caribbean, approximately 80 percent of ocean pollution originates from activities on land. Pollution arrives from land via runoff, the wind and injection (deliberate introduction, e.g., drainpipes).Runoff brings with it sediment from erosion and land-clearing, nutrients and pesticides from agriculture, wastewater, industrial effluent and miscellaneous material such as petroleum residue and trash that storms wash away. Some pollutants consume oxygen and lead to eutrophication, killing coral and other reef inhabitants.()An increasing fraction of the global population lives in coastal areas. Without appropriate precautions, development (e.g., buildings and paved roads) increases the fraction of rainfall and other water sources that enter the ocean as runoff by decreasing the lands ability to absorb it.(Pollution can introduce pathogens. For example, Aspergillus sydowii has been associated with a disease in fans, and marcescens, has been linked to the coral disease white pox.(Reefs in close proximity to human populations can be faced with local stresses, including poor water quality from land-based sources of pollution.( Copper, a common industrial pollutant has been shown to interfere with the life history and development of coral polyps.()In addition to runoff, wind blows material into the ocean. This material may be local or from other regions. For example, dust from the Sahara moves to the Caribbean and Florida. Dust also blows from the Gobi and Taklamakan deserts across Korea, Japan, and the Northern Pacificto the Islands.() Since 1970, dust deposits have grown due to drought periods in Africa. Dust transport to the Caribbean and Florida varies from year to year(Usinfo.state.gov.Study Says African Dust Affects Climate in U.S., Caribbean. Retrieved on 10 June 2007.) with greater flux during positive phases of the Atlantic Oscillation.() The USGS links dust events to reduced health of coral reefs across the Caribbean and Florida, primarily since the 1970s.(S. Geological Survey. Coral Mortality and African Dust. Retrieved on 10 June 2007.) Dust from the 1883 eruption of Krakatoa in Indonesia appeared in the annular bands of the reef-building coral annularis from the Reeftract.(Merman, E.A. 2001. Atmospheric inputs to the tropical oceanunlocking the record in annually banded corals. Masters thesis. University of South Florida, St. Petersburg.)Sediment smothers corals and interferes with their ability to feed and reproduce. Pesticides can interfere with coral reproduction and growth.(Excess nutrientsExcess nutrients, particularly nitrogen and phosphorus can cause eutrophication, upsetting the balance of the reef by enhancing algal growth and crowding out corals.This nutrientrich water can enable blooms of fleshy algae and phytoplankton to thrive off coasts. These blooms can create hypoxic conditions by using all available oxygen. Biologically available nitrogen (nitrate plus ammonia) needs to be below 1.0 micromole per liter (less than 0.014 parts per million of nitrogen), and biologically available phosphorus (orthophosphate plus dissolved organic phosphorus) needs to be below 0.1 micromole per liter (less than 0.003 parts per million of phosphorus). In addition concentrations of chlorophyll (in the microscopic plants called phytoplankton) needs to be below 0.5 parts per billion.() Both plants also obscure sunlight, killing both fish and coral. High nitrate levels are specifically toxic to corals, while phosphates slow down skeletal growth.Excess nutrients can intensify existing disease, including potentially doubling the spread of Aspergillosis, a fungal infection that kills soft corals such as sea fans, and increasing yellow band disease, a bacterial infection that kills reef-building hard corals by fifty percent.()Marine debrisMarine debris is any solid object that enters coastal and ocean waters. Debris may arrive directly from a ship or indirectly when washed out to sea via rivers, streams, and storm drains. Human-made items tend to be the most harmful such as plastics (from bags to balloons, hard hats to fishing line), glass, metal, rubber (millions of tires!), and even entire vessels.(Plastic debris kills several reef species. Derelict (abandoned) fishing nets and other gearoften called ghost nets because they still catch fish and other marine life despite being abandonedcan entangle and kill reef organisms and break or damage reefs. Even remote reef systems suffer the effects of marine debris. Reefs in the Hawaiian Islands are particularly prone to the accumulation of marine debris because of their central location in the Pacific Gyre. From 2000 to 2006, NOAA and partners removed over 500 tons of marine debris there.(Climate changeand bleached coralRising sea levels due to climate change requires coral to grow to stay close enough to the surface to continue photosynthesis. Also, water temperature changes can induce bleaching as happened during the 1998 and 2004 Nio years, in which surface temperatures rose well above normal, bleaching or killing many reefs. High sea surface temperature (SST) coupled with high irradiance (light intensity), triggers the loss of zooxanthellae, a symbiotic algae, and its dinoflagellate pigmentation in corals, turning coral white. Zooxanthellae provide up to 90% of their hosts energy supply. Healthy reefs can often recover from bleaching if water temperatures cool. However, recovery may not be possible if  levels rise to 500 ppm because concentrations of carbonate ions may then be too low.()()Warming seawater may also encourage an emerging problem: coral disease. Weakened by warm water, coral is much more prone to diseases including band disease, band disease and eroding band. If global temperatures increase by 2 C during the twenty-first century, coral may not be able to adapt quickly enough.()A 2010 report by the of Physics predicts that unless the national targets set by the Accord are amended to eliminate loopholes, then by 2100 global temperatures could rise by 4.2C and result in an end to coral reefs.(Climate Accord loopholes could spell 4.2C rise in temperature and end of coral reefs by 2100 of Physics, Press release, 29 September 2010.)(Rogelj J, Chen C, Nabel J, Macey K, Hare W, Schaeffer M, Markmann K, Hhne N, Andersen KK and Meinshausen M (2010) Analysis of the Copenhagen Accord pledges and its global climatic impactsa snapshot of dissonant ambitions Environmental Research Letters, of Physics, Volume 5 number 3. doi:10.1088/1748-9326/5/3/034013)Ocean acidificationFile:Isidella tentaculum.jpg|thumb|coral is an early harbinger of ocean acificationacidification results from increases in atmospheric dioxide. Oceans absorb around onethird of the increase.() The dissolved gas reacts with the water to form acid, and thus acidifies the ocean. This decreasing pH is another issue for coral reefs.(Ocean surface pH is estimated to have decreased from about 8.25 to 8.14 since the beginning of the industrial era,() and a further drop of 0.30.4 units is expected.() Before the industrial age the conditions for carbonate production were typically stable in surface waters since the carbonate ion is at supersaturated concentrations. However, as the ionic concentration falls, carbonate becomes under-saturated, making calcium carbonate structures vulnerable to dissolution. Corals experience reduced calcification or enhanced dissolution when exposed to elevated .()coral is a water coral which produces rings similar to trees. The growth rings illustrate growth rate changes as deep sea conditions change, including changes due to ocean acidification. Specimens as old as 4,000 years have given scientists 4,000 years worth of information about what has been going on in the deep ocean interior.()Other issuesFile:CoralSandAruba.jpg|thumb|sand from a beach on ArubaWithin the last 20 years, once prolific meadows and forests, which absorb massive amounts of nutrients and sediment, have been destroyed. Both the loss of wetlands, mangrove habitats and seagrass meadows affect the quality of inshore reefs.()Coral mining is another threat. Both small scale harvesting by villagers and industrial scale mining by companies are serious threats. Mining is usually done to produce construction material which is valued as much as 50% cheaper than other rocks, such as from quarries.(The Greenpeace Book of Coral Reefs) The rocks are ground and mixed with other materials, like cement to make concrete. Ancient coral used for construction is known as rag. Building directly on the reef also takes its toll, altering water circulation and the tides which bring the nutrients to the reef. The pressing reason for building on reefs is simply lack of space.thumbnail|left|Eroded coral()Boats and ships require access points into bays and islands to load and unload cargo and people. For this, parts of reefs are often chopped away to clear a path. Negative consequences can include altered water circulation and altered tidal patterns which can disrupt the reefs nutrient supply; sometimes destroying a great part of the reef. vessels and other large boats occasionally run aground on a reef. Two types of damage can result. Collision damage occurs when a coral reef is crushed and split by a vessels hull into multiple fragments. Scarring occurs when boat propellers tear off the live coral and expose the skeleton. The physical damage can be noticed as striations. Mooring causes damage which can be reduced by using mooring buoys. Buoys can attach to the seafloor using concrete blocks as weights or by penetrating the seafloor, which further reduces damage.( DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE AWARDS BRONZE MEDAL TO FLORIDA BIOLOGIST JOHN HALAS)Coral in Taiwan is being threatened by the influx of human population growth. Since 2007, several local environmental groups conducted research and found that much of the coral populations are being affected by untreated sewage, an influx of tourists taking corals for souvenirs, without fully understanding the destructive impact on the corals ecological system.  Researchers reported to the Taiwanese government that many coral populations have turned black in the southeast coast of Taiwan. Potentially, this could lead to loss of food supply, medicinal sources and tourism due to the breakdown of the food chain.(Jennings, R. (Feb. 6, 2009). Taiwan coral reefs turn black with disease. From Reuters: http://www.reuters.com/article/idUSTRE5151HL20090206)Threatened speciesThe global standard for recording threatened marine species is the IUCN Red List of Threatened Species.(The 2008 IUCN Red List of Threatened Species) This list is the foundation for marine conservation priorities worldwide. A species is listed in the threatened category if it is considered to be critically endangered, endangered, or vulnerable. Other categories are threatened and deficient. By 2008, the IUCN had assessed all 845 known reef-building corals species, marking 27% as Threatened 20% as threatened and 17% as deficient.(IUCN: Status of the worlds marine species)The coral triangle (Indo-Malay-Philippine archipelago) region has the highest number of reef-building coral species in threatened category as well as the highest coral species diversity. The loss of coral reef ecosystems will have devastating effects on many marine species, as well as on people that depend on reef resources for their livelihoods.(Issues by regionFile:oa-sami.jpg|thumb|right| A NOAA (AOML) in situ  sensor (SAMI-CO2), attached to a Coral Reef Early Warning System station in Discovery Bay, Jamaica, utilized in conducting acidification studies near coral reef areasAustraliaThe Barrier Reef is the worlds largest reef system.()()()() The reef is located in the Sea. A large part of the reef is protected by the Barrier Reef Marine Park. Particular environmental pressures include runoff, salinity fluctuations, climate change, cyclic crown-of-thorns outbreaks, overfishing, and spills or improper ballast discharge.Southeast AsiaSoutheast Asian coral reefs are at risk from damaging fishing practices (such as cyanide and fishing), overfishing, sedimentation, pollution and bleaching. Activities including education, regulation and the establishment of protected areas help protect these reefs.IndonesiaIndonesia is home to one third of the worlds corals covering nearly  and one quarter of its fish species. Indonesias coral reefs are located in the heart of the Triangle and have fallen victim to destructive fishing, tourism and bleaching. Data from 414 reef monitoring stations in 2000 found that only 6% are in excellent condition, while 24% are in good condition, and approximately 70% are in poor to fair condition.(2003 The Johns Hopkins University)PhilippinesIn 2007, Check, the worlds largest reef conservation organization, stated that only 5% of Philippines  of coral reef are in excellent condition: Reef, Park in Palawan, Island in Oriental, Reef in Galera, Mindoro, and Island Passage off Batangas. Philippine reefs is Asias second largest.(Abs-Cbn Interactive, RP coral reefs, second largest in Asia, in bad shape)TaiwanCoral reefs in Taiwan are being threatened by human population growth. Many corals are affected by untreated sewage and souvenir-hunting tourists, not knowing that this practice destroys habitat and causes disease. Many corals have turned black from disease off Taiwans southeast coast.()See also*reef protection*issueReferencesFurther reading* Barber, Charles V. and Vaughan R. Pratt. 1998. Poison and Profit: Cyanide Fishing in the Indo-Pacific. Environment, Publications.* Martin, Glen. 2002. The depths of destruction Dynamite fishing ravages Philippines precious coral reefs. Francisco Chronicle, 30 May 2002External links**NOAA Report: The State of Coral Reef Ecosystems of the United States and Pacific Freely Associated States: 2008*A special report on the plight of the planets coral reefsand how you can helpfrom Mother Jones magazine
27715261
US_Presidents_on_US_postage_stamps
Washington2 1861 Issue-10c.jpg|thumb|280px|- George Washington -Issue of 1861 Engraving modeled after Gilbert Stuart portraitFor more than 160 years the one subject that has appeared most frequently on the face of U.S. Postage stamps is that of American Presidents. When the U.S. Post Office released its first two postage stamps in 1847, George Washington, along with Benjamin Franklin, were the two subjects depicted on these premier issues. The advent of Presidential honors on postage has been definitive to U.S. Postage stamp design since the first issues were released and set the premise that U.S. stamp designs would follow for many generations.The engraved portrayals of U.S. Presidents was the exclusive design and theme found on U.S. postage from 1847 until 1869, with the one exception of Benjamin Franklin, the likes of whom was presidential in his aspect to many people. Twenty two years would pass as the U.S. Post Office continued to issue various postage stamps bearing the depictions of George Washington foremost, Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Jefferson, Andrew Jackson and Abraham Lincoln, who didnt appear until 1866, one year after his death. There exist entire series of stamp issues whose printing was inspired by the subject alone. The portrayals of Washington and Franklin on U.S. Postage are among the most definitive of examples and have appeared on numerous postage stamps. The presidential theme in stamp designs would continue as the decades passed, each period issuing stamps with variations of the same basic presidential-portrait design theme.  The portrayals of U.S. Presidents on U.S. postage has remained the predominate subject and design theme on definitive postage throughout most of U.S. stamp issuance history. () (In 1869, after twenty two years of issuing stamps honoring only American Presidents and Franklin, the Post Office (References are made to U.S. Post Office for postal history prior to 1971) issued a series of eleven postage stamps that were generally regarded by the American public as being abruptly different from the previous issues and whose designs were considered at the time to be a break from the tradition of honoring American forefathers on the nations postage stamps. These new issues had other non presidential subjects and a design style that was also different, one issue bearing a horse, another a locomotive while others were depicted with nonpresidential themes. Washington and Lincoln were to be found only once in this series of eleven stamps and were also considered to be below par in design and image quality. As a result this pictographic series was met with general disdain and proved so unpopular that the issues were consequently sold for only one year where remaining stocks were pulled from post offices across the United States. (Kenmore Collectors Catalogue, #906, 2010)() ()In 1870 the U.S. Post Office resumed its short lived tradition of printing postage with the portraits of American Presidents and Forefathers like Franklin but now added several other famous Americans, including Henry Clay, Daniel Webster, Alexander Hamilton and General Winfield Scott among other notable Americans. ( (First appearancesThe portrayals of various American Presidents made their first appearances on U.S. postage at different times for very different reasons. Among the most definitive is Washington and Franklin whose engravings appeared on the first U.S. Postage stamps released by the U.S. Post Office, on July 1 of 1847. Jefferson first appeared on U.S. postage in March 1856, nine years after the first issues were released. Fifteen years of stamp issuance would pass before Jackson would appear on a U. S. Postage stamp. However, by this time, Jackson had already been presented on two Confederate stamps (both 2-cent values), making him the only U. S. President introduced to postage by the Confederacy rather than the U. S. Post office. Lincoln appeared for the first time on a U.S. postage stamp with the issue of 1866, released on April 14, 1866, the first anniversary of his death.  Up until this time only the portrayals of Washington, Franklin, Jefferson and Jackson were found on U.S. Postage. (File:George Washington 1847 issue.jpg|thumb|160px|WashingtonIssue of 1847File:Jefferson3b 1856-5c.jpg|thumb|155px|Jefferson Issue of 1856File:Andrew Jackson2 1862 Issue-2c.jpg|thumb|155px|JacksonIssue of 1863File:Lincoln 1866 Issue-15c.jpg|thumb|160px|LincolnIssue of 1866* The First Washington postage stamp. The 5-cent Franklin and the 10-cent Washington postage stamps issued in 1847 were the first postage stamps issued and authorized for postal duty by the US Post Office. The firm of Rawdon, Wright, Hatch, and Edson of York City were given a four year contract to print the first US Postage stamps in 1847. The initials: RWH&E are clearly engraved at the bottom of both stamps. The engraving of Washington is identical to the one by the portrait engraver Asher Brown Durand on a Bank-Note issued by Fairfield County Bank of Connecticut, during a period when many banks issued their own forms of paper currency. (  Both the Washington and Franklin issues were reprinted in 1875 with subtle variations in the engravings. (* In March 1856 the Post Office issued the first postage stamp to feature Jefferson. The exact date of issue is not clear. Scotts US postage stamp catalog establishes the release date with the first known use of this issue, March 24 of 1856. The first issue of this stamp was in imperforate form, engraved and printed by Toppan, Carpenter, Casilear & Co. The Jefferson issue saw postal duty from the spring of 1856 to the summer of 1857. The engraving of Jefferson was modeled after a portrait of the President by Stuart. By mid-1857 the stamps were issued with the top and bottom design projections omitted and with perforations. This printing was issued in at least six major color variations. (* On July 1 of 1863 the U.S. Post Office issued the 2 cent Jackson stamp, commonly referred to by collectors as the Black-Jack stamp, released on the same day the new drop letter rate of 3 cents went into effect, the fee for mail delivered within city limits became two cents. (Scotts United States Stamp Catalogue: Domestic Letter rates) Printed by the Bank Note Company, Jackson is the third U.S. president to be honored on U.S. Postage. (* On April 14, 1866, exactly one year after Lincolns assassination in 1865, the US Post Office issued its first postage stamp honoring the fallen President. The engraving of Lincoln was rendered by Joseph Ourdan after a photograph by C.S.German. (George WashingtonFile:Washington Head2 W-F.jpg|thumb|240px|~ Washington ~----As there are no photographs of Washington and his portraits usually hang in halls or museums, or tucked away in history books, this is the profile, found on several issues of US Postage stamps, that most Americans came to know Washingtons appearance by.  The engraving was modeled after a bust of Washington by renowned French sculptor Antoine Houdon.Washington (February 22, 1732  December 14, 1799) was the first President of the United States, serving from 1789 to 1797, and before this served as the commander of the Army in the Revolutionary War from 1775 to 1783. The Electoral College elected Washington unanimously in 1789, and again in the 1792 election; To this day George Washington remains the only American president to have received 100 percent of the electoral votes. Washington took his oath of office while standing on the balcony of Hall on Wall Street in New York City.()()The chronology of presidents on U.S. postage begins with George Washington. Near the end of Washingtons second term as president, Washington commissioned the well-known portrait artist Stuart to paint both her portrait and the presidents. Stuart was known for the length of time it took him to complete a painting, and consequently neither the president nor his wife ever saw the finished paintings. The two portraits remained unfinished and tacked to a door in Stuarts Boston studio until his death in 1828.  In 1860 artist Peale finished Stuarts work, filling in where this artist had left off. Stewarts portrait of Washington (This is Stuarts most famous and celebrated portrayal of Washington, known as The Athenaeum, which, was used to model the engravings on US one dollar bill and various Postage stamps of the 19th and 20th centuries.)(Gilbert Stuart Birthplace and Museum Gilbert Stuart Biography) became the model image for a good number of postage issues of the 19th and 20th centuries.(): George Washington remains the central figure found on US postage over the last 160 and more years. The first president appears on the face of U.S. postage more than any other American president. The engraved images of Washington found on the early issues set the precedent that all US Postage issues would follow in the following decades. Since the first U.S. postage stamp was issued by the US Post Office there have been more examples of George Washington appearing on US postage than all other American Presidents combined, including Jefferson, Jackson, Lincoln and even the frequently honored Franklin (who was not President). ( Examples of all the various Washington stamps are too numerous to include in this section, as many of the issues are very similar with only differences in color and denomination, such as the Washington-Franklin issues. Featured below are the issues that are unique in their designs and the most definitive.Classic periodPostage stamp designs of this period were typically taken from paintings and other works by famous artists, that set the precedent for stamp designs in the ensuing years of American stamp production. Engravers from this period typically used the works of Trumbull, Stuart and Antoine Houdon as models for their engravings.(  Smithsonian National Postal Museum)* On July 1, 1851, the US Post Office issued a 3-cent Postage stamp. Because of die recuts, double transfers from die to plate and different paper used for its printing, this issue comes in numerous varieties. The authoritative book on the issue, Classic US Stamps 1845-1869 was written by Carroll Chase, published in 1962. Engraving of image taken from a sculpture by Antoine Houdon* The Post Office released the 12-cent Washington of August 4 of 1851. The engraving of Washington is modeled after a portrait by Stuart. When the 12c issue was printed the stamp was the highest US denomination ever issued. The issue was printed by Toppan, Carpenter, Casilear & Co.* In 1855 postage for mail bound for destinations over 3,000 miles increased the cost of Postage from 6-cents to 10-cents and prompted the issue of the 1855 10c Washington stamp. This 10c green issue was printed by Toppan, Carpenter, Casilear & Co. who reused the engraving of Washington (the vignette) of the 12-cent Washington 1851 Issue for this 10-cent postage stamp. Engraving was modeled after Gilbert Stuarts portrait of Washington.* On August 13 of 1860 the Post Office issued the Washington 90c issue. Washingtons engraving was modeled after a portrait by Trumbull, named George Washington Before the Battle of Trenton, painted in 1792. It was only issued in the year 1860 and because of its high denomination only 29,000 copies were made and surviving examples are scarce. There were very few occasions where the amount of postage required to mail an item cost as much as 90c and as such genuinely postally used examples of this issue are worth about twice as much as unused specimens.((Civil War eraLincoln assumed office in March 1861 and just one month later the Confederate forces fired on Sumter which marked the beginning of the Civil War.  Issued only months after the of Fort Sumter, no other series of stamps issued during the Classic Period has such an important connection to American history as the 1861 National Bank Note Company Issues. Washington occurs five times in this series, Franklin occurs twice and Jefferson once.(* The Post Office released the 10c Washington green issue on August 20 of 1861. Washingtons portrayal was engraved by Marshall who employed Stuarts unfinished portrait of the first American president for his model.(1847USA)* The 3c Washington of this series was issued on August 19, 1861. The engraved imagery was modeled after a bust of Washington by French sculptor Antoine Houdon.* 12c Washington issue of 1861.  The National Bank Note Company was founded in 1859, and William Marshall was one of the first portrait engravers hired. By early 1860, Marshall was given the task of engraving Washingtons portrayal for the 1861 Issue. He was sent to Boston to use Gilbert Stuarts portrait painting of George Washington as his model for the new engraving.()* The 1832 24c lilac was issued January 7, 1862. The engraving was taken from same Gilbert Stuart painting. The engraver was William Marshall, the same artist who produced the 10 and 12 cent Washington 1861 Issues. William D. Nichols and Cyrus Durand (inventor of the machine used to produce intricate lathe work in engravings) was the engraver of the stamps frame work.(, 1862 issues, National Postal Museum)* The 90c Washington issue was issued in the last two weeks in August 1861 to only several post offices. The earliest known use on cover is November 27, 1861. The engraving of Washington was taken from the same John Trumbull portrait as was the issue of 1861.:::* In 1869 the ill-fated pictorial issue was released. Most of the stamp issues from this series featured scenes of various sorts. The Washington stamp of this series was criticized as much as the others but for its plain graphic features, like the checker background in the vigenette.  The stamp format was designed by E. Pitcher while the engraving was modeled after a Gilbert Stuart portrait of Washington.(* George Washington is also found on an 1863 Civil War issue of the Confederate States.Post Civil WarThe ending of the American Civil War marked a beginning in US stamp subject and design change.  The Union victory brought with it a strong American nationalism among the populace throughout the north and much of the country. This national sentiment was largely responsible for the various Civil War figures to appear on US Postage. Up until 1869 with the one exception of Benjamin Franklin only American presidents were found on US Postage. In April 1870, however, the images of Henry Clay, Daniel Webster, Winfield Scott, Alexander Hamilton and Oliver Hazzard Perry appeared on new the 12, 15, 24, 30 and 90 stamps, and the following year M. Stanton, the US Secretary of War under the Lincoln, appeared on a 7-cent postage stamp.(()1870sThe postage issued in the US during this time was printed by the Bank Note Company (NBNCo) on white wove paper. The first printing was issued with grills, tiny cuts in the paper to absorb ink. Later reprintings were issued without grilling. The Bank Note Companys contract expired in 1873, and the Bank Note Company (CBNC) won the contract to continue printing the series and took over some of the dies and plates used by NBNCo. The new printer employed secret marks to distinguish their work from the first printing.((The green Washington 3 issue was printed in such large quantities that postally used examples remain inexpensive to this day, from pennies to a few dollars, depending on type of cancellation and condition. (The green variety was reprinted again by the Bank Note Company (AmBNC), also in very large quantities, and issued on July 16, 1881.) The 3-cent Washington design was printed yet a fourth time, in vermillion, in 1887. The 3-cent issues paid the domestic letter rate for a half-ounce letter.(The profile image of George Washington found on various postage issues of the late 19th century and early 20th century is modeled after a bust of Washington by the renowned sculptor Houdon. Several engravers of presidential portraits on US Postage have modeled their engravings after Houdons sculptures.~ Large Bank Notes of the 1870s ~Engraving taken from bust by Antoine HoudonJean Antoine Houdons portrait sculpture of Washington was the result of a specific invitation from Benjamin Franklin to come to the United States so that Washington could model for him. Washington sat for wet clay life models and a plaster life mask in 1785.() These models served for many commissions of Washington and eventually were used as models for the engravings of Washington on several US Postage issues of the 1870s, 1880s and 1890s.1880sIn 1883 the US Post Office reduced the first-class letter rate from 3 cents to 2 cents for a half-ounce letter mailed within the continental United States, which the Congress approved on March 3, 1883, effective October 1, 1883.()~ American Bank Note Company ~Engraving taken from bust by Antoine Houdon1890sStamp issues during the 1890s were first printed by the Bank Note Company in 1890 and then by the of Engraving and Printing in 1894.  The image for both issues was produced by an engraving that was modeled after a bust of Washington by sculptor Antoine Houdon.(* The American Bank Note 1890 issue, 2c, lake variety, Washington stamp (left) was issued on February 22, 1890, becoming the first stamp to be issued on a presidents birthday.* Bureau of Engraving and Printing issues, struck from the same dies as the ABN 1890 issues with minor changes in the frame work, three different styled triangles, known to collectors as the Bureau Triangles. The 2c Washington paid the letter domestic letter rate and was printed in such large quantities that numerous color variations exist.((Turn of the 19th - 20th centuriesAt the turn of the 20th century, Washington continued to be the most prominent subject depicted on the face of US postage stamps. Washington would remain the most prevalent figure on US Postage for most of the 20th century.  Only Franklin whose image also appears on numerous US postage is second to Washington for the simple reason that Franklin is depicted on the numerous denominations of the Washington-Franklin series almost as often as Washington.(Washington Franklins 1908 - 1921, 1979 by Martin Armstrong) Ironically, George Washington does not appear on a Commemorative issue until 1925 where he is featured on a stamp commemorating another historical event.::* Issued on January 17, 1903 the 2c carmine red Washington postage stamp was issued by the US Post Office. The engraving of Washington was inspired and modeled after a painting by Stuart which features a one quarter left image of Washington. R. Ostrander Smith designed the stamp. The vignette with its two American flags is often referred to as the Washington Flag stamp.  Washingtons portrait was engraved by George F. C. Smillie who has engraved a variety of stamp images for the of Engraving and Printing. The 1903 issue is one among the second series of stamp issues that were produced that year by the Bureau.::* On November 12th of 1903 the Post Office, because of public dissatisfaction with the 1903 2-cent Washington Flag stamp, a new 2-cent stamp was issued featuring Washingtons portrait within a shield of stars and stripes. Often referred to as the 2-cent Washington Shield stamp, this issue was released on November the 12th of 1903. Along with the shield background, the left numeral is enclosed with laurel leaves while the number on the right is surrounded with oak leaves, symbolizing Washingtons role as president in peace time and as general in times of war. Like the first 2c stamp of 1903 this issues was designed by Aubrey Huston from a painting by Stuart.( The engraving of Washington was done by George F. C. Smillie.  The Washington Shield stamp is recognized for its many shade varieties, as collectors have distinguished over a hundred shades of this particular issue.(The Washington - Franklin IssuesThe Washington Franklin Issues were unique in the sense that these subjects were the only ones found on definitive stamps for more than a decade. Beginning in 1908 the Washington Franklin definitive stamps were issued over a twelve-year period in denominations that occurred from One-Cent to Five-Dollars, with different colors for each denomination, all with the same engraved profile of Washington or Franklin. While both Washington and Franklin occur on the 1-cent values, both in green, they are usually found on their own set of denominations, depending on which series they occurred in.(  During their twleve year issuance dozens of different Washington stamps were issued. The engraving of Washington was modeled after a bust by renown sculptor Antoine Houdon.( There are simply too many varieties to enumerate here in a topographical capacity, nor is it necessary. The few examples exhibited here are largely representative of this greater series. Franklin is displayed once here for general reference to the Washington - Franklin issues. See main article: Issues* On January 29, 1909, the US Post Office issued the 1-dollar Washington Head stamp. It was the last of the first issue of Washington-Franklin stamps to appear.  The stamp remained on sale at Post Offices for more than three years before being replaced by a Franklin head 1-dollar stamp in 1916.( The One-Dollar stamp is the highest denomination Washington is depicted with. The Two and Five Dollar denominations are on stamps that honor Franklin.(Scotts Specialized Catalogue of United States Stamps, Washington - Franklin Issues)Washington 1911 Issue-3c.jpg|thumb|272px|center|Washington on coil stampsissue of 1911The denominations for the various year issues can be viewed on the Washington-Franklin issues chart.Washington on commemorative issuesWhile Washington dominated as the subject of US postage issues from the beginning, he did not appear on a commemorative issue until 1925, some 21 years after the U.S. Post office issued the first presidential commemorative stamp honoring Jefferson.(Scotts Specialized Catalogue of United States Stamps: Commemorative Index)at Cambridge 1925 Issue-2c.jpg|thumb|250px|Washington at CambridgeIssue of 1925at Prayer 1928 Issue-2c.jpg|thumb|145px|Washington at PrayerIssue of 1928at Brooklyn 1951 Issue-3cjpg.jpg|thumb|250px|Washington at BrooklynIssue of 1951* On the 1-cent stamp portraying the Lexington - Concord issue of 1925, Washington is shown leading the Massachusetts Militia at Cambridge against General Gage and the regulars. This series was the first of many commemoratives celebrating the 150th anniversary of important events of the Revolution. Like most issues of this period, this issue was printed by the Bureau of Engraving and Printing.taking Oath 1939 Issue-3c.jpg|thumb|155px|Washington takes OathIssue of 1939* This 2-cent red postage stamp was issued on May 26, 1928. This commemorative honored the 150th anniversary of George Washington at Valley Forge and depicts him kneeling in prayer before the battle.* The US Post Office issued a 3-cent commemorative stamp, first issued at Brooklyn, New York, on December 10, 1951, to commemorate the 175th anniversary of the of Brooklyn. The stamp portrays the evacuation of General Washingtons troops from Brooklyn at the site of the Fulton Ferry House, with an accurate depiction of the house and the flat-bottomed ferries used to cross the East River.* On April 30, 1789, President Washington took the oath of President of the United States. On the 150th anniversary of his inauguration, April 30, 1939, the US Post Office issued a 3c commemorative stamp celebrating this landmark historical event. The engraving depicts Washington standing on the balcony of the Federal Hall in New York reciting the oath of office.(* The 2-cent stamp issued on October 19, 1931, marked the 150th anniversary of the of Yorktown (1781). This issue depicts Washington with Count de Rochambeau and Count de Grasse at his right and left, leaders of the French forces that aided in the victory of the Revolution.* The 1-cent Army Issue of December 15, 1936, features George Washingtons home at Vernon as its central design. Portraits of Washington and Greene appear on either side of the image of Mount Vernon. Greene was one of Washingtons most valued generals in the Revolutionary War.* The 13-cent stamp Christmas Issue commemorates the 200th anniversary of Washingtons army at Forge, and was based on the C. Leyendecker painting George Washington at Valley Forge. Leyendeckers painting first appeared on the cover of the Evening Post on February 23, 1935. The stamp was designed by Steven Dohanos. The stamp was first available on October 21, 1977, at Valley Forge, Pennsylvania.( Washingtons 200th anniversaryOn January 1, 1932, in celebration of Washingtons 200th anniversary of birth, the U.S. Post Office released its Washington Bicentennial Issue, a series of twelve postage stamps each with a different portrait of Washington. Each engraved portrayal was modeled from a different painting by an early American artist who portrayed Washington at different periods in his life.((  Engravings of Washington often depict his profile. In the 1932 Bi-Centennial anniversary series there are two issues that show Washington in profile, one depicting either sides of Washingtons face. Information regarding quantities issued can be found on the Washington Bicentennial Issue page.The Washington Bicentennial issues of 1932 are the first commemorative postage stamps ever issued by the US Post Office that honor and depict George Washington by himself, and not in conjunction with other people, places and events as is the case with the three commemoratives with Washingtons image issued before 1932. ( It should be noted that the 2-cent Washington in this series total 4.2 billion stamps, a total that remains the largest stamp printing of a single issue ever to occur in U.S. Postal history. (Washington Bicentenial, Smithsonian National Postal Museum)Washington issues, middle 20th century* On January 15 of 1923 the US Post Office issued  another 2c red Washington postage stamp thus keeping with the tradition of honoring Washington on every day use postage. An existing engraving of Washington made for use on the Washington-Franklin issue was used. That engraving, done by Marcus Baldwin, was modeled from a bust made by Clark Mills in 1853 which however was a reproduction of a bust sculpted by Antoine Houdon at Washingtons Vernon, Virginia, home in 1785. Aubrey Huston designed the stamps frame, which was engraved by Edward M. Hall and Joachim C. Benzing.(* On April 25 of 1938 the US Post Office issued a green 1-cent Washington stamp. It was the first stamp of the famous Presidential Series of 1938. This Washington issue saw postal duty carrying postcards and letters through the late 1950s. The 1938 Presidential issue was Franklin Roosevelts idea. An avid stamp collector, Roosevelt suggested a set of stamps that would pay tribute to the various past American presidents. In 1937, after much debate, a new definitive series was issued using Roosevelts ideas. A national contest was held, with over 1200 entries submitted, a young New York City art students entry was chosen for the Washington stamp design. The students name was Elaine Rawlinson.(*  The US Post Office released the 1-cent Washington stamp on August 26 of 1954 at the Post Office in Chicago, Illinois. The engraving of George Washington was modeled from a portrait by Stuart (17551828).  It was designed by Charles R. Chickering, who produced his own drawing from a photograph he obtained from the National Gallery. The portrait of Washington was engraved by Richard M. Bower of the of Engraving and Printing.* On November 23, 1962 the Post office issued the 5-cent Washington stamp, first issued through the New York, New York, post office . Designed by William K. Schrage, the engraving of Washington, like several other engravings of this president, is based on a bust of Washington sculptured in 1785 by Jean Houdon.Washington, recent issuesIn recent years, Washington has appeared much less frequently on US Postage stamps than he did during 19th and early 20th centuries. In the beginning of postage stamp issuance new issues were few and only presidents were found on US Postage, with the well liked exception of Ben Franklin. In recent days, issues are many and a whole array of various individuals are now found on US Postage stamps. The Post Office has been both admired and criticized for this practice.* The original Heart, designated as the of Military Merit, was established by Washington then the commander-in-chief of the Army on August 7, 1782.(Mount Vernon Estate & Gardens) The actual order includes the phrase, Let it be known that he who wears the military order of the purple heart has given of his blood in the defense of his homeland and shall forever be revered by his fellow countrymen. It is Washingtons profile that adorns the Purple Heart, and the US Postage issue that honors them both. -- On April 28, 2009, in Washington, DC, the US Postal Service reissued the Purple Heart definitive stamp in a denomination of forty-four cents. Carl T. Herrman of Carlsbad, California, designed the stamp. The stamp had been previously issued in the following years: 2008, 42-cent: 2007, 41-cent: 2006, 39-cent: 2003, 37-cent. Designed by Carl T. Herrman, the stamp depicts an image of the Purple Heart medal with Washington in profile.(USPS Postal Bulletin (April 10, 2008))* On the 250th anniversary of George Washingtons birth a 20-cent commemorative stamp was issued February 22, 1982, at Mount Vernon, Virginia, in commemoration. The First Day of Issue ceremony was held in the Mount Vernon Inn at Washingtons Mount Vernon estate.()The designer, Mark English, of Kansas City, Missouri, based his design on a stylistic portrait depicting the distinctive Washington profile. * Washington also appears on the AMERIPEX Presidential issue of 1986.John AdamsAdams (October 30, 1735  July 4, 1826) was the second President of the United States serving from 1797 to 1801, after being the first Vice President of the United States (17891797) for two terms. He was one of the most influential Founding Fathers of the United States. Adams came to prominence in the early stages of the Revolution. As a delegate from Massachusetts to the Continental Congress, he played a leading role in convincing Congress to declare independence, and assisted Thomas Jefferson in drafting the United States Declaration of Independence in 1776.  Adams and Jefferson died on the same day, Thursday, July 4, 1826.:::* The engraved portrayal of Adams (1735-1826) appears on the 2-cent value of the 1938 Presidential Series, issued on June 3, 1938. Chester Frenchs marble 1889 bust of Adams displayed in the US Capitols Senate Gallery was the model used for the engraving of Adams.Thomas Jefferson1861 Die Proof2.jpg|Issue of 1861|thumb|245px|~ Jefferson ~Die Proof 1861Thomas Jefferson (April 13, 1743  July 4, 1826) was the third President of the United States Serving from 1801 to 1809, and the principal author of the Declaration of Independence. Jefferson was one of the most prominent amd influential Founding Fathers. As president he oversaw major events that included the Purchase in 1803 and the and Clark Expedition in 1804 &ndash; 1806.Jeffersons likeness over the years has been finely depicted on the face of the various postage issues that honored him.  The first issue to depict Jefferson was issued in 1856, (displayed above) nine years after the Post Office issued its first two stamps of Washington and Franklin in 1847.  (Before this time hand-stamps were used to mark and confirm payment of postage.)  Almost as popular and famous as Washington, Jefferson appears comparatively less often on US postage issues, and unlike Washington and Franklin, appears on just two commemorative issues, one in 1904, displayed below), the other on the AMERIPEX presidential issue of 1986. All others occurrences depict him on regular issues.(* On August 19, 1861, while the American Civil War was wreaking havoc across Virginia and elsewhere, the US Post office issued a 5c Postage stamp that honored Thomas Jefferson. The engraving used to produce the image was modeled after the famous portrait artist Stuart. The engraver for this issue was William Marshall who also engraved Washingtons image for several other issues of this period.( That year, Jefferson became the first U. S. President to appear on a Confederate stamp: a 10c value in blue, reissued in 1862 with its color changed to rose-pink.* On August 19, 1861 the U.S. Post Office released the second postage stamp honoring Jefferson, a 5-cent buff (yellow-brown) colored issue, modeled after Gilbert Stuarts portrait of this president. This issue occurs in several distinct shades of brown. This image was again reprinted on February 3, 1863 in a dark brown color.(* On April 12 of 1870, the third Postage stamp issued by the US Post Office to honor Thomas Jefferson was issued. The 10c stamp issue was printed by the Bank Note Company. In 1859 the renown sculptor Powers was commissioned by the US government to create two life-size marble statues to be placed in the United States Capitol building. One was of Benjamin Franklin the other was of Thomas Jefferson, completed in 1863.  This was the image Powers used to model his engraving of Jefferson on the 10c issue of 1870.()* Issued on February 22, 1890 the U.S. Post office released a 30c postage stamp that once again honored Thomas Jefferson.  The engraver and artist Alfred Jones (18191900) created the image of Jefferson that appears on the issue.  Jones was noted for his  engraved portraits and historic scenes during his time at Bank Note Company.* On November 1, 1894, the first 50c Postage stamp was issued. It was among a series of issues that was first printed by the of Engraving and Printing. Its design is based on that of the 30c black issue of 1890 that depicts the same engraved image of Thomas Jefferson by Alfred Jones. Almost identical in design, it is readily distinguished by its orange color.* The second 50-cent orange stamp depicting Thomas Jefferson was issued March 23, 1903. The stamp was designed by R. Ostrander Smith from the 1805 a portrait of Jefferson by Gilbert Stuart. Jeffersons portrait was engraved by George F. C. Smillie.(* Jefferson first appearance on a US postage occurred in 1856. Aubrey Huston designed the new Jefferson stamp. For the engraving of Jefferson Huston used George F.C. Similles engraving of Jefferson that appeared on the 2-cent value of the 1904 Louisiana Purchase Exposition Series. Simille used a portrait of Jefferson painted by Stuart in 1805 as the model for his engraving. Similles engraving was then transferred to a new die and restored by Bureau engravers John Eissler and Leo Kauffmann for use on the 1923 Jefferson issue.* Jefferson appears on the 3-cent Presidential issue of 1938.* On September 15, 1954, 2-cent Liberty, was first issued at Post Offices in San Francisco, California. The postcard rate went to 2 cents on the day of this issue was released so the stamp was very common among the mail for that reason. The engraving of Jefferson was taken from a portrait by Stuart which hangs in the Bowdoin College Museum of Fine Arts in Brunswick, Maine.* The 1-cent green stamp was issued January 12, 1968, at Jeffersonville, Indiana. The issue was designed by Robert Geissmann, modeled after a 1800 portrait of Jefferson by Peale which now hangs in the Blue Room of the White House.  Edward R. Felver crafted the engraving of Jefferson.(* The US Post office issued the 29-cent Thomas Jefferson definitive stamp on April 13, 1993, in Charlottesville, Virginia. The stamp engraving features a portrait of Jefferson and is part of the Great Americans Series. The stamp issue was designed by Christopher Calle while the die for the stamp was engraved by Stamp Venturers, Inc.Jefferson on commemorative issueAnother oddity of US Postage is the fact that Jefferson up until recently only appeared on one US commemorative issue, which was released in 1904. It was the first commemorative issue to ever honor a U.S. President.(The First Presidential CommemorativeFile:Thomas Jefferson 1904 Issue-4c.jpg|thumb|center|280px|~ Classic engraving of Jefferson ~Purchase ExpositionIssue of 1904.* Unlike with the regular issues Jefferson was the first American President to be honored on a commemorative postage issue, even before Washington was when the US Post Office 21 years later finally issued its first commemorative issue featuring Washington in its Lexington-Concord issue of 1925.(* The last issue to honor Jefferson to date was a 22-cent commemorative  AMERIPEX presidential issue released in 1986.James MadisonMadison, 4th President of the United States, served from 18091817) and is considered one of the Fathers of the United States and also the  Father of the Constitution as Madison was the principal author of the U.S. Constitution. In 1788, he wrote over a third of the Papers, still the most influential commentary on the U.S. Constitution.(Madison Debates in Convention - Tuesday June 26, 1787 http://avalon.law.yale.edu/18th_century/debates_626.asp) Madison appears on three issues.(* On December 10 of 1894 the Post Office issued a 2-dollars Madison stamp. The engraving of Madison was modeled after his portrayal by Stuart, who painted a total of four portraits of the president. The painting used to model the engraving is now owned by the Colonial Williamsburg Association ()* The dark blue 2-dollar stamp was issued June 5, 1903. The stamp image was designed by R. Ostrander Smith from a painting by an unknown artist and Madisons portrayal was engraved by George F. C. Smillie. Both the 1894 amd 1903 2-dollar stamps were often used by the Post Office for internal transferring of funds.()* The U.S. Post Office issued a 4c Madison stamp on July 1, 1938, part of the Presidential series that was being issued that year. The engraving of Madison on this issues was modeled after a bust by William Sievers on display in the State Capital building in Richmond, Virginia.()::::::Until recently James Madison has never appeared on a US commemorative postage stamp. His 200th anniversary of birth in 1951 was even overlooked by the other seven commemoratives postage stamps that were issued that year.  In 2001 the US Post Office finally issued the James Madison 250th anniversary commemorative stamp, first released in New York, N.Y., on October 18, 2001.  The stamp was designed and illustrated by John Thompson.(James MonroeMonroe, (April 28, 1758  July 4, 1831)  5th President of the United States, served two terms from 1817 to 1825. Monroe fought in the American Revolution.  He is most noted for his Doctrine, which stated that the United States would not tolerate further European intervention in the Americas.  Monroe was considered the last Founding Father of the United States.* The first US Postage stamp to honor Monroe was the Purchase Expedition commemorative 3c issue of 1904. From a series of five issues these stamps were only sold during the seven months of the Exposition.(* The 10c orange (yellow) regular issue was printed and issued in 1923, 1925 and 1927. Aubrey Houston designed the Monroe stamp after a painting by Vanderlyn which now hangs in City Hall, New York City. For Monroes image he used an engraving done by George F.C. Simille previously used to produce the 3-cent issue of the 1904 Louisiana Purchase Exposition Series.  Edward J. Hein transferred Similles engraving to a new die and restored it for the new stamp.(()* For the vignette of the 3c value of the 1904 Louisiana Purchase Exposition Series he used an engraving done by George F.C. Simille. Edward J. Hein transferred the engraving to a new die and restored it for the new stamp issue, the first definitive issue to honor Monroe.(* The 5c Presidential issue of 1938 depicts Monroe in profile, as do all of the images of that series. The engraving of Monroe was modeled after a Congressional Medal designed by Furst and struck by the US Mint.(* On April 28, 1958 the Post Office issued a 3-cent stamp to commemorate the 200th anniversary of the birth of James Monroe, first issued through the Montross, Virginia, post office. The issue was designed by Frank Conley and was modeled after a portrait of Monroe by renown American artist Stuart who has also painted the portraits of Washington and other notables.* The image of the 5c 1958 issue  was modeled after a portrait by Peale displayed at James Monroe Law Office and Museum in Fredericksburg, Virginia, the building in which James Monroe practiced law.(* Monroe is honored on a 22-cent commemorative  AMERIPEX presidential issue of 1986.John Quincy AdamsQuincy Adams (July 11, 1767  February 23, 1848) was the sixth President of the United States from March 4, 1825, to March 4, 1829. Adams was the son of the second U.S. president, Adams. When President Washington appointed him minister to the Netherlands John Quincy Adams began his career in American politics at the age of twenty-seven years. Adams later served as Secretary of State in the Cabinet of President James Monroe from 1817 until 1825.* The engraved image of Adams appears on the orange 6-cent denomination of the 1938 Presidential Series. The engraving was modeled after a bust of Adams displayed in the US Capitol.( This is the first US Postage stamp that John Quincy Adams appeared.* The next postage stamp Adams appeared on was with the Ameripex 86 issue, honoring all past (and deceased) American Presidents.(Andrew JacksonJackson, 7th President of the United States, served from 18291837. He was the commander of the American forces at the of New Orleans in 1815. Jackson died in 1845, however the US Post Office did not release a stamp in his honor until 18 years after his death, with the issue of 1863 (displayed in First appearances) above).(At that time, as aforesaid, he had already appeared on two different Confederate 2c stamps.~ Regular issues of the 19th century ~* Powers (18051873) was considered one of the greatest American-born neoclassical sculptors. In 1834, Andrew Jackson posed many times for Powers as he sculpted a bust of the president.  The bust was completed in January 1835. Thirty-five years later, it inspired the image of the 2-cent Jackson stamp from the Bank Note Company 1870-1871 Issue.* The 3c issue of 1894 features a similar image of Jackson as the issues of 1873 and 1883, taken from a bust by Hiram Powers.~ Regular issues of the 20th century ~* The 3c issue of 1903 was engraved by A. Sealey who modeled his image after a portrait of Jackson by renown American artist Sully. In 1824 Sully painted a study portrait from life of Andrew Jackson. By this time Jackson was a US senator and a Democratic nominee for coming presidential election of 1824. Two decades later, Jacksons ill health prompted Sully to repaint his 1824 study portrait Jacksons portrait from this image. The painting was completed shortly before Jacksons death in April 1845. The Sully portrait was the model for the engravings used on the postage issues of 1903 and 1967. The Sully painting is currently hanging in the National Gallery of Art in Washington DC.(Scotts Identifier of U.S. Definitive Issues)* The 7-cent 1938 Presidential issue features Jacksons profile. The image of Jacksons was modeled after the Belle Kinney and Leopold F. Scholz bronze statue of Jackson which stands in the US Capitols Rotunda.* The 1c 1963 issue of Jackson was designed by William K. Schrange. Jacksons image was modeled after a medal by Furst in 1829.(* The engraving of Jackson on the 10c issue of 1967 is taken from the same Thomas Sully painting that was used to model the engraving in the 1903 issue. Lester Beal designed the overall stamp image and design.(Andrew Jackson on commemorative issuesAndrew Jackson appears on three commemorative issues: The Army Issue of 1937, the Tennessee Statehood issue of 1946 and the of New Orleans issue of 1961.(* The 2-cent Army issue, released on January 15, 1937, features portraits of Andrew Jackson and Scott on either side with Jacksons home, the Hermitage, depicted in the background. Jackson was a hero of the War of 1812, his troops having defeated the British in the of New Orleans. Scott served as a General in the US Army longer than any other man in American history.* Issued on June 1, 1946, the 150th anniversary of Tennessee statehood was commemorated by a 3-cent purple stamp  depicting Andrew Jackson on the left with  John Sevier on the right with the image of the Tennessee State Capitol in the center of the design. Jackson was the first U.S. President from Tennessee.* On the 5c Battle of New Orleans issue depicts then General Jackson defeating an invading British Army which was intent on seizing and taking control of New Orleans and the vast territory America had acquired with the Purchase.(Reilly, Robin (1974). The British at the gates - the New Orleans campaign in the War of 1812. New York: Putnam.)* Jackson appears on the AMERIPEX presidential issue of 1986.* On August 19 of 1994 the Post Office issued a 5-dollar Washington-Jackson stamp in Pittsburg, Pennsylvania, at the American Philatelic Societys annual stamp exposition. The stamp was modeled after a design created in 1869 by the Bank Note Company It was originally prepared but never was used for the 1869 US postage series. The central image or vignette features a portrait of George Washington and Andrew Jackson. The portrayals of Washington and Jackson were engraved through the intaglio process by Stamp Venturers, Inc., and issued in small sheets of twenty stamps.(Martin Van BurenVan Buren (December 5, 1782  July 24, 1862) was the eighth President of the United States from 1837 to 1841. Before his presidency, he served as the eighth Vice President (18331837) and the 10th Secretary of State under Jackson. Van Buren was the first US President to be born an American citizen.(NARA.gov, Martin Van Buren)::* Van Buren appears on the 1938 issue, the 8-cent olive green denomination of the 1938 Presidential Series, a series of stamps whose denominations corresponded with the number of the given Presidents term. A sculpted bust of Van Buren on display in the US Capitols Senate Gallery was used as the model for the engraving of the Presidents image for this issue.::* Van Buren is honored on the AMERIPEX presidential issue of 1986.William Henry HarrisonHenry Harrison (February 9, 1773  April 4, 1841) was the ninth President of the United States, and served in the U.S. Army as an officer and politician, and the first president to die in office. (White House Archives) The oldest president elected until Reagan in 1980, and last President to be born before the States Declaration of Independence, Harrison a hero in the of 1812, died on his thirty-second day in office. (Harrison served as President for 30 days, 12 hours and 32 minutes, but this was spread over 32 different calendar days; part of a day upon inauguration, 30 full days, then part of the day on which he died.) Harrisons grandson, Harrison of Indiana, was the 23rd president, from 1889 to 1893, making them the only grandparentgrandchild pair of presidents.() . . .* Harrison appears on the 9-cent pink 1938 Presidential Series issue. Image of Harrison is taken from a bust displayed in the Rotunda of the Virginia State Capitol building.(  The issue was designed by William Schrage and the master engraver was C. A. Brooks.(1847 U.S.A., Postage Stamps of the United States First Issued in 1938)* On July 4, 1950 the US Post Office issued a 3 cent Indiana territory commemorative celebrating the 150th anniversary if Indiana statehood. First day of issue took place at Indiana Post office. The central design of the stamp is a portrait of William Henry Harrison who was the first governor of Territory. Behind him is an image of the First State Capitol building.(* Harrison appears on the AMERIPEX presidential commemorative issues of 1986.John TylerTyler (March 29, 1790  January 18, 1862) was the tenth President of the United States (18411845) and the first to succeed to the office following the death of a predecessor. Tyler assumed office when President William H. Harrison died only thirty days into his term as U.S. President.(:::* The image of John Tyler (1790-1862), appears on the orange-brown 10-cent denomination of the 1938 Presidential Series. The image of Tyler was modeled after a bust by John Keck on display in the Rotunda of the Virginia State Capitol.( This issue was the first and is the only US Postage stamp that honors John Tyler.( The Tyler postage issue of 1932 was used primarily in combination with other denominations. Finding examples of solo usage are most often found on outgoing international mail.(:::* The last postage stamp to honor Tyler (to date) was issued in 1986, a 22-cent stamp in the AMERIPEX presidential issue, where each President up to and including Johnson is honored with his own stamp.(James K. PolkKnox Polk (November 2, 1795  June 15, 1849) was the 11th President of the United States (18451849). Polk was born in North Carolina. He later lived in and became Governor of the state of Tennessee. A Democrat, Polk served as Speaker of the House (18351839) and Governor of Tennessee (18391841) before becoming president. Polk was an ardent supporter of Jackson.  Polk was considered the last strong pre-Civil War president.* The image of Polk appears on the 11-cent denomination of the 1938 Presidential Series. Polks profile on the stamp was modeled after a medal struck by the US Mint.( This issue was printed in ultramarine and was printed only as a sheet stamp, first issued in Washington DC on September 8, 1938.(* Polk is honored on the AMERIPEX presidential issue of 1986.* The US Post Office honored the eleventh President on the 200th anniversary of Polks birth with the 1995 issue of a 32-cent commemorative stamp, first issued on November 2, in Columbia, Tennessee, where Polk spent his adult life. The issue was engraved by the intaglio process, printed in red-brown by the Corporation of America. This is one of the few modern day issues that still spells out the full title, UNITED STATES POSTAGE as did most US postage stamps up until around the 1950s when the shortened title US Postage slowly began to replace the original title. It is also one of the very few modern day regular issues that honor famous Americans which has the years of birth and death of the subject inscribed on the face.(Trend can be noted with the aid of any illustrated US postage stamp catalog.)Zachary TaylorTaylor (November 24, 1784  July 9, 1850) was the 12th President of the United States and an American military leader. Taylor ran as a Whig in the 1848 presidential election, defeating Cass and becoming the first man elected to the Presidency without having held any previous elected office. He served in the US Army for over forty years and as Old Rough and Ready had a reputation for never losing a battle.  During the War (18461848) Taylor became a national hero, and with this fame he was elected to the presidency.* Zachary Taylor is honored on three US postage stamps, regular issues.  The first Taylor stamp was issued in 1875. This first issue was printed by the Bank Note Company on yellowish wove paper. When the Bank Note Company received the federal contract to print postage stamps in 1879 it printed the second Taylor issue (identical in appearance to the 1875 issue) on soft porous paper, using the original dies of Continental Bank Note Company. The engraving of Taylor was modeled after a daguerrotype of Taylor by famous Civil War photographer Brady.(* Taylor also appears on the 12-cent denomination of the 1938 Presidential Series. A bust displayed in the Rotunda of the State Capitol inspired the image depicted on this issue.(* There is only two commemorative issues of Taylor, on issued in the 1986 AMERIPEX Presidential issue and one issued in 2001.(Millard FilmoreFillmore (January 7, 1800  March 8, 1874) was the 13th President of the United States, serving from 1850 until 1853.  He became the second President to assume the presidency after the death of a sitting president when he succeeded Taylor, who died in Office in July 1850. As such Fillmore was never actually elected president, and was the last member of the Whig Party to hold that office.* Millard Filmore appears on the 1938 Issue as the 13c denomination in that series. The engraved image of Filmore was modeled after a bust by Cushing ( displayed in the Senate Gallery of the US Capitol. This is Millard Fillmores first appearance on a U.S. postage stamp.(* Filmore also appears once in the AMERIPEX presidential series, 36 commemorative stamps, issued by the Post Office on May 22, 1986.Franklin PiercePierce (November 23, 1804  October 8, 1869), an American politician and lawyer, was the 14th President of the United States, serving from 1853 to 1857, and is the only President from New Hampshire. Pierce enlisted in the volunteer U.S. Army during the War and rose to the rank of colonel. In March 1847, he was appointed brigadier general of volunteers and took command of a brigade of reinforcements for Scotts army marching on Mexico City.()* Pierce appears on the 14c issue of the 1938 Presidential Series. A medal struck by the US Mint served as the model for the engraved image of Pierce. The stamp was issued by the US Post Office on October 6, 1938. Pierce did not appear on a commemorative issue until the Post office issued the AMERIPEX presidential issue in 1986.* Pierce appears again in the AMERIPEX presidential series, issued May 22, 1986.James BuchananBuchanan, Jr. (April 23, 1791  June 1, 1868) was the 15th President of the United States serving from 1857 until 1861 and the last President to be born in the 18th century. Buchanan served as a congressman (18211831), Senator (18341845), Minister to Russia (18321834), Secretary of State (18451849) before ascending to the presidency in 1857. Opinions by historians of Buchanans presidency vary, as some credit him for keeping a divided nation together for so long while others fault him for failing to avert a civil war.  To date he is the only president from the state of Pennsylvania and the only one to have never married.* The engraved portrayal of James Buchanan appears on the 15-cent issue of the 1938 Presidential Series. The image was modeled after a sculpted bust by Henry Dexter which is now on display in the Gallery of Art in Washington, DC.( This was Buchanans first appearance on a US Postage stamp.* Buchanan also appears on the AMERIPEX presidential issue of 1986.(Abraham LincolnLincoln (February 12, 1809 &ndash; April 15, 1865) was the 16th President of the United States, serving from 1861 to 1865. He successfully led the United States through its Civil War, thus preserving the Union and bringing an end to slavery. Lincoln was the first Republican president, elected in 1860. Lincoln issued the Proclamation in 1863 and promoted the passage of the Thirteenth Amendment to the Constitution.Second only to the number of times Washington has been appeared on the face U.S. Postage, Abraham Lincoln appears on U.S. Postage more than all the remaining other presidents. (* The first Postage stamp to honor Abraham Lincoln was issued on April 14, 1866, one year to the day after his death in 1865, displayed above. The engraving of this image was modeled after a photograph taken by Brady.* The 90c issue of 1869 displays an engraving of Lincoln that was fashioned after the same photograph taken by Mathew Brady used to model for the 1866 issue. A total of only 47,460 stamps were printed by the Bank Note Company.* The 6c 1870 issue depicts an engraving of Lincoln that was modeled after a sculpture by Lenoard Wells Volk.(* There are several other prominent artists behind the designs of Lincoln stamps. The 1890 Issue was printed by the Bank Note Company. Alfred Jones engraved the portrait modeling it after a photo of Lincoln taken by Mathew Brady, arguably the most important photographer of the Civil War era. Among the most notable postage stamp designer-artists is Aburey Huston who designed the Bureau stamps using an existing engraving for the vignette.* The 4c issue of 1898 was engraved by F.C. Smillie, an engraver at the of Engraving and Printing, who had made the earlier engraving in 1898. Smillie also based his work on a photograph of Lincoln taken in 1864 by Brady.* The 5-cent blue stamp was designed by R. Ostrander Smith. The engraving was done by Marcus W. Baldwin also taken from the photograph by Mathew Brady.((* The 2-cent Lincoln stamp of 1909 had the same dimensions as a definitive stamp, but it was the first US single stamp commemorative issue.  Lincoln had appeared on at least one denomination of every regular issue since 1866. When the definitive issues of 1908 featured only the portraits of Washington and Franklin, there was considerable public disappointment. The 100th anniversary issue of Lincolns birth created an opportunity to correct the situation. The engraving of Lincoln on this issue is modeled after a statue by sculptor Saint-Gaudens.* The 3c issues of 1923, 1925 and 1927 depict Abraham Lincoln. Aubrey Houston designed the stamp using an existing engraving of Lincoln used by the Bureau in 1894 for the vignette. George Smillie, an engraver at the Bureau of Engraving and Printing, had made the earlier engraving in 1898. Smillie based his work on a photograph of Lincoln taken in 1864 by Brady.( The issued was first released on Lincolns birthday, February 12, 1923, in Washington, D.C., and in Hodgenville, Kentucky, near Lincolns birthplace.(* Oddly enough, Abraham Lincoln is the only American President to ever appear on the face of a US Airmail Postage stamp, first issued on April 22, 1960 in San Francisco, California.(Scotts Specialized Catalogue of United States Stamps - Air Post Stamps)* Lincoln appears on the 16c issue of the 1938 Presidential Series. A bust displayed in the Senate Gallery, sculpted by Sarah Fisher Ames, was the model that inspired Lincolns likeness on the engraving for this issue.(  First issued in Washington DC on October 20, 1938.* On November 17, 1965 the US Post Office issued the 4-cent black stamp featuring Lincolns profile with the log cabin background, first issued in New York City. It is the first issue among the Prominent Americans series. Though Lincoln had very little formal education, his speeches and writings are today considered masterpieces. This is the theme of the design with the log-cabin which has become synonymous with Lincolns humble beginnings. The engraving for this issue was modeled after a photo taken by famous Civil War photographer Brady.(Lincoln on commemorative IssuesAbraham Lincoln did not appear on a commemorative issue until the U.S. Post office issued the Chinese resistance issue in 1942.( The first president to appear on a US commemorative Postage stamp was Thomas Jefferson, displayed above. :* On July 7, 1942, the U.S. Post Office issued a 5c postage stamp commemorating the fifth anniversary of Chinese resistance to Japanese oppression as a tribute to China and its struggle  to preserve a free government. The design of this issue depicts a map of China with an image of the sun, national symbol of China, superimposed on the map. Portraits of Abraham Lincoln and Sun Yat-sen, first president of the Republic of China, are on either side of the stamp.::* On November 19, 1948, eighty-five years to the day after President Abraham Lincoln delivered his most famous speech, the US Post Office released the commemorative Gettysburg Address issue. Lincoln delivered the Gettysburg Address at the dedication of the Soldiers National Cemetery in Gettysburg, Pennsylvania, on Thursday, November 19, 1863, four and a half months after Union armies defeated those of the Confederacy at the of Gettysburg, the turn of the Civil War.~ Lincoln Sesquicentennial Issue ~The US Post Office issued a series of four commemorative stamps during 1958 and 1959 in honor of the 150th anniversary of Abraham Lincolns birth in 1809. The four stamps were modeled after various famous works of art.* The 1c green Lincoln issue was first released to the public on February 12, 1959, the 150th anniversary of Lincolns birth in 1809, in Hodgenville, Kentucky, near the place of Lincolns birth. The engraving is modeled after a painting by Healy. Robert L. Miller of the Bureau of Engraving and Printing modeled the overall stamp design. The 1-cent Lincoln stamp features the famous Beardless Lincoln portrait painted by Healy from life in 1860 in Springfield, Illinois, shortly after Lincoln was elected president.(* The 4c Lincoln-Douglas debate postage stamp was first issued on August 27, 1958 at Freeport, Illinois.  This issue was the first in the series  and was first released on the 100th anniversary of the Lincoln-Douglas debates. The engraved image is modeled after a painting by Joseph Boggs that portrays Lincoln addressing an outdoor crowd with Douglas standing behind him. Artist William K. Schrage of the Bureau of Engraving and Printing based the stamp design on work done by Ervine Metzl of York City.* The US Post Office issued the 4-cent Lincoln stamp on May 30, 1959  It was one of four Lincoln Birth Sesquicentennial commemorative stamps first issued through the Washington, DC, Post Office.  The issue features a portion of a famous statue sculpted by Chester French, which sits in the Lincoln Memorial in Washington, DC.* On February 27, 1959, the US Post Office issued the 3c Lincoln Birth Sesquicentennial commemorative stamp, the third in the series of four, first issued through the New York, New York, post office. The stamp features a sculptured bust of Lincoln by Gutzon Borglum. Done in marble in 1906, it now stands in the rotunda of the Capitol in Washington, DC.* On October 16, 1984, the US Post office issued its 20c commemorative postage stamp commemorating the theme A Nation of Readers.  The First Day Ceremony took place in Washington, DC, in the Coolidge Auditorium of the Library of Congress. The issue was designed by Bradbury Thompson of Riverside, Connecticut, who based the design on a photograph by renown Civil War photographer Brady which shows Abraham Lincoln reading from a book to his son Thomas.* The Postal Service issued a 20 stamp sheet of 32-cent Civil War stamps on June 29, 1995 in Gettysburg, Pennsylvania. Designed by Mark Hess of Katonah, New York, the stamps are the second installment of the Classic Collection. This issue depicts Lincoln with the Capitol under reconstruction in the background. Text about Lincoln is on the back this issue.* Lincoln also appears once in the AMERIPEX presidential series, 36 commemorative stamps, issued by the Post Office on May 22, 1986.~ Lincoln 200th Anniversary of birth commemorative issues ~* On February 9, 2009, the 200th anniversary of Abraham Lincolns birth, the US Post office in Springfield, Illinois, first issued a set of four commemorative issues portraying Lincoln at different periods in his life. Lincolns portrayal and stamp artwork was created by artist Mark Summers of Waterdown, Ontario, Canada.  The background depicted in the stamps are taken from famous themes, i.e. The Lincoln and Douglas debates.()Andrew JohnsonJohnson (December 29, 1808  July 31, 1875) was the 17th President of the United States serving from 1865 1869.  As a Unionist, he was the only Southern senator who didnt give up his post upon secession. Johnson was the most prominent War Democrat from the South and supported Lincolns military policies during the American Civil War of 18611865.  Following the assassination of President Abraham Lincoln, Johnson presided over the Reconstruction era of the United States in the four years following the American Civil War.* This rose-red stamp was issued on October 27, 1938. It marks the first appearance of Andrew Johnson on a postage stamp. The engraving of Johnsons profile was modeled after by a bust displayed in the Senate Gallery in Washington, DC.* Johnson also appears once in the AMERIPEX presidential series, 36 commemorative stamps, issued by the US Post Office on May 22, 1986. It is the only commemorative stamp issued in his honor to date.Ulysses S. Grant1890 Proof2-5c.jpg|thumb|~ Ulysses S. Grant ~Die proof of 1st Grant stampUlysses S. Grant, 18th president of the United States.  A national hero of the Civil War, Grant was elected president in 1868, the youngest man theretofore elected president. He was re-elected in 1872. Grant began his life long career as a soldier after graduating from the United States Military Academy in 1843. Fighting in the Mexican American War, he was a close observer of the techniques of Generals Taylor and Scott. During President Johnsons term Grant was appointed to be the Secretary of War.:S. Grant died in 1885 and did not appear on US Postage until some five years later in 1890 when the Bank Note Company first printed the postage stamps that depicted his portrait.( For a Civil War hero and a President this length of time was considerably longer than that of the first Abraham Lincoln issue of 1866, whose release was only one year after Lincolns death in 1865. ~ The first Grant postage stamps ~ Engravings were modeled after a photograph by William Kurtz* On June 2, 1890 the US Post Office issued a brown 5-cent Postage stamp honoring Ulysses S. Grant. It was the first US stamp to depict the former President and Civil War General. This issue was released exactly twenty-five years after Gen. Kirby Smiths surrender of the last major Confederate army at Galveston, Texas, on June 2, 1865. The issue was printed by the American Bank Note Company.(Grant, National Postal Museum)* On February 10, 1903 the Brant 4-cent brown stamp was issue. The design is by R. Ostrander Smith and was based on a tintype by Kurtz. The stamp was engraved by George F.C.Smillie* On May 1, 1923 the US Post Office issued an 8c definitive issue honoring Ulysses S. Grant. Aubrey Houston designed the stamp image. A photograph of Grant taken by renowned Civil War photographer Brady served as the model for Hustons vignette. The die for the vignette was engraved by Louis Schofield.* The engraved image of Ulysses S. Grant appears on the 18-cent denomination of the 1938 Presidential Series. Grants likeness was inspired by a statue by Franklin Simmons, housed in the Rotunda of the United States Capitol.(Grant on commemorative issuesFile:Ulysses S Grany 1995 Issue-32c.jpg|thumb|180px|General Grant taken from Brady photo on Commemorative Issue of 1995S. Grant while appearing on on a fair number of the regular (definitive) issues appears only three times on commemorative stamps.* Grant (along with T. Sherman and H. Sheridan) appears on the 3-cent 1937 Army Issue commemorative stamp issue, one issue out of a set of five stamps among that issue.* Grant also appears once in the AMERIPEX presidential series, 36 commemorative stamps, issued by the Post Office on May 22, 1986.* The next commemorative stamp to honor Grant was the 32-cent issue of 1995.((  Designed by Mark Hess of Katona, the image of Grant was taken from a photo by Civil War photographer Brady in June 1864 at City Point in Virginia.() The colorized photo used in the stamp design depicts Grant wearing his Union Generals uniform leaning against a post at the encampment.()Rutherford B. HayesBirchard Hayes (October 4, 1822  January 17, 1893) was the 19th President of the United States serving from March 4, 1877 to March 4, 1881. In the years before his presidency he was the Governor of Ohio for two separate terms. Serving in the Civil War as Brigadier General Hayes commanded the First Brigade of the Kanawha Division of the of West Virginia and turned back several Cconfederate advances. During his military service he was wounded on five separate incidents.* An 11c Postage stamp was issued on the 100th anniversary of Hayes birth, October 4, 1922, in Washington, D.C., and in Hayes hometown, Fremont, Ohio and was the first stamp issued in the Issues of 1922-1931. The stamp was designed by Aubrey Houston. The engraving of Hayes is modeled after a photograph taken by prominent Civil War photographer Brady. John Eissler engraved the die for the vignette.(* The likeness of Rutherford B. Hayes (18221893), the nineteenth president of the United States, appears on the 19-cent denomination of the 1938 Presidential Series. Hayess image was derived from a medal struck by George Morgan of the US Mint in Philadelphia.( This issue was first released to the public on November 10, 1938, along with the 20-cent Presidential issue of 1938. There is only one commemorative stamp honoring Hayes, released in 1986 on the AMERIPEX presidential issue.(James GarfieldAbram Garfield (November 19, 1831 September 19, 1881) was the 20th of the United States who had a distinguished military background. An assassins bullet ended his life and presidency and cut his time in office after serving only 200 days.(James Abram Garfield at A Grave)()Garfield served in the States Army as a Major General, as a member of the House of Representatives,() and as a member of the highly controversial Electoral Commission of 1876.  He was the second US President to be assassinated.()Garfield was the only sitting member of the House of Representatives to have been elected President.()Garfield is one of the few presidents to appear on a postage stamp more than the usual one or two times. The first issue to honor him was released in 1882, printed by the Bank Note Company.  The 5-cent Garfield was the second US postage stamp to honor an assassinated president within the year following his death and is also considered a mourning stamp by many. Unlike the first Lincoln issue, released after one whole year after his death the 5-cent Garfield stamp was released only seven months after his death in 1881.  The 1882 issues were the first issues produced from engravings completed by the Bank Note Company since it began producing postage stamps for the federal government. Before this time the A.B.N.C. used existing dies using slight changes to frames and portraits that were primarily the Bank Note Companys design. The re-engraved issues of 1881-1882 are an example.(~ James A. Garfield Memorial Issues ~Issues depicting Garfield released on and after 1894 were printed by the of Engraving and Printing.(  As of 2011 there is only one commemorative stamp honoring Garfield, released in 1986 on the AMERIPEX presidential issue.(~ Late 19th century Issues ~The American Bank note issues of 1890 are almost identical to the Bureau Issues that followed in 1894, with minor differences in the frame design.* American Bank Note Co.* Bureau Issues~ Early 20th century Issues ~* The Regular Issue of 1902-03 stamp was designed by R. Ostrander Smith from a photograph, and was engraved by George F. C. Smillie. It was printed on double-line watermark paper.((* The release of the 6-cents Regular Issue Garfield stamp marked the sixth time Garfield would appear on US Postage. Slated for release on Garfields birthday on November 19, a Sunday, when Post offices were closed, it was instead released on the 20th in Washington, DC, as there was no post office in Garfields hometown of Orange, Ohio at the time this issue was released.((* Garfields image on the  Presidential issue of 1938 was inspired by a medal created by the U.S. Mint. The issue was released to the public on November 10, 1938.((Chester A. ArthurAlan Arthur (October 5, 1829  November 18, 1886) served as the 21st President of the United States. As a member of the Republican Party Arthur worked as a lawyer before becoming the 20th Vice President under Garfield.  On July 2, 1881, President Garfield was mortally wounded by J. Guiteau, but Garfield did not die until September 19 of that year, at which time Arthur was sworn in as President, serving until March 4, 1885.* The engraving of Chester A. Arthur appears on the 21-cent value of the 1938 Presidential Series, first issued on November 22 of 1938. The likeness was modeled after a marble bust of Arthur by Saint-Gaudens in 1891, now displayed in the US Senate Gallery.(()* There is only one commemorative stamp issued in Arthurs honor, one stamp in a series in the AMERIPEX Presidential issue of 1986.(Grover ClevelandGrover Cleveland (March 18, 1837  June 24, 1908) was the 22nd and 24th President of the United States. Cleveland is the only president ever to have served two non-consecutive terms (18851889 and 18931897) as President and therefore is the only individual to be counted twice in the numbering of the presidents.* On March 20, 1923, the US Post Office issued the 12-cent Cleveland issue, first released both in Washington, D.C., and in Caldwell, New Jersey, Clevelands hometown. Aubrey Huston designed the stamp and John Eissler engraved the portrayal of Cleveland. The model for the engraving is listed by the Bureau of Engraving and Printing as unknown. The 12-cent Cleveland was reprinted and issued again in 1931.* Cleveland appeared on a presidential Issue released on November 22, 1938, the same day as the 21-cent Garfield stamp of that series. The engraving of Clevelands portrait was modeled after a medal struck by Charles Barber of the US Mint.(* The 22-cent Cleveland stamp was issued on May 22 of 1986 as part of a series of stamps honoring US Presidents, first issued during AMERIPEX 86, the international philatelic show held in Rosemont, Illinois. Artist Jerry Dadds of Baltimore, Maryland, designed the four sheets containing thirty-six stamps. Dadds also executed the designs in the woodcut style.Benjamin HarrisonHarrison (August 20, 1833  March 13, 1901) was the 23rd of the United States, serving one term from 1889 to 1893. Harrison was born in North Bend, Ohio, and at the age of 21 moved to Indianapolis, Indiana, where he became a involved with Indiana state politics. During the Civil War Harrison served as a Brigadier General in the of the Cumberland.  Under Benjamin Harrison and his Postmaster General Wanamaker the nations first stamps were made available and were first issued at the Columbian Exposition in Chicago, Illinois, in 1893. Wanamaker originally introduced the idea of issuing the nations first commemorative stamp to Harrison, the Congress and the U.S. Post Office. Contrary to the general opinion of Congress at the time Wanamaker predicted that stamps would generate needed revenue for the country. Shortly thereafter the nations first commemoartive stamps were issued in conjunction with the World Columbian Exposition, both of which were in commemoration of the 400th anniversary of Columbus discovery of America.  To demonstrate his confidence in the new commemorative stamp issues Wanamaker purchased $10,000 worth of stamps with his own money. Harrison was also present at the World Columbian Exposition and ceremony and delivered a speech  () where he said. In the name of the Government and of the people of the United States, I do hereby invite all the nations of the earth to take part in the commemoration of an event that is pre-eminent in human history, and of lasting interest to mankind. The exposition lasted several months and by the time it was over more than $40 million dollars had been generated in commemorative postage stamp sales alone.(() From that point onward the US Post Office would issue commemorative postage on a regular basis. Harrison appears on four regular issues and on two commemorative issues.(*  The 1902 13-cent postage stamp was the 1st issue to honor Benjamin Harrison, issued on November 18, 1902, less than two years after his death. It was the first 13-cent stamp issued by the US Post Office,( and the first of 14 stamps to be released to the public in the 1902-03 series. The stamp was designed by R. O. Smith from a photograph supplied by Mrs. Harrison. The image was engraved by Marcus W. Baldwin.* The 1926 issue of Harrison was engraved by Aubrey Houston who based the image design on the same photograph of Harrison that was used to model the 1902 stamp.* The 24-cent 1938 issue of Harrison image was inspired by a bust by A. Weinman, on view at the John Herron Art Institute.* Harrisons image on the 12-cent 1959 issue was taken from a photograph taken by Charles Parker.(* The 22-cent Harrison commemorative stamp was issued on May 22 of 1986 as part of a series of stamps honoring US Presidents, first issued during AMERIPEX 86, the international philatelic show held in Rosemont, Illinois. Artist Jerry Dadds of Baltimore, Maryland, designed the four sheets containing thirty-six stamps. Dadds also executed the designs in the woodcut style. There is only one commemorative stamp that honors Harrison.* In 2003 the US Post Office issued a 37-cent Old Glory commemorative stamp on April 3, 2003, at the Mega Stamp Show in New York, New York. The stamp was designed by Richard Sheaff. The stamp depicts a 1888 presidential campaign badge with a photograph of Benjamin Harrison at its center. (no image available yet).(Benjamin Harrison at the Smithsonian national Postal Museum) (Delta Chi -- The Delta Chi Fraternity at Coastal Carolina University )William McKinleyMcKinley Jr. (January 29, 1843  September 14, 1901) was the 25th President of the United States, and the last veteran of the Civil War to be elected to the office of the President. He was the last American president to serve in the 19th century and was the first President to serve in the 20th century. He spent much of his adult life in politics and was a six-term congressman, and was also the governor of Ohio before wining over J. Bryan for two terms in the White House (18971901). McKinley was assassinated early in his second term while attending the Exposition in Buffalo in 1901.* William McKinley appears on three Regular Issues of, 1923, 1926 and 1927, the design, color and denomination of which are the same, and on the 1938 Presidential issue, but first appeared on U. S. Postage in a commemorative issue, the Purchase series of 1904. (* McKinley was not even alive at the time of the Louisiana Purchase but is depicted on the Louisiana Purchase issue as he was the president who signed the legislation giving federal sanction to the Exposition and would have presided over the Exposition had he lived.  This issue also served as a tribute and memorial to the assassinated leader, as it came out less than than three years after his death, in what would have been nearing the end of the second term to which he was elected in 1900.(* The Issue of 1938 features McKinley on the 25-cent issue, released 1938.* The 22-cent McKinley commemorative stamp was issued on May 22 of 1986 as part of a series of stamps honoring U.S. Presidents, first issued during AMERIPEX 86, the international philatelic show held in Rosemont, Illinois. Artist Jerry Dadds of Baltimore, Maryland, designed the four sheets containing thirty-six stamps. Dadds also executed the designs in the woodcut style. It is one among only two commemorative stamps that honor this president.Theodore RooseveltRoosevelt (October 27, 1858  January 6, 1919) was the 26th President of the United States. He served as President from September 14, 1901  March 4, 1909. In 1901, President William McKinley was assassinated, and Roosevelt became president at the age of 42, taking office at the youngest age of any US President in history at that time. Roosevelt was a hero of the War and the of San Juan Hill for which received the of Honor and was the commander of the infamous Riders. He negotiated an end to the War which later won him the Nobel Peace Prize.(Frederick W. Marks III, Velvet on Iron: The Diplomacy of Theodore Roosevelt (1979); Greg Russell, Theodore Roosevelts Diplomacy and the Quest for Great Power Equilibrium in Asia, Presidential Studies Quarterly 2008 38(3): 433-455)  Roosevelt was the first American to win the Nobel Peace Prize.* Aubrey Houston designed the 5c blue issue of 1922 and 1925 stamp issues (Identical except for perforations). The Roosevelt image was engraved by John Eissler, and was modeled after a photograph taken of Roosevelt by the firm of Harris & Ewing in Washington, D.C., in 1907.* The 6c issue stamp was designed by Victor S. McCloskey, Jr., and Charles R. Chickering of the of Engraving and Printing.(* Roosevelt oversaw the construction of the Canal and consequently he later appeared on two Canal Zone postage stamps, printed by the of Engraving and Printing and issued by the U.S Government administration offices in the Canal Zone for domestic mail and for outgoing mail. The first Roosevelt stamp to depict the 26th president was issued in 1949.* The 22-cent Roosevelt commemorative stamp was issued on May 22 of 1986 as part of a series of stamps honoring US Presidents, first issued during AMERIPEX 86, the international philatelic show held in Rosemont, Illinois. Artist Jerry Dadds of Baltimore, Maryland, designed the four sheets containing thirty-six stamps. Dadds also executed the designs in the woodcut style. It is the only one commemorative stamp that honors Theodore Roosevelt.* A US Canal Zone stamp honoring Roosevelt was issued in November 1958, the 100th anniversary of his birth. Theodore Roosevelt is the only American president to be honored on a Canal Zone postage stamp.(Scotts U.S. Stamp Catalogue, Canal Zone Postage)* On February 2, 1998, the USPS issued a 32 cent stamp honoring Theodore Roosevelt as part of its the Century series.William Howard TaftHoward Taft (September 15, 1857 - March 8, 1930) was the 27th President of the United States and later the 10th Chief Justice of the United States. Taft is the only person to have served in both offices. Born in 1857 in Cincinnati, Ohio, into the powerful Taft family, Taft graduated from Yale College Phi Beta Kappa in 1878,2 and from Cincinnati Law School in 1880.* The 4c Taft stamp was issued on June 4 of 1930 in Tafts hometown of Cincinnati, Ohio, less than three months after Tafts death that year on March 8. This issue of Taft is based on the same design as are the regular issues of 1925-32, designed by Aubrey Huston.  The engraving of Taft is modeled after a photograph taken by Harris & Ewing.((Harris & Ewing was a photographic service company founded in 1905 by George W. Harris (1872 - 1964) and Martha Ewing to give Washington DC a studio of photography worthy of being of service to national and worldly dignitaries for producing official and civic portraits and for photojournalism. Dr. David S. Shields)* The 50c Taft on the Presidential issue of 1932 was released on December the 8th of 1938. The engraved profile of Taft was modeled after a bust sculpted especially for the stamp..* Taft is honored on the AMERIPEX presidential issue of 1986.Woodrow WilsonWoodrow Wilson (December 28, 1856  February 3, 1924) was the 28th President of the United States. First known by the slogan he kept us out of the war, Wilson was finally pressured in to asking Congress to declare war on Germany who was attacking all US vessels at high sea.::* Less than a year after the death of Woodrow Wilson the US Post Office on December 28th 1925 issued the black, 17-cent stamp in his honor.  Issued in such a timely manner the 1925 issue can be considered a memorial to Wilson. President Wilsons widow provided the photograph which designer Aubrey Houston used for the overall stamp design and which John Eissler of the of Engraving and Printing used as the model for the engraving of Wilson.::* On August 29th 1938 the Post Office issued the 1 dollar presidential issue.  The engraved image of Wilson was modeled after a medal struck by George Morgan of the US Mint.(::* Wilson is honored on the AMERIPEX presidential series, issued in 1986.* On February 2, 1998, the USPS included a Woodrow Wilson stamp as part of its the Century series.Warren G. Hardingthumb|175px|~ Warren G. Harding ~Memorial Issue of 1923----Issued only one month after death on Sept 1, 1923 in Hardings hometown of MarionGamaliel Harding (November 2, 1865  August 2, 1923) was the 29th President of the United States, serving from 1921 until his sudden death from a heart attack in 1923. A Republican from Ohio, Harding was once an influential newspaper publisher at the Marion Daily Star in Ohio. He served in the Ohio Senate (18991903) and later as the 28th Governor of Ohio (19031905) and as a US Senator (19151921).* Hardings unexpected death prompted the issue of 1923, 2c black, unofficially referred to as the Harding memorial Issue, which Aubrey Houston managed to design in one day. The engraving of Harding was modeled after an etching by artist F. Pauling.( Amazingly the Bureau of Engraving and Printing was able to print over one and one half billion of these stamps in a three month period.(Scotts Specialized Catalogue of United States Stamps: Quantities issued)* Two years later on May 19, 1925 the Post Office issued a similar Harding stamp, using the same die used for the 1923 Harding Memorial issue and whose color this time was brown and whose denomination was now at 1-1/2 cents. This stamp was one in a series of regular issue stamps of the time.(* In 1930, at the request of the widowed Mrs. Harding, the U.S. Post Office Department issued a new Harding 1-1/2c issue whose full faced portrait replaced the 1-1/2c issue with his profile.(* The image of Harding also appears on the 2-dollar issue of the 1938 Presidential Series. The engraved image of Hardings likeness was modeled after a medal  struck by George Morgan of the US Mint.( Both issues with Hardings profile were also issued in imperforate form.(* Harding was also honored on the AMERIPEX commemorative stamp issue of 1986, along with all other American presidents up to and including President B. Johnson.Calvin CoolidgeCalvin Coolidge, Jr. (July 4, 1872  January 5, 1933) from Plymouth, Vermont, was the 30th President of the United States serving from 1923 to 1929. Coolidge became president upon the death of G. Harding. Coolidges inauguration was the first to be broadcast on radio. On February 22, 1924, he became the first President of the United States to deliver a political speech on radio.() Known as silent Cal for being a man of few words in private while known for being an excellent orator at the pulpit.* On November 17, 1938 the US Post Office issued the 5 dollar value of the Presidential series of that year.  Coolidge appearance on the 5-Dollar denomination was the only stamp he ever appeared on until 1986 when the Post Office releases a series of stamps, one honoring each deceased president at that time.( The model for this engraving was taken from a medal struck by John R. Sinnock of the US Mint. Among the Presidential Issues this stamp is the most difficult to find on cover.(* Coolidge along with all other presidents up to and including President L.B. Johnson is honored on the 1986 AMERIPEX commemorative issues.Up through Coolidge, every president (with the two exceptions of Monroe and McKinley) had made his first appearance on U. S. Postage in a definitive series, only later being honored by a commemorative stamp.  With subsequent presidents, the reverse is true: all have made their first appearances on commemoratives.Herbert HooverClark Hoover (August 10, 1874  October 20, 1964) was the 31st President of the United States serving from 1929 to 1933. Hoover was a professional mining engineer and author. A son of a Quaker blacksmith, Hoover brought to the Presidency a reputation for public service as a humanitarian.(White House Archives)  After World War I, Hoover had massive shipments of food sent to feed starving millions in central Europe. He also provided much needed aid to Soviet Russia in 1921 which was then plagued with famine.In spite of Hoovers many humanitarian efforts, as a president, he is ranked less than favorably among many historians for his failure to bring the country out of the great depression that beset the country in 1929, the year Hoover assumed office.* Issued on his birthday, the 5-cent commemorative issue honoring President Herbert Hoover was first placed on sale on August 10, 1965, at West Branch, Iowa, the place of Hoovers birth. The issue was released less than one year after Hoovers passing in 1964. This is the first US Postage issue Herbert Hoover has appeared on. He appears again on the AMERIPEX series issued in 1986.(Four souvenir miniature stamp sheets, with nine 22-cent stamps each, honoring deceased US presidents were first issued on May 22, 1986, during AMERIPEX 86, the international philatelic show held in Rosemont, Illinois.) of presidents issued in 1986 (* Hoover was honored on the AMERIPEX commemorative issue of 1986 along with all other presidents up to and including Johnson.Franklin D. RooseveltDelano Roosevelt (January 30, 1882  April 12, 1945) was the 32nd President of the United States and a leading figure in world events during the mid-20th century, leading the United States during a time of worldwide economic crisis and world war. FD Roosevelt was the only American president elected President for more than two terms.  He forged a durable coalition that realigned American politics for decades. In his first Hundred Days in office, beginning March 4, 1933, Roosevelt launched a variety of major social programs. In his first term (193336), FDR led Congress to enact the New Deal, a large, complex interlocking set of programs designed to produce social and economic relief.* The 6c issue of 1966 was designed by Richard Lyon Clark and was modeled after a photograph of the Roosevelt taken with Winston Churchill during the signing of the Atlantic Charter. This gray brown 6-cent sheet stamp was issued on January 28, 1966, at the Post Office in Hyde Park, New York, the same town where the family home is located.* On January 30, 1982 on the 100th anniversary of his birth a 20-cent commemorative stamp honoring Franklin Delano Roosevelt was issued, first released to the public at his birthplace, Hyde Park, New York. The First Day of Issue ceremony was held at the Roosevelt estate, where he and his wife, Eleanor, are buried.* On September 10, 1998 a 32-cent commemorative was issued in Roosevelts honor. The issue depicts Roosevelt at a microphone during one of his fireside chats which the President was famous for.Only two months after Roosevelts passing the US Post Office issued a series of four commemorative (or memorial) Postage stamps in honor and memory of the passing President.* The 1-cent green Franklin D. Roosevelt memorial stamp was issued on July 26, 1945, at the Post Office at Hyde Park, New York. The design depicts an image of the Roosevelt home in Hyde Park, New York.* The 2c red was issued on August 24, 1945, in Warm Springs, Georgia, the site of Roosevelts favorite retreat, known as the Little White House.* Of the four issues in the Franklin memorial series it was the 3c value that was actually the first to be released. The 3c purple Franklin D. Roosevelt memorial stamp was issued on June 27, 1945. The design features the White House in the background.* The 5c blue issue is the last of the Roosevelt memorial series, issued on January 30, 1946. The design depicts a portrait of Roosevelt and on the left surrounded by clouds, a globe showing the Americas on the right. Inscribed across the globe is an expression of the Four Freedoms  Freedom of Speech and Religion, From Want and Fear.* Roosevelt was honored on the AMERIPEX commemorative stamp issue of 1986 along with all other presidents up to and including Johnson.Harry S. TrumanS. Truman (May 8, 1884  December 26, 1972) was the 33rd President of the United States serving from 1945 to 1953. As President Franklin D. Roosevelts third vice-president and the 34th Vice President of the United States, he succeeded to the presidency on April 12, 1945, when President Roosevelt died less than three months after beginning his historic fourth term. Truman began his political career in politics as a county judge in 1922. He was Franklin D. Roosevelts running mate in 1944.* The 8-cent Harry S. Truman postage stamp was designed by Bradbury Thompson and first placed on sale at the Post Office at Independence, Missouri, on May 8, 1973.* The 20-cent Truman definitive stamp was issued on January 26, 1984, in Washington, DC. The 1984 stamp issue honored the centennial of the birth of the 33rd US president in 1884.* Truman along with all other presidents up to and including President L.B. Johnson, were honored on the AMERIPEX commemorative stamp issue of 1986.*On September 2, 1995, the USPS issued a 29 cent stamp showing Truman announcing Japans surrender as part of its World War II 50th anniversary series.* Truman was depicted on a 32 cent stamp issued on February 18, 1999 as part of the the Century series.Dwight D. EisenhowerDavid Eisenhower (October 14, 1890 &ndash; March 28, 1969) was a five-star general in the United States Army and the 34th President of the United States, serving from 1953 until 1961. During World War II, he served as Supreme Commander of the Allied forces in Europe and planned the successful invasion of France and Germany in 194445, from the Western Front. In 1951, he became the first supreme commander of NATO.* On August 6, 1970 the Post Office began releasing the Regular issues of 1970 &ndash; 1974. President Eisenhower is depicted on the 6c denomination of these issues.(* On May 16, 1971 the domestic first-class letter rate increased to eight cents so the BEPthe 6-cent Eisenhower stamp was re-engraved with the new 8-cent denomination. The stamp was issued in sheet, coil, and booklet formats. The red and black stamp was the first and only multicolored stamp of the Prominent American Issue. The coil and booklet issues were mono-colored claret stamps printed on the Huck/Cottrell web mono-color intaglio presses.(  Two varieties exist, one with a dot between Eisenhower and USA and one without.  Both were issued in large numbers.* In 1969 the US Post Office issued a 6-cent commemorative stamp honoring President Dwight D. Eisenhower and was first placed on sale on October 14 of that year at Abilene, Kansas, where he spent his youth and where he is buried.  Uncommonly larger than the standard commemorative sizes of 1-1/2 x 1  this issues size was 2 x 1-1/4.  The Eisenhower commemorative issue was designed by Robert J. Jones of the of Engraving and Printing and was fashioned after a photograph taken by Bernie Noble of the Cleveland Press.* The US Post Office issued a 25c stamp on October 13, 1990, in Abilene, Kansas whose image is taken from the official White House portrait, while the background depicts then General Eisenhower speaking to Allied troops on the eve of D-Day, the Normandy invasion in 1944. The stamp was designed by Ken Hodges of the Bank Note Company (* Eisenhower along with all other presidents up to and including President L.B. Johnson, were honored on the AMERIPEX commemorative issue of 1986.John F. KennedyFitzgerald Kennedy was the 35th President of the United States, serving from 1961 until his assassination in 1963 on November 22. Few American Presidents have quotes that are remembered long after their deaths, and Kennedy was among those few for saying to the nation, Ask not what your country can do for you; ask what you can do for your country.  He was the second-youngest President (after Roosevelt). Kennedy was faced with a number of important events during his term as President which include the Missile Crisis, the of Pigs Invasion, the Race and the  Wall crisis. Kennedy appears on two postage issues, one a commemorative, issued in 1964 the other a regular issue of 1967.* On May 29, 1964, the US Post Office released the 5c John F. Kennedy memorial stamp on what would have been Kennedys 47th birthday. The issue was designed by Raymond Loewy/William Snaith, a New York firm, based on a sketch by the of Engraving and Printing artist Robert L. Miller. Mrs. Jacqueline Kennedy made the final selection from the many postage stamp designs that were submitted.(* The 13 cent issue of 1967 was first issued in Brookline, Massachusetts, on May 29 of that year. The issue was designed by Stevan Dohanos, modeled after a photograph by Jacques Loew in the book The Kennedy Years. The 13-cent Kennedy stamp paid the rates for both foreign surface letters and air postcards.Lyndon B. JohnsonB. Johnson (August 27, 1908 &ndash; January 22, 1973), served as vice-president during the Kennedy administration. When Kennedy was assassinated in Dallas, Texas, on November 22, 1963, Johnson assumed the presidency. He won re-election in 1964 with 61 percent of the vote and served until January 20, 1969.::* On August 27th of 1973 the US Post Office issued the 8-cent Lyndon B. Johnson memorial postage stamp, first placed on sale at the Post Office in Austin, Texas,   The stamp was designed by Bradbury Thompson.::* Johnsons last appearance (to date) on a US Postage stamp occurred in 1986 where he is honored on one of a series of stamps called the AMERIPEX issues of 1986. The Post Office declined to commemorate his centennial in 2008. Richard M. NixonMilhous Nixon, (January 9, 1913  April 22, 1994) was the thirty-seventh president of the United States. Nixons political career started as a California congressman. He was Dwight D. Eisenhowers vice president for two terms and was defeated in 1960 by John F. Kennedy for the presidential election. In 1968, Nixon won the presidency and was overwhelmingly re-elected in 1972. Nixon was the only person to be elected twice to both the Presidency and the Vice Presidency. He was also the only US President to resign the office.  Nixon was instrumental in ending U.S. involvement in the Vietnam War and establishing U.S. relations with communist China.* On April 26, 1995, one year and four days after his death the US Postal Service honored Richard Nixon with the issuance of a 32-cent commemorative stamp, first released in Yorba Linda, California, the place of his birth, to date the only stamp depicting Nixon. The issue was designed by Daniel Schwarz, and printed in combination offset-intaglio process by the Corporation of America.(Gerald FordRudolph Ford, Jr. (born Leslie Lynch King, Jr.; July 14, 1913 - December 26, 2006) was the 38th President of the United States, serving from 1974 to 1977, and the 40th Vice President of the United States serving from 1973 to 1974. Ford was the first person appointed to the vice-presidency under the terms of the 25th Amendment, filling the vacancy left by Agnew. He became President upon Richard Nixons resignation on August 9, 1974,.::::::* Gerald Ford Memorial Commemorative issued August 31, 2007. Ronald ReaganRonald Wilson Reagan, born February 6, 1911, died June 5, 2004. Reagan was the 40th President of the United States and served two terms from 1981 to 1989, and the 33rd Governor of California (19671975). Born in  Tampico, Illinois. Among other things, Reagan is remembered for saying on June 12, 1987.. Mr. Gorbachev, tear down this wall!* The U.S. Postal Service issued a 37-cent Ronald Reagan commemorative stamp on February 9, 2005. The first day of issue occurred in Valley, California. Stamp design is by Howard E. Paine,  Delaplane, Virginia. The image of Reagan was modeled after a portrait painted by award-winning artist Michael J. Deas.(  However, on June 14, 2006, the stamp was reissued with a 39-cent valuation to match the new first-class postage rate.(U.S. Postal Service Reissues President Ronald Reagan Stamp in 39 Cent Denomination)* To mark the centennial of Reagans birth in 2011, the U.S. Postal Service issued a commemorative stamp to be officially released at the Presidential Library in Simi Valley on Feb. 10, 2011, four days after the 100th anniversary of Reagans birth on February 6. Texas artist Forbes created the portrait, based on a 1985 photograph of Reagan taken at Reagans ranch, del Cielo, near  Santa Barbara.()AMERIPEX issues of 1986:On May 22nd of 1986 the US Post Office released a series of stamps with a portrait of a past US President inscribed upon each one. The series of 36 stamps were issued in four separate mini-sheets, with nine stamps to the sheet, each stamp having a denomination of 22 cents. Several of the issues honor presidents who had never appeared on a US stamp before. On sheet IV the stamp in the middle depicts the White House entrance.( See also * Issues* Washington-Franklins chart* Regular Issues of 1922-1931* George Washington on stamps* Benjamin Franklin on stamps* Abraham Lincoln on stamps* Stuart* Washington Bicentennial* Series* Issue* Americans series* Issue* of Presidents of the United States* Fathers of the United States* stamps and postal history of the United States* stamps and postal history of the Confederate States* Americans series* Washington on official War Dept stamp, 1873 issueReferences(External links* American Topical Association* Smithsonian National Postal Museum Winton M. Blount, Postal History Symposium, Post Civil War Nationalismand the Designs of United States Stamps in the Nineteenth Century* STAMPDATA* LearnAboutStamps.com A resource for stamp collectors* Topical worldwide stamps catalog
27727862
Nizhny_Kuranakh
Nizhny Kuranakh () is an settlement in the Republic, Russia.  In 2007, the town had a population of 6592.HistoryThe town was first settled in the 1920s, when gold was discovered and mining activities began. It received urban-type settlement status in 1950.(Terrus.ru) The town has two smaller satellite settlements, Verkhny Kuranakh and Yakokit.InfrastructureThe town is located on the Yakutsk Mainline, between the larger towns of Aldan and Tommot.  Employment is centred mainly on the open-cut gold mine near the town.  Mining company Aldanzoloto maintains its head offices in the settlement and employs around 80% of the towns workforce.(Corporate Social Responsibility in the Mining Industries (Natalia Yakovleva), Ashgate Publishing Company, 2005.)References
27747759
William_Kovach
William August Kovach (January 30, 1909 - August 4, 1966) was a miner, construction worker, trapper, taxi driver, rancher, trucker, salesman and a provincial politician from Alberta, Canada. He served as a member of the Assembly of Alberta from 1948 until his death in 1966 sitting with the Social Credit caucus in government.Early lifeWilliam August Kovach was born on January 30, 1909 in the town of Passburg, Alberta, which became part of the Crowsnest Pass municipality. After completing grade school in Passburg he went to work on various construction crews working on grading for railways and highways in southern Alberta and Saskatchewan.(Kovach changed jobs in 1926, he started working for a coal mine in Bellevue, Alberta. He left the mines to become a prospector. Kovach supplemented his income by driving a taxi, and trapping animals for fur.( Kovach began working at the Hillcrest-Mowhawk Mines in Hillcrest, Alberta. He became a part time recording secretary for the Mine Workers. Kovach continued working as a prospector, ending up with West Canadian Collieries. He left the mining business in 1947 to found a trucking company, raise live stock on his ranch and sell insurance.(Political careerKovach ran for a seat to the Alberta Legislature in the 1948 Alberta general election. He stood as the Social Credit candidate in the electoral district of Creek-Crowsnest. The race was hotly contested, with Kovach winning on the third vote count to hold the seat for his party.()Kovach ran for a second term in office in the 1952 Alberta general election. He would fight a two way race against Liberal candidate Thomas Costigan and win easily with a landslide majority to hold his seat.()Kovach ran for a third term in the 1955 Alberta general election. He would face two other candidates including H. Ferguson  a jointly nominated candidate from the Liberals and Progressive Conservatives. Kovach would lose some of his popular vote, but still held his seat easily.()The 1959 Alberta general election would see Kovach run for his fourth term in office. He defeated two other candidates with a landslide majority to return to office.()Kovach ran for re-election to his fifth term in the 1963 Alberta general election. He lost a significant portion of his vote share from the last election, but held on to the district with a clear majority against the three other candidates.()Kovach died on August 4, 1966 from a heart seizure while on a fishing trip at Lost Creek.()ReferencesExternal links*Legislative Assembly of Alberta Members Listing
27771130
African_Barrick_Gold
 footnotes African Barrick Gold plc () is a gold mining business operating in Tanzania. It is listed on the Stock Exchange and is a constituent of the 250 Index.HistoryThe business was established as a unit of Gold when that company started mining in Tanzania in 2000.(African Barrick Gold Targets Sh1.3 Trillion in Initial Public Offer (IPO) The Citizen, 25 February 2010) It was floated off by Barrick Gold and first listed on the Stock Exchange in 2010.(African Barrick Gold floats at bottom of price range Times, 19 March 2010)Barricks involvement in Tanzania begun in 1999, when the company purchased the Bulyanhulu property as part of its acquisition of Sutton Resources Ltd. Barrick then acquired Buzwagi and  Tulawaka as part of its acquisition of Pangea Goldfields Inc. in 2000. Finally, in 2006, Barrick acquired North Mara, when it took over Dome.(Overview / Profile&categoryChosenHistory of ABG ABG African Barrick Gold website: History accessed: 24 July 2010)In the financial year 2009, the ABGs four operations produced a combined amount of 716,000 attributable ounces of gold, a 31.5% increase from 2008.((African Barrick Gold Weakens on Debut Wall Street Journal, published: 19 March 2010, accessed: 24 July 2010)OperationsThe Company operates four mines in northwest TanzaniaBulyanhulu, Buzwagi, North Mara and Tulawaka.( (African Barrick Gold website accessed: 22 July 2010)Bulyanhulu Gold MineThe Bulyanhulu Gold Mine is an underground gold mine in the Region of Tanzania, located 55 kilometres south of Victoria.(African Barrick Gold website: Bulyanhulu Gold Mine accessed: 22 July 2010) Barrick acquired the project in 1999 when it purchased Sutton Resources and the mine opened in 2001.() In the financial year 2009, Bulyanhulu produced 249,000 ounces of gold at a cash cost of US$651 per ounce.(   The opeing of Bulyanhulu, Tanzanias deepest mine, made Tanzania the third largest producer of gold in Africa.()Buzwagi Gold MineThe Buzwagi Gold Mine is an open pit gold mine in the Shinyanga Region of Tanzania, located 6 kilometres southeast from the town of Kahama. The mine, which opened in 2009, is the second largest mining operation and the largest single open pit mine in Tanzania. In the financial year 2009, Buzwagi produced 189,000 ounces of gold at a cash cost of US$422 per ounce.(African Barrick Gold website: Buzwagi Gold Mine accessed: 22 July 2010)North Mara Gold MineThe North Mara Gold Mine is an open pit gold mine in the District of the Region of Tanzania. The mine, which opened in 2002, was acquired by Barrick through the takeover of Dome in 2006. In the financial year 2009, North Mara produced 212,000 ounces of gold at a cash cost of US$508 per ounce.(Mara African Barrick Gold website: North Mara Gold Mine accessed: 22 July 2010)Tulawaka mineThe Tulawaka Gold Mine is a combined underground and open pit gold mine located in the Biharamulo district, in the Region of Tanzania. African Barrick Gold ownes 70% of the mine, while the remaining 30% are owned by Northern Mining Exploration Ltd. The mine opened in 2005. In the financial year 2009, Tulawaka produced 94,000 ounces of gold, 66,000 of which are attributable to ABG, at a cash cost of US$413 per ounce.(African Barrick Gold website: Tulawaka Gold Mine accessed: 22 July 2010)ReferencesExternal links* Barrick website* African Barrick Gold website
27794233
Zementis_Inc
The Zementis NameThe name Zementis, symbolizing concrete thoughts, is derived from the German word Zement (cement, concrete) and the Latin word Mentis (thought, intellect) and relates to the companys core competence in machine learning and AI.The Road to ADAPAFounded in 2004 with the goal of providing analytics to the marketplace, Zementis is composed of two main divisions, analytics and engineering. Although it started as a company focused on building predictive models, Zementis scientists soon realized that their models needed a platform in which they could be easily deployed and managed. From this need, the ADAPA Decision Engine came to be.ADAPA initially supported only networks, but it soon became a platform for the deployment of a myriad of statistical techniques as well as data processing. From its inception, ADAPA has been based on open-standards, including PMML, the Predictive Model Markup Language. As a member of the Data Mining Group (DMG), the committee defining PMML, Zementis has helped shaped the standard as it becomes the necessary vehicle for the sharing of predictive solutions between applications.In 2008, ADAPA was launched as a service on the Elastic Compute Cloud and is currently being used worldwide by companies and individuals who want to execute their predictive models and decision logic.In 2011, building on the heritage of its ADAPA Decision Engine, Zementis launched the Universal PMML Plug-in, a highly optimized, in-database scoring enginefor predictive models, fully supporting the PMML standard. With PMML, the Plug-in delivers a wide range ofpredictive analytics for high performance scoring. It shortens time to market for predictive models and empowersusers through instant deployment of predictive models.Zementis is a privately held company with offices in the USA and in Asia.Zementis LocationsZementis HQ is located in San Diego in California. It also has an office in Hong Kong for servicing clients in the Asia-Pacific region.See also* ADAPA* mining* analytics* PMMLReferences* R. Nisbet, J. Elder, and G. Miner. Handbook of Statistical Analysis and Data Mining Applications. Academic Press, 2009.* A. Guazzelli, M. Zeller, W. Lin, and G. Williams. PMML: An Open Standard for Sharing Models. The R Journal, Volume 1/1, May 2009.* A. Guazzelli, K. Stathatos, M. Zeller. Efficient Deployment of Predictive Analytics through Open Standards and Cloud Computing. The ACM SIGKDD Explorations Newsletter, Volume 11/1, July 2009.* A. Guazzelli, T. Jena, W. Lin, M. Zeller. The PMML Path Towards True Interoperability in Data Mining. In Proceedings of the 17th ACM SIGKDD Conference on Knowledge Discovery and Data Mining, August 2011.* A. Guazzelli, W. Lin, T. Jena (2010). PMML in Action: Unleashing the Power of Open Standards for Data Mining and Predictive Analytics. CreateSpace.External links* Zementis Web site www.zementis.com* DMG Web Site www.dmg.org
27809640
Cold_Lake_oil_sands
 currentproductionoil The Cold Lake oil sands are a large deposit of sands (also pejoravtively known as tar sands) located near Lake, Alberta.()()()()()Cold Lake is east of Albertas capital, Edmonton, near Albertas border with Saskatchewan, and a small portion of the Cold Lake field lies in Saskatchewan.In 1980 a plant in Cold Lake was one of just two oil sands plants under construction in Alberta.(In 1980 Canadas federal government was considering dropping its assistance in the development of Albertas oil sand in favor of offshore oil deposits east of and Labrador.Some of the oil sands in the Cold Lake deposit have a low enough density that they can be extracted through drilling, as opposed to mining.()See also* oil sands* River oil sands* Island oil sands* oil sandsReferences(
27828829
Gillard_Government
website           Prime Ministers websiteParliamentary websiteALP websiteThe Gillard Government refers to the federal Executive Government of Australia, which is led by the Minister of Australia Gillard. Gillard became Prime Minister on the 24th of June 2010 after challenging her predecessor, Rudd for the position of leader of the parliamentary Labor Party, thus bringing to a close the former Rudd Labor Government. In so doing, Gillard became the first female prime minister of Australia and selected the Gillard Ministry, shortly thereafter calling an election for August 2010.Prime Minister Gillard led the Labor Party to the 2010 election against the Opposition Liberal-National Coalition led by Abbott. The election resulted in a parliament. Following negotiations with six crossbench MPs, Gillard was able to obtain support from three independents in relation and supply and signed a formal agreement with the Greens. Governor-General Bryce swore in the Gillard Ministry on 14 September 2010, allowing Gillard and Labor to remain in power with a 76-74 minority government.()(Labor day: Gillard retains grip on power  ABC  Emma Rodgers (7 September 2010). Retrieved 8 September 2010.)()BackgroundFirst Gillard GovernmentOn 23 June 2010, Rudd called a press conference announcing that a leadership ballot of the Labor Party would occur on the morning of 24 June 2010, with the candidates being himself and Deputy Prime Minister Gillard.() This followed weeks of speculation that senior members of the ALP were beginning to lose confidence in Rudd and would back Gillard in replacing him if necessary.  By the eve of the election, it was obvious that Rudd didnt have enough support to remain ALP leader and Prime Minister.  Rudd withdrew his candidacy and resigned as party leader, leaving Gillard to take the leadership unopposed.  Gillard was then sworn in as Australias first female Prime Minister on 24 June 2010, with Treasurer Swan being appointed Deputy Prime Minister.()In her first press conference as Prime Minister, Gillard said a good government had lost its way and she had a responsibility to step up and make sure it got back on track.()In the aftermath of the leadership challenge, Shorten,  former trade union leader, and key Parliamentary member of the ALP Right Faction, nominated the governments handling of the insulation program; the sudden announcement of change of policy on the Pollution Reduction Scheme; and the way in which they had introduced the debate about the Super Profits Tax as the key considerations which had led to a shift in support from Kevin Rudd to Julia Gillard as leader of the party.()2010 Federal ElectionOn 17 July 2010, 23 days after becoming prime minister and after receiving the agreement of the Governor-General Bryce, Gillard announced the next federal election for 21 August 2010.() Gillard began campaigning with a speech utilising the slogan moving forward.(Gillard defends moving forward mantra - ABC News (Australian Broadcasting Corporation)) In the early stages of the campaign, a series of leaks were released by purported Labor Party sources, indicating apparent divisions within Cabinet over the replacement of Kevin Rudd by Gillard.(AM - Gillard confronts questions over deal with Rudd 16/07/2010) Mid-way through the campaign, Gillard offered journalists a self-assessment of her campaign by saying that she had been paying too much attention to advisers in her strategy team, and she wanted to run a less stage-managed campaign, saying: I think its time for me to make sure that the real Julia is well and truly on display, so Im going to step up and take personal charge of what we do in the campaign from this point:(Julia Gillard ditches campaign script for the real Julia but admits tactic is risky | Courier Mail)Gillard met Opposition leader Abbott for one official debate during the campaign. Studio audience surveys by Channel 9 and the Network suggested a win to Gillard.() Unable to agree on further debates, the leaders went on to appear separately on stage for questioning at community forums in Sydney and Brisbane. An audience exit poll of the Rooty Hill RSL audience indicated an Abbott victory.(Collerton, Sarah. (12 August 2010) Abbott named peoples choice at Rooty Hill - ABC News (Australian Broadcasting Corporation). Abc.net.au. Retrieved on 15 October 2010.) Gillard won the audience poll at the Broncos Leagues Club meeting in Brisbane on 18 August.(Undecided Voters Question Abbott And Gillard In Brisbane. Brisbanetimes.com.au (19 August 2010). Retrieved on 15 October 2010.) Gillard also appeared on the ABCs Q&A program on 9 August.(Gillard Joins Q&A | ABC TV. Abc.net.au (9 August 2010). Retrieved on 25 February 2011.) On 7 August, Gillard was questioned by former Labor leader turned Channel Nine reporter Latham.(Mark Latham confronts Gillard : World News Australia on SBS)Gillard officially launched Labors campaign in Brisbane five days before polling day, outlining Labor policies and utilising the slogan: Yes we will move forward together.()Labor and the Coalition each won 72 seats(The Party of Western Australia is not a part of the Liberal/National Coalition. Therefore, its figures, including MP Tony Crook, are counted separately from the Coalition totals. See federal election, 2010 for more details.) in the 150-seat House of Representatives,() four short of the requirement for government, resulting in the first parliament since the 1940 election.()() Both major party leaders sought to form a government.()()()()()()Six crossbench MPs held the balance of power.(Stephanie Peatling and Heath Aston: Its good to be Greens, as balance of power tipped, in SMH, 18 July 2010. Retrieved 19 August 2010.)(Sid Maher: Greens set to grab balance of power in The Australian, 18 July 2010. Retrieved 19 August 2010.) Four crossbench MPs, Greens Bandt and independents Wilkie, Oakeshott and Windsor declared their support for Labor on and supply,(() allowing Gillard and Labor to remain in power with a 76-74 minority government.( Governor-General Bryce swore in the Gillard Ministry on 14 September 2010.()PoliciesPublic RelationsTransparencyThe Gillard Government has made extensive use of the internet and social media in its bid to spread the message of government activity, and to make more people aware of what the federal government is doing. The official website of the Prime Minister, www.pm.gov.au, frequently update content such as photographs, videos, blog entries, and other information. In 2011 the Office of the Prime Minister launched an official YouTube channel, not politically associated with the Labor Partys channel.In a further effort to expand the Prime Ministers public relations, the government has also launched and frequently updated accounts with a multitude of social networking websites, such as Facebook, Myspace, and Twitter. An official Flickr profile is also maintained.EnvironmentClimate changeIn her 2010 election campaign, Gillard pledged to build a national consensus for a carbon price by creating a citizens assembly, to examine the evidence on climate change, the case for action and the possible consequences of introducing a market-based approach to limiting and reducing carbon emissions, over the course of one year. The assembly was to be selected by an independent authority who would select people from the electoral roll using census data.() The plan was  never implemented. After the 2010 Election, Gillard agreed to form a minority government with the Greens and replaced her citizens assembly plan with a climate change panel.(Gillard PM dumps citizens assembly as Labor, Greens strike alliance deal | The Australian) The Cleaner Car rebate, also known as the Cash for Clunkers scheme, was also introduced after the general elections. Although after the Queensland floods, the $429 million scheme was scrapped, in order to divert money to help rebuild Queensland.(Wheels fall off cash for clunkers - Local News - News - General - Central Western Daily)Carbon priceA day before the 2010 Election, the Australian newspaper reported an interview with Gillard in which she said: I dont rule out the possibility of legislating a Carbon Pollution Reduction Scheme, a market-based mechanism, the next parliament I rule out a carbon tax.(Julia Gillards carbon price promise | The Australian) On the 7 August, Julia Gillard told News There will be no carbon tax under the government I lead. On Treasurer Swan also repeatedly ruled out the introduction of a carbon tax, telling ABC television on We have made our position very clear, we have ruled it out.()On 24 February 2011, in a joint press conference of the Climate Change Committee - comprising the government, Greens and independents Tony Windsor and Rob Oakeshott  Gillard announced a plan to implement a fixed price to be imposed on carbon pollution from 1 July 2012(Australia to have carbon price from July 1, 2012, Julia Gillard announces | The Australian)  The carbon tax would be placed for three to five years before a full emissions trading scheme is implemented, under a blueprint agreed by a multi-party parliamentary committee.(Carbon price to begin from July 2012: Midday roundup) Key issues remained to be negotiated between the Government and the cross-benches, including compensation arrangements for households and businesses, the carbon price level, the emissions reduction target and whether or not to include fuel in the tax.(PM ready for fight on carbon tax as Abbott vows peoples revolt | The Australian) Independent MP Windsor stated that his presence at the conference should not be construed as endorsement of the plan.(In August 2010, just prior to the election, Prime Minister Gillard stated to Channel 10 news There will be no carbon tax under the government I lead,.(http://news.ninemsn.com.au/national/election2010/7945914/pm-says-no-carbon-tax-under-her-govt) These sentiments were also backed prior to the election by Wayne Swan, the treasurer and deputy Prime Minister, also in August 2010, Well, certainly what we rejected is this hysterical allegation that somehow we are moving towards a carbon tax from the Liberals in their advertising.  We reject that..(Australian Labor News - Lets move Australia forward) This seemed to have been a long running position of the Labor party, as early as February 2008 a statement made by Penny Wong, the then minister for Climate Change and Water said, There is no point in imposing a carbon price domestically which results in emissions and production transferring internationally for no environmental gain.(A green light for big polluters | Herald Sun) Gillard indicated that the promise was broken by changed circumstances, implying the unexpectedly hung parliament.(Yes, I vowed no carbon tax - Julia Gillard | News.com.au)The governments top climate advisor, Professor Garnaut, has agreed that a price on carbon will benefit Australia.(Carbon price to benefit Tasmania: Garnaut - Business (Australian Broadcasting Corporation)) Energy Minister Ferguson challenged some assertions by Garnaut and said that he did not speak for the government.(Labor at war with Ross Garnaut | The Australian)Tasmanian Forest DealA $274 million government package ending the logging of native forests was agreed on with the Tasmanian Government, which has full backing of industry, but criticise by the Greens.(Tasmania in $274m forests deal)CommunicationNational Broadband NetworkContinuing Rudds promise in 2007, the construction of the Broadband Network is ongoing. In November 2010, the first major implementation of the construction was when senators, voted 30 to 28, to separate the retail and commercial arms of former state monopoly Telstra, to increase competition as its infrastructure is incorporated in the new network.() In February 2011, the NBN rollout came closer with a commercial agreement, which paved the way for the NBN Co to use Telstras assets and for Telstra to phase out its copper network.()The network has been tested in several locations in Tasmania and in May 2011, the network was launched on the mainland in Armidale, South Wales, the first of five sites on the mainland.(Mainland launch for broadband network) Initial take up of the service has been tiny(Communications Minister happy with tiny take-up of NBN service | The Australian)Transition to digital televisionThe Gillard Government is continuing the national transition from analog to digital television, which was launched in 2008 by Minister Conroy. The incumbent government continues to run the Get Ready for Digital TV campaign, which encourages Australians to buy either a box or a television. The transition is expected to be completed by the end of 2013.()Economyleft|thumb|200px|Wayne Swan, Deputy Prime Minister and TreasurerMining TaxAfter becoming Prime Minister, Gillard halted advertisement that attacked the big miners for their super profits, which began when Rudd introduced the Resource Rent Tax. Gillard revised the tax and it was negotiated between the miners, which would collected $7.4 billion over two years instead of Rudds original mining tax, which would have collected $12 billion.()Flood levyAfter the devastating flood that caused widespread damage to Queensland, Gillard proposed a temporary levy that would raise $1.8 billion and take effect from 1 July 2011.() The levy would help pay for the reconstruction of roads, rail and bridges in areas damaged by the recent floods. With a government, she needed four of the six lower house crossbenchers and all of the crossbench senators, with lower house members, Tony Crook,() Katter, Wilkie and Bandt, supporting the levy.() In the Senate, all the cross benchers (Green senators, Fielding and Xenophon) supported the flood levy and passed.() In a February Newspoll, it showed that 55 per cent supported the new flood levy.(Labor takes a hit, but voters back flood levy - Newspoll | Herald Sun)EducationEducation has been a priority on Gillards agenda, with her launching the My School website while she was minister. The revamped version was later launched in March 2011.(My School launch from A to Z | The Australian)HealthIn 2010, a hospital funding scheme was drawn up by the Government, where all states and territories, except Australia, under Liberal control, agreed to give up control of a third of their GST. In November 2010, the new Liberal Government in Victoria joined Western Australia in rejecting the deal and Gillard said the old reforms would not work.() Gillard revamped the health reform package, by providing the states with $16.4 billion from July 2014 to 2020.() It scrapped a major element of the previous package which would reduce 60 per cent of the states recurrent health costs to 50 per cent and removed the former Rudd Government plans to fund 60 per cent of new hospital capital costs.() The deal was agreed on by all state premiers and chief ministers in February 2011.()Paid Parental SchemeThe scheme was passed under the Government in June 2010 and came into effect under Gillard on 1 January 2011, which paid $570 a week. According to figures released by Families Minister Macklin, 15,450 (as of 30 January 2011) have applied. There were claims when GIllard was the Deputy Prime Minister, she questioned and opposed the scheme, which she denied.(Claims Gillard opposed paid parental leave - ABC Brisbane - Australian Broadcasting Corporation)Immigration Asylum seekers After winning leadership of the Labor Party, Gillard identified addressing the issue of unauthorised arrivals of asylum seekers as a priority of her government. She announced that negotiations were underway for a return to offshore processing of asylum seeker claims. Gillard ruled out a return to processing at Nauru and named East Timor as a preferred location for new detention and processing facilities.()() The East Timorese Government rejected the plan.()In October 2010, her government announced that it would open two detention centres for 2000 immigrants, due to the pressures in allowing women and children to be released into the community. One to be opened in South Australia and one in Western Australia.() She said it would be a short-term solution to the problem and that temporary detention centres will be closed. File:Asylum seekers on the roof of Villawood Immigration Detention Centre.JPG|thumb|left|Protesters on the roof of the Immigration Detention Centre in Sydney, 2011On 15 December 2010 a ship containing 89 asylum seekers crashed on the shore of Christmas Island, killing up to fifty people. (Timeline of Christmas Island tragedy | News.com.au)(Christmas Island tragedy left more dead than alive - The West Australian) Refugee and migrant advocates condemned government policy as responsible for the tragedy,() () and ALP Party President Anna Bligh called for a complete review of ALP asylum seeker policy.() Gillard returned early from holidays in response to the crash, and to review asylum seeker policy.( There were accusations by David Marr and Tony Kevin of conspiracy surrounding the incident, suggesting that the Gillard government ignored the boat, and conducted no actions to stop it crashing so the Gillard Government could implement the Malaysia Solution.() Some months later Gillard would announce The Malaysia Solution in response.() In April 2011 the Federal Government confirmed that a detention centre for single men will be built at the old army barracks at Pontville, 45 minutes north of Hobart. This immigration detention centre will house up to 400 refugees.() Also in April 2011 immigration detainees at the Villawood detention centre rioted in protest of their treatment, setting fire to several buildings.(Buildings torched in Villawood riot)In May 2011 Gillard announced that Australia and Malaysia were finalising an arrangement to exchange asylum seekers. Gillard and Immigration Minister Bowen said they were close to signing a bilateral agreement which would result in 800 asylum seekers who arrive in Australia by boat being taken to Malaysia instead. Australia will take 4,000 people from Malaysia who have previously been assessed as being refugees.()()On 31 August the High Court ruled that the agreement to transfer refugees from Australia to Malaysia was invalid, and ordered that it not proceed. Australia will still accept 4,000 people who have been assessed as refugees in Malaysia.()()In an extraordinary attack on the judiciary, the Prime Minister Julia Gillard has turned on the High Court, questioning the consistency of Chief Justice Robert French as she grapples with the political humiliation of its rejection of her asylum-seeker Malaysia Solution. she accused the court of missing an opportunity to send a message to asylum-seekers, sparking opposition charges she has breached the doctrine of the separation of powers. ( http://www.theaustralian.com.au/national-affairs/julia-gillard-versus-the-high-court-as-the-pm-takes-aim-at-chief-justice-robert-french/story-fn59niix-1226127707674) The High Courts decision questions whether the Gillard Governments policy on asylum seekers is lawful, and whether onshore processing should be the option, phasing out controversial offshore processing.()  In response to the High Courts decison, Gillard announced that her government would be making changes to the Migration Act, giving them the power to send asylum seekers to any third-world country, including Malaysia. The plan has been strongly condemned by refugee advocates, including the Greens.CabinetWhen Gillard was sworn in as Prime Minister in June, most members of the cabinet remained in their places, as they were sworn in during by Rudd. Slight changes occurred to fill her positions which were left vacant when she became Prime Minister. After the general elections, she swore in her second ministry, with her predecessor becoming Foreign Minister.Foreign policyUpon becoming Prime Minister, Gillard reassured the US that Australia would continue to support the war. Although as death tolls amounted, she said that Australia remains committed to the war in Afghanistan.()Prime Minister Gillard attended the Japan 2010 summit in , where she held her first face-to-face meeting with US President Obama. Obama thanked the Prime Minister for Australias continuing assistance and contribution to the Afghanistan War. While Gillard sent her condolences to the American people and the President for the American casualties in AfghanistanGillard made her first visit to Washington as Prime Minister on 5 March 2011. She held meetings with President Obama, Secretary of State Clinton, Treasury Secretary Geithner and UN Secretary General Ki-moon. She also met with Obama and McCain.() Gillard, addressed a joint session of the States Congress, the fourth Australian leader to do and first foreign dignitary to address the 112th congress.(http://www.google.com/hostednews/ap/article/ALeqM5g0bFDQ5X_Yohtq4khywCWfr85rNA?docId9a7172398ce04b3fb0abeda7519fca89 )In April 2011, she embarked on a North Asia trip, promoting closer military, economic and trade ties. Her visit to Japan was the first by a foreign dignitary after the devastating earthquake and tsunami.() South Korea and China were also part of her trip.Gillard was the first foreign leader to address the Zealand Parliament.(Julia Gillard Addresses New Zealand Parliament - NTDTV.com)War in AfghanistanSince coming to office, Gillard has remained adamant towards her position in the Afghanistan War. The Gillard Government believes that withdrawing troops prematurely from Afghanistan, could re-establish the country as a safe haven for terrorists. On 19 October 2010 Prime Minister Gillard addressed Parliament stating her governments commitment to the war, and said Australia will stand firm in our commitment to our alliance with the United States, the international community understands this, our friends and allies understand this, and our enemies understand this too. On her first day as Prime Minister, Gillard reassured her position towards the war to President Obama of the United States.(Julia Gillard warns against Afghanistan pullout | The Australian)Prime Minister Gillard made an official visit to Afghanistan, in October 2010. There she met members of the Defence Force in Kowt, and had discussions with President Karzai. This visit was part of her first international trip as Prime Minister.()Popularity2010In her first month as Prime Minister, Gillard and her party received a popular bounce in the polls, showing Labor leading the Coalition 10 points, 55 to 45.() During the start of the election, polls pointed to a Labor victory. But during the middle of the election, several blunders, including her climate change policy, internal party leaks, contributed towards dives in her popularity. ()2011Since the announcement of carbon price mechanism, Gillards approval ratings fell, because of lack of detail on how people will be affected by the carbon tax,(Gillard gains ground in Newspoll - ABC News (Australian Broadcasting Corporation)) the 18 March Newspoll saw her governments and approval ratings increase after a tour of the States and pictures taken in the House playing football with Obama. Since March 2011 according to Newspoll more people are dissatisfied with Gillards performance, by September her net dissatisfaction has spread to 45 points.Her status to be the preferred leader since becoming Prime Minister, dropped from a leading high on 18 February 2011 of a 50 to 31, she been trailing the of the Opposition since June. Calls for her to stand down Gillard has dismissed reports of disquiet in the Labor Party about her leadership, senior Government figures say Ms Gillard has lost her authority and have urged her to weigh up whether its in Labors best interests for her to stay on as PM. (http://www.news.com.au/national/gillard-faces-revolt/story-e6frfkvr-1226127713316#ixzz1WkLxa3N1)NotesReferences
27847641
Polythematic_Structured_Subject_Heading_System
Polythematic Structured Subject Heading System (abbreviated as PSH from the Czech Polytematick Strukturovan Hesl) is a bilingual Czech-English vocabulary of subject headings developed and maintained by the National Technical Library (the former State Technical Library) in Prague. It was designed for describing and searching information resources according to their subject. PSH contains more than 13,500 terms, which cover the main fields of human knowledge. Thanks to its releasing in SKOS, PSH can be used not only for describing documents in a library, but also for indexing web pages. Everyone can use PSH for free. PSH is a part of the Linking Open Data cloud diagram (LOD cloud diagaram). The image of the LOD cloud diagram shows datasets that have been published in Data format, by contributors to the Linking Open Data community project and other individuals and organisations.thumb|right|PSH logo thumb|The Linking Open Data cloud diagram History and development The PSH preparation project started in 1993, supported by several grants from the Czech Ministry of Culture and Czech Ministry of Education, Youth and Sport. Since 1995, PSH has been used for indexing the State Technical Librarys documents. Starting 1997(KLOUKOV, Zdenka. Polytematick strukturovan hesl Sttn technick knihovny. ten. 1997, vol. 49, no. 4, p. 128-129. ISSN 0011-2321.), PSH has been distributed to other libraries and companies, originally as a commercial, paid product; since 2009(MYNARZ, Jindich; KAMRDKOV, Kateina; KOUCHOV, Kristna. Polythematic Structured Subject Heading System & Creative Commons. In Semin ke zpstupovn ed literatury online. 2008- 2010-05-28. Praha : Sttn technick knihovna, 2008.) for free. In 2000, the State Technical Library received a grant from the Ministry of Culture to translate PSH into English. The next milestone in its development was its releasing in the SKOS format, in 2009(MYNARZ, Jindich; KOUCHOV, Kristna; KAMRDKOV, Kateina. Novinky z oblasti Polytematickho strukturovanho hesle. Ikaros online. 2009, vol. 13, no. 7 2010-05-28. URN-NBN:cz-ik5591. ISSN 1212-5075.).The vast majority of new subject headings is suggested and approved by the indexing experts from the National Technical Library. However, the users and public can also make suggestions, using an online form, which are then assessed by the experts. The main decisions about the develepment and the future of PSH are done by the Committee for Coordination of Polythematic Structured Subject Heading System. The Committee consists of specialists from the National Technical Library and cooperating institutions, and representatives from the libraries and companies which use PSH. The Committee meets once a year in the National Technical Library; in the meantime, the members communicate using an mailing list.( PSH structure PSH is a structure with 44 thematic sections. Subject headings are included in a hierarchy of six (or seven) levels according to their semantic content and specificity. There are hierarchical, associative (see also) and equivalence (see) relations in PSH. Hierarchical relations are represented by broader and narrower terms (e.g. physical diagnostic methods is broader term to electrocardiography, and on the other hand, electrocardiography is narrower term to physical diagnostic methods). Equivalence relations link subject headings with their nonpreferred versions (e.g. electrocardiography and ECG). Moreover, associative relations are used to link related subject headings from different parts of PSH, regardless their affiliation to a section, (e.g. electrocardiography: see also cardiology). Every subject heading belongs to just one section, which has its own two-character abbreviation, assigned to every subject heading of the section. This enables users to recognize affiliation of subject headings from lower levels to the thematic sections. The 44 thematic sections have following root nodes: * agriculture* anthropology* architecture and town planning* art* astronomy* biology* chemistry* civil engineering* communications* computer technology* consumer industry* economic sciences* electronics* electrotechnics* food industry* generalities* geography* geology* geophysics* health services* history* informatics* information science* law* linguistics* literature* mathematics* mechanical engineering* metallurgy* military affairs* mining engineering* pedagogy* philosophy* physics* politology* power engineering* psychology* religion* science and technology* sociology* sport* theory of systems* transport* water management PSH formats The main format for storage, maintenance and sharing PSH is the MARC 21 Format for Authority Data, which is implemented in library automated systems. PSH is also available in SKOS, using RDF/XML syntax, which is a version suitable for web distribution. Single headings can be accessed on the PSH website through URI links. Alternatively, the whole vocabulary can be downloaded in one file. It is possible to display tags from PSH (metadata snippets - Core and CommonTag), which can be embedded in an HTML document to provide its semantic description in a machine-readable way. See also  *Thesaurus*of Congress Subject Headings*retrieval*Web References  External links * PSH official web page
27866507
Steel_industry_in_China
The Steel industry in China has developed over several decades into the world biggest.(http://www.chinaknowledge.com/Business/CBGdetails.aspx?subchap3&content14) China accounted for 36.4% of world steel production in 2007.(www.chinaknowledge.com) It has driven by rapid modernisation of its economy, construction, infrastructure and manufacturing industries.(HistoryThe steel industry was small and sparsely populated at the start of the twentieth century and during both world wars. Most of the steel infrastructure was destroyed during the wars, and  were using Soviet technologies. China lagged the western countries in its steel industry development even though they were using central planning techniques during the early days of communist rule.(The Library of Congress, A Country Study: China, http://lcweb2.loc.gov/frd/cs/cntoc.html)China underwent rapid economic industrialisation since Xiaopings capitalist reforms which took place nearly 3 decades ago in 1978.(chinabusinessreview.net)The steel industry gradually increased it output. Chinas annual crude steel output was 100 million in 1996.(William Thomas Hogan, 2000 The Steel Industry of China, Lexington Books,ISBN 0-7391-0081-5, 978-0-7391-0081-3, 80 pages)It produced  123 million tons of steel in 1999. After its ascension to the WTO it aggressively expanded its production for its growing appetite of manufacturing industries such as automotive vehicles, consumer electronics and building materials.(The Chinese steel industry is dominated by a number of large state-owned groups which are owned via shareholdings by local authorities, provincial governments and even the central authorities. The biggest steel groups are Baosteel, Steel Company, Iron and Steel, Anshan, Tangshan, Group and Iron and Steel.(http://www.steelonthenet.com/production.html)In 2008 raw materials such as ore prices grew and China had to reluctantly agree to price increases by the three largest iron ore producers in the world; Billiton, Rio Tinto and Vale.(http://chinabusinessreview.net/public/0101/oliver.html)During the financial crisis the Chinese steel mills won price reprieves as demand from their customers slowed. When the demand started to pick up again in 2009 and in 2010, the price crept back up due to higher demand for automobiles, low interest rates, government fiscal stimulus around the world.(Robert Guy Matthews.  Steelmakers Crank Up Output --- Surging Production in China, Eastern Europe Puts Downward Pressure on Prices as Inventories Rise. Wall Street Journal. Eastern edition. 1 June 2010  B.1.   In: ABI/INFORM Global on the Internet 28 June 2010. Available from: http://www.proquest.com/; Document ID: 2048312551.) Prices for iron ore were negotiated on an annual contract pricing scheme.(http://www.theage.com.au/business/china-iron-ore-price-talks-in-chaos-20100119-mj4f.html)(http://www.theage.com.au/business/bhp-in-significant-win-on-ironore-contracts-20100330-r978.html)(http://www.heraldsun.com.au/business/iron-ore-price-fight/story-e6frfh4f-1111115937159)(http://www.abc.net.au/lateline/business/items/201003/s2860719.htm)Australian iron ore producers were not happy that iron prices did not reflect market pricing. In 2010 pressure from Billiton and Rio Tinto to move to a quarterly based index pricing succeeded.(http://www.news.com.au/business/bhp-strikes-short-term-iron-ore-contracts/story-e6frfm1i-1225847327811) Many Japanese steel mills and Chinese steel companies had to follow as demand for raw materials heated up.((http://news.smh.com.au/breaking-news-world/mining-titan-bhp-in-landmark-iron-ore-pricing-move-20100330-rahy.html)(http://www.theaustralian.com.au/business/bhp-treads-softly-on-iron-ore-price-revolution/story-e6frg8zx-1225849061331)Spot-basis pricing has caused problems for steel manufacturers such as exposing them to price fluctuation in the market and reducing the stability of resource supply. Steel mills prefer long term pricing to hedge against cost and maintain raw material supply stability.(Matt Chambers.  Rio threat to China steel mills. The Australian. 16 June 2010  32.   In: ProQuest ANZ Newsstand on the Internet 28 June 2010. Available from: http://www.proquest.com/; Document ID: 2058385621.)Rio Tinto has said it will cancel contracts and sell the steel on the spot markets if Chinese steel mills back down on the new quarterly pricing regime.(See also*Iron and Steel Association*of steel producers*mining in China*of countries by steel production*steel industry trends*of the modern steel industry*millReferencesExternal links**Chinaesteel.com
27884677
Sunrayce_99
Sunrayce 99 was an intercollegiate solar car race sponsored by Motors, EDS, and the Department of Energy.  The race began on June 20, 1999 in Washington, D.C. and finished on June 29, 1999 at Epcot Center in Orlando, Florida.  The event was won by the University of Missouri at Rolla (now Missouri S&T).  Sunrayce 99 was the fifth and final race in the Sunrayce series and was followed by the first American Solar Challenge in 2001.  The overall success of the event was limited by difficult weather conditions.  Teams battled clouds and rain throughout the race, and no team avoided having to trailer their car for at least part of the race route.  Teams were allowed deviate from the traditional battery technology for the first time in Sunrayce 99 when nickel-metal hydride batteries were approved for use.  The new battery technology offered equivalent capacity to lead acid batteries but weighed several hundred pounds less.  Nickel-metal hydride batteries were very expensive at the time, so only the most well funded teams could afford them.  Unfortunately the rainy weather and slow speeds neutralized the advantage of the new battery technology.  Route*Day 1:  June 20, 1999 - Washington, D.C. to Charlottesville, VA*Day 2:  June 21, 1999 - Charlottesville, VA to Raleigh, NC*Day 3:  June 22, 1999 - Raleigh, NC to Charlotte, NC*Day 4:  June 23, 1999 - Charlotte, NC to Clemson, SC*Day 5:  June 24, 1999 - Clemson, SC to Atlanta, GA*Day 6:  June 25, 1999 - Rest day at Georgia Tech in Atlanta, GA*Day 7:  June 26, 1999 - Atlanta, GA to Macon, GA*Day 8:  June 27, 1999 - Macon, GA to Tallahassee, FL*Day 9:  June 28, 1999 - Tallahassee, FL to Ocala, FL*Day 10: June 29, 1999 - Ocala, FL to Orlando, FLResultsPosition           Team                      Total Elapsed Time   1        of Missouri-Rolla      56:16:44    2        Queens University                  57:04:02    3        Institute of Technology 64:08:10    4        University of Minnesota             64:24:13    5        State University               65:28:13    6        of Missouri   66:00:13    7        College                     69:43:06    8        de Technologie Superieure     70:03:58    9        Kansas State University             70:23:48    10       University of Waterloo              72:42:15    11       Ohio State University               74:50:57    12       University of Pennsylvania          75:33:21    13       Stanford/Berkeley                   77:27:20    14       Clarkson University                 78:44:03    15       Yale University                     78:59:32    16       University of Oklahoma              79:17:27    17       University of Michigan              79:28:39    18       University of North Dakota          81:02:42    19       Minnesota State  - Mankato/Winona   82:23:12    20       University of Toronto               82:44:18    21       Lincoln Land Community College      83:28:48    22       Purdue University                   84:05:37    23       Western Michigan University         85:10:50    24       University of Arizona               86:20:44    25       South Dakota School of Mines & Tech 89:39:23    26       Principia College                   94:20:48    27       University of Virginia              97:58:13    28       New Mexico Inst of Mining & Tech    97:58:39    29       United States Military Academy      100:32:49
27894452
Fritz_Anneke
laterworkJournalist, political activistFriedrich Fritz Anneke (January 3, 1818, Dortmund, Germany  December 6, 1872, Chicago, States) was a German socialist and newspaper editor, owner, and reporter.(Anneke, Fritz 1818 - 1872, Dictionary of Wisconsin History, Wisconsin Historical Society, retrieved August 24, 2011.) He immigrated to the United States with his family in 1849 and became an officer in the Union army, and later an entrepreneur and journalist. He was the husband of Franziska Anneke, the older brother of Anneke, the first Republican Auditor General, and the father of Shelley Anneke, well-known in Duluth, Minnesota, as co-founder and owner of the famous Brewing Company, now registered as a U.S. Historic Place. Life  The Anneke family (usually spelled Annecke; Fritz changed the spelling of his name while still in Germany) originates from a small village called Schadeleben close to Quedlinburg in what is today Saxony-Anhalt. Schadeleben is close to the Harz mountains, one of the oldest mining regions in Europe. Like the family of Luther, whose birthplace, Eisleben, is only a few kilometers away from Schadeleben, many of Annekes ancestors had worked in mining, which is why the family moved to Dortmund in the early 19th century, when industrial mining was beginning in the district. Like his father, Annekes brother Emil was a mining inspector, before he became involved in the 1848 revolution.  Anneke became a Prussian artillery officer, but was dishonorably dismissed in 1846 because of his democratic activities at his garrison in Mnster and also because he refused a duel. While still in Mnster he met the divorced Mathilde Franziska von Tabuillot, who later became his wife. He was one of the leading figures of the Communist movement in Cologne together with his friends Marx, Engels, Hess (later the intellectual father of Zionism and the of Israel).(Collected works:Marx and Engels, 1864-68, Volume 10, International Publishers, 1978, p. 667.) He spent most of 1848 in jail for his political activities. In 1849 he joined the revolutionary campaigns in Palatinate and Baden, and was commander of the artillery there. Schurz served as his adjunct officer. After the fall of Rastatt he fled to France, where he found refuge with his wife in the house of their mutual friend Moses Hess. Later on he worked as a correspondent for U.S. media in Europe, where he tried to join the Italian revolutionary movement under Garibaldi. In 1862 he returned to the USA to assume command of the Wisconsin Volunteer Infantry Regiment as a colonel. In 1863 he became the victim of blackmail and was dishonorably dismissed. His regiment was dissolved on September 9, 1863. Afterwards he tried in vain to be readmitted to Army service, supported by his brother Anneke, who was a leading Republican in Michigan and acting Auditor General. Many of Annekes friends and comrades from the 1849 campaign in Germany had become Union generals, including his own junior adjunct officer Schurz, Willich, Blenker, Sigel, and Struve.  After various failed commercial enterprises and the split with his wife Franziska Anneke (who became an eminent figure in the U.S. abolitionist and suffrage movements, and lived together with the American feminist and writer Mary Booth from 1860 until Booths death in 1865), Fritz moved to Chicago, where he died in December, 1872, after an accident. The short-sighted Anneke had fallen into a construction pit. Lighting was very bad in Chicago in those days, and the city was, one year after the Fire of Chicago full of such pits. A son of Fritz, Percy Shelley Anneke, was a local celebrity in Duluth, Minnesota, as co-founder and owner of the famous Brewing Company, which is now registered as a U.S. Historic Place.ReferencesSourcesSee German article and article about Fritz wife Franziska Anneke.External links*The Anneke Gallery  Wisconsin Electronic Reader* http://www.library.wisc.edu/etext/WIReader/Galleries/Anneke.htmlAnneke
27911554
Eileen_Vollick
Eileen Vollick (2 August 1908 - 27 September 1968) became Canadas first licensed female pilot on 13 March 1928. She was also the first Canadian woman to parachute into water.(Allen, Shirley. Pioneer Women Pilots: Eileen Vollick, Canadian99s. Retrieved on 2010-06-26)Early lifeMary Eileen Vene Riley was born at home on 2 August 1908 to James and Mary Riley in Ontario.(Vlerebome, Peggy. Canada Honors Pioneer Aviatrix Posthumously. Largo-Seminole Times, 1976.) James Riley was killed in a mining accident in 1911. Mary Riley remarried to George Vollick and the newly formed family moved to Ontario. Eileen was three years old when she received her stepfathers last name.(Kastner, Paul. Wiarton Event to Honour Pioneering Woman Aviator, Wiarton Echo. Retrieved on 2010-06-26)  She graduated from St. Patricks High School in Hamilton, Ontario.(CareerEileen Vollick worked at the Hamilton Cotton Co. as a textile analyst and assistant designer. Both from her bedroom window and on her way to work each morning, she watched takeoffs and landings at Jack V. Elliots Air Service and longed for the opportunity to learn to fly. Vollick applied for government permission to learn to fly commercially and was granted permission to take flying lessons when she turned 19. While waiting for her 19th birthday, Eileen became the first Canadian woman to parachute into water. She walked the wings of a Curtiss JN-4 (often called a Jenny) and parachuted 2,800 feet into Hamilton Bay, which has since been renamed Bay. When her 19th birthday arrived, Vollick officially became a student at Jack V. Elliots Flying School at Ghents Crossing overlooking Hamilton Bay. Despite doubts, she was determined to earn her license. She took 6 a.m. lessons before going to work at 8:30 a.m.( Pilots Earl Jellison, Lennard Tripp and Richard Turner served as her instructors and also taught her aviation mechanics.(Vollick, Eileen.  How I Became Canadas First Licensed Woman Pilot, Owen Sound Sun Times, 2009. Retrieved on 2010-06-28) Since Vollick weighed a mere 89 pounds and was only 5 feet 1 inch tall, she used pillows to prop herself up to see out of the cockpit of the JN-4. On 13 March 1928, Vollick received time off from her job at the Hamilton Cotton Co. in order to take her federal aviation test.( She demonstrated her knowledge of take-offs and landings on the frozen bay. In order to pass the test, the applicant had to make four landings from 1500 feet and land within 150 feet of a designated point on the ground. An additional landing had to be executed with the motor off and the pilot had to land within 5000 feet of a designated point. Other requirements of the test included performing five figure-eight turns between two designated points and completing a 175 mile cross-country trip. She successfully passed the test on 13 March 1928 along with ten other male cadets of the Elliot Flying School.(  Eileen Vollick was issued Private Pilot Certificate No. 77 on 22 March 1928. MarriageShortly after obtaining her license, she met James Hopkin. They married on 28 September 1929 in St. Patricks Church Rectory, Ontario. The couple moved to Queens in New York City and raised two daughters, Audrey Joyce Miles and Eileen Barnes. Eileen Vollick lived in New York until her death in 1968. She is buried in Woodlawn Cemetery, Bronx, New York.(Legacy and honorsIn 1975, the First Canadian Chapter posthumously awarded Eileen Vollick with an Amelia Earhart Medallion. In 1976, the Ninety-Nines, an international organization of female pilots, and the Ontario Heritage Foundation held a ceremony to reveal a plaque at the C. Munro Hamilton International Airport commemorating Vollicks accomplishments. One of her instructors, Lennard Tripp was present at this ceremony. ( On August 2, 2008 (what would have been her 100th birthday) the Eileen Vollick Terminal was named in her honor at the Wiarton-Keppel International Airport. According to researcher and writer, Marilyn Dickson, this is the first Canadian airport to name a terminal after a woman.(NotesFurther reading*Ellis, Frank H. In Canadian Skies. Ryerson Press- Toronto, 1959. *Forster, Merna. 100 Canadian Heroines: Famous and Forgotten Faces. 2004.*Render, Shirley. No Place for a Lady: The Story of Canadian Women Pilots, 1928-1992. Portage & Main Press, 1992.External links* Eileen Vollick Plaque in Hamilton
27922741
List_of_railway_towns
This is a list of towns.Australia* South Australia()* Vale, Victoria* Victoria()* Victoria()* Victoria(http://www.heritageaustralia.com.au/search.php?stateVIC&region157&view175)* Creek, New South Wales()CanadaUnder the provisions of the Lands Act of 1870, the railway companies had the power to survey new townsites along their rail lines, throughout Canada.  Virtually every community in Western Canada that was created after 1870 (the majority) was directly created by the rail companies.  One company, the Trunk Pacific, actually began naming the new towns along its main line in alphabetical order from east to west, demonstrating the arbitrary nature of their planning powers.(Lucas, Rex. A. 1971. Minetown, Milltown, Railtown; life in Canadian communities of single industry. Toronto: University of Toronto Press.)Czech Republic* Tebov - This town in Eastern Bohemia has been an improtant settlement for more than seven centuries but since 1849 it became a large railway hub where main lines connecting Bohemia and Moravia meet. The largest rail yard in that country is located there as well as maintenance and scrap works.* Velenice - The settlement was developed around an engine depot and railway works located on half way between Vienna and Prague. Originally a suburb of Austrian town of Gmnd, the railway junction with its hinterland was attached to newly created Czechoslovakia after War I and became a town of its own. * nad Vltavou - Since Middle Ages Kralupy was a tiny insignificant village on the Vltava River. Since 1850s it became an important railway junction and centre of petrochemical industry. Denmark* LangFrance* Sotteville-ls-Rouen, Seine-Maritime Department* Tergnier, Aisne DepartmentGermany* Altenbeken* Bebra* Falkenberg/Elster* HammJapanNational Railways (JNR) had chosen 12 major railway towns officially.(Shimbun March 3, 1986 evening edition) The list below shows the official railway towns, but there are many other towns where town officials and residents think their town as a railway town.* Hokkaid - Iwamizawa engine depot and center of coal transport in Hokkaido.* Hokkaid - now part of Hokkaid - Oiwake engine depot and another center of coal transport in Hokkaido.* Tsuchizaki - part of Akita, Tsuchizaki engine depot and Tsuchizaki railway works.* Niigata - now part of Niigata. Junction of Main Line and Main Line, Niitsu engine depot and Niitsu railway works.* miya, Saitama - now a part of Saitama City. Junction of Main Line and Line, Omiya railway works and Omiya marshalling yard.* Shiga - Junction of Main Line and Main Line, Maibara engine depot and Maibara marshalling yard.* Suita, Osaka - Suita marshalling yard, which was the largest marshalling yard in Japan.* Kagawa - Junction of Line and Line, Tadotsu railway works.* Tottori - Goto railway works.* Shimane - Tsuwano engine depot.* Fukuoka - Center of coal transport for Chikuho coalfield.* Saga - Junction of Main Line and Main Line, Tosu engine depot and Tosu marshalling yard.Netherlands* EdePoland* Chabwka* Fosowskie* Nowe* Koluszki* Wegliniec* Zbaszynek* Wola KarszniceRussia* Novosibirsk, now the 3rd largest city in RussiaSweden* Nssj, at the expense of the -- at the time -- larger town of EksjThailand* Ratchasima, Used to be the terminus for almost 30 years (1900 - 1930)* Hatyai, The city was founded after SRT build the Hatyai Junction and it become to a Financial Center of Southern Thailand.United KingdomSee also: Railway towns in England* Arms* Crewe* Darlington* Didcot* Doncaster* Eastleigh* Abbot - site of Western Railway* Warwickshire* Sheringham* Shildon* Swindon* Toton* WolvertonUnited States* Pennsylvania* Georgia, at one time named Terminus because it was the terminal of the and Atlantic Railroad* Arizona* Illinois* California* Colorado* Tennessee* South Dakota* Vegas, Nevada* Angeles, California* California* California* California* New Hampshire* River Junction, Vermont* River, Vermont* Pond, VermontBrazil* Santa CatarinaIndia*Bhusaval, Maharashtra*Erode, Tamil Nadu*Jolarpettai,Tamil Nadu*Arakkonam, Tamil Nadu*Olavakkode, Palghat, Kerala*Shornur, KeralaSpainThere are different kinds of railway towns in Spain:(Domingo Cullar Villar, Miguel Jimnez Vega and Francisco Polo Muriel (coords.). Historia de los poblados ferroviarios en Espaa. Ed.: Fundacin de los Ferrocarriles Espaoles. Madrid, 2005.)* Railway towns: new creation settlements which have community services (medical service, school, church...)* Railway villages:  new creation settlements which have no community services.* Railway neighborhoods: settlements which appeared near a formerly town.Some of them can be partial, non-entire. It means that railway activity was not the only one; it coexisted with other economic activities such as mining industry, cargo trade or customs activity.Railway towns* Almorchn, del Buey, of Badajoz* Linares-Baeza, Linares, Province of Jan* Fuente del Arcos station, del Arco, of Badajoz* Moredas station, Morelbor, of Granada* La Encina, Villena, of Alicante* Monfrages station (Plasencia-Empalme until middle 1970s; Palazuelo-Empalme until 27th May 1990), de Plasencia, of Cceres* Bobadillas station, Antequera, of Mlaga* Vadollano, Linares, Province of Jan* Espelys station, Espely, Province of Jan* Algodor, Aranjuez, of Madrid* Arroyo-Malpartida, Cceres, of Cceres* Chinchillas station, de Monte-Aragn, of Albacete* Puente de los Fierros, Lena, Asturias* Maanet-Massanes (formerly Empalme), de la Selva and Massanes, of GironaPartial railway towns* Los Rosales (Tocina-Empalme until 1st August 1914), Tocina, of Seville* del Ro y Minas, of Seville* Canfrancs station, Canfranc, of Huesca* Sierra Menera, Negros, of Teruel* de Santulln, of Palencia* de Baos, of Palencia* Portbou, of Girona* Prat del Pinter, Ogassa, of Girona* Castejn, Navarre* Valencia de Alcntaras station, de Alcntara, of CceresRailway villages* Doa Mara-Ocaa, Tres Villas, of Almera* Nacimientos station, Nacimiento, of Almera* Roda de Bars station, de Bar, of Tarragona* Calasparras station, Calasparra, of MurciaPartial railway villages* Puerto La Laja, Granado, of Huelva* Mengbar-Las Palomeras, Jabalquinto, Province of Jan* Agramns station, Helln, of Albacete* Aljucns station (Lavaderos until 15th April 1884; Puente de Aljucn until 1928), Mrida, of BadajozRailway neighborhoods* Belmezs station, Blmez, of Crdoba (Spain)* Los Prados, Mlaga, of Mlaga* La Almozara, Zaragoza, of Zaragoza* Astorga-San Andrs, Astorga, of Len* Torralbas station, Medinaceli, of Soria* Mra La Novas station, la Nova, of Tarragona* Viclvaros station, Madrid, of Madrid* Villabonas station, Llanera, AsturiasPartial railway neighborhoods* Santa Fe-Alhama, Fe de Mondjar, of Almera* Serns station, Sern, of Almera* Guadixs station, Guadix, of Granada* Sant Vicen de Calders station, Vendrell, of Tarragona* Las Matas, Rozas de Madrid, of Madrid* Puerto de Sagunto, Sagunto, of Valencia* Aldea Moret, Cceres, of CceresPortugal* Entroncamento, Santarm District* Novo, concelho de Palmela, DistrictReferences(
27932852
Lew_Johnstone
Lewis Albert Lew Johnstone (5 April 1916 &ndash; 11 May 1983) was an Australian politician. He was a Labor member of the South Wales Legislative Assembly, representing Cobar from 1965 to 1968 and Broken Hill from 1968 to 1981.Johnstone was born in Broken Hill to Charles Albert Johnstone, an underground mine manager, and Jessie Charlott Thueff. He was educated at public schools in the area and studied mine draughting and engineering. In 1936, the year he joined the Labor Party, he was employed with the North Broken Hill Mining Company, and became a member of the Broken Hill Miners Union. He married Doris Jenkins on 26 June 1937, with whom he had two daughters. In 1941 he enlisted in the AIF, serving in Tobruk, Syria and Alamein. He was discharged in January 1945. He continued to be active in the mining unions, serving as senior assistant secretary (1951&ndash;1953) and then secretary (1954&ndash;1965) of the Broken Hill union.()In 1965, when Wetherell, the Labor member for the state seat of Cobar, retired, Johnstone was selected as his replacement and won the seat.() Cobar was abolished in 1968 and Johnstone successfully transferred to Broken Hill. He was elected unopposed in 1971, 1973 and 1976, and with a large margin in 1978. He retired from politics in 1981.() He died in 1983 at Broken Hill.(References
27947883
W.E_(film)
 gross           W.E is an upcoming feature film co-written and directed by Madonna, starring Cornish, Isaac, Coyle, DArcy and Riseborough. It began filming on location in London, England, on July 5, 2010, and also shot in France and the United States. The screenplay was co-written by Keshishian, who previously worked with Madonna on her 1991 documentary Truth or Dare (aka In Bed with Madonna) and two of her music video clips. The film was produced by Madonnas production company Films and will be distributed in the United States by Weinstein Company and in the UK by Releasing.PlotW.E tells the story of two fragile but determined women - Wally Winthrop (Cornish) and Wallis Simpson - separated by more than six decades.  In 1998, lonely New Yorker Winthrop is obsessed with what she perceives as the ultimate love story: Edward VIIIs abdication of the British throne for the woman he loved, American divorcee Wallis Simpson.  But Winthrops research, including several visits to the Sothebys auction of the Windsor Estate, reveals that the couples life together was not as perfect as she thought. Weaving back and forth in time, the film intertwines Wallys journey of discovery in York with the story of Wallis (Riseborough) and Edward (DArcy), from the glamorous early days of their romance to the slow unraveling of their lives in the decades that followed.()ProductionDevelopmentsourceMadonna talking about the accusations on Wallis Simpson.() In October 2009, Mail reported that Madonna will be directing W.E.() She developed the script with director Keshishian.() Her then husband Ritchie helped Madonna with the script and the screenplay, suggesting her to seek meetings with several well-respected actors such as Strong and Kebbell, who both had major roles in Ritchies last film, RocknRolla.( Madonna had in mind that W.E could establish her artistic credibility and give her success in the movie field after appearing in several critical failures in the past several decades.() Madonna had started writing W.E after finishing the filming of her directorial venture, and Wisdom (2008). W.E was actually an idea she had before Filth and Wisdom, but instead she filmed the latter, as she felt that she did not have enough experience to shoot a big-budgeted film like W.E.( She described the whole film as a much bigger story:There are more characters, and three of them basically changed the course of English history. King Edward VIII abdicated the throne to be with an American woman, Wallis Simpson, and thats part of my story, so Ive had to do an enormous amount of research and interview people. So I have an enormous responsibility to that, and then I have a responsibility to the actual auction, which really happened. Then theres the new story, the point of view, which is this girl who has this obsession and is going to the auctions and stuff. So its a much more layered, complicated piece than Filth and Wisdom.(Madonnas inspiration to direct a film based on Simpson and Edwards life came from the fact that both of them were controversial, and had a varied social circle.( She told from her experience that if she brought up King Edward VIII and Simpson at a dinner party or a social gathering, its like throwing a Molotov cocktail into the room. Everyone erupts into an argument about who they were. I mean, they were very controversial  and continue to be. So, of course, Im very attracted to that.() Madonna started writing the story on her own, but she realized that she needed help as the subject was vast.( She enlisted the help of Keshishian, who was well-acquainted with Madonna after directing her 1991 documentary Truth or Dare (aka In Bed with Madonna) and two of her music video clips. The writing process was dynamic, with Madonna and Keshishian e-mailing their developed scripts to each other, or through telephone conversations and also by writing on the other persons laptop.( Madonna also spoke to friends and associates of Simpson, such as socialite and designer Haslam, to help gather more information on the subject.(W.E was initially reported to be a musical about the Duke and Duchess of Windsor, Edward and Simpson. However, Madonna confirmed that although they are in the film, the main story was not about them. It was about a woman called Wally Winthrop, a young married New Yorker in 1998 who is obsessed with what she perceived as the ultimate romantic love storyEdwards abdication of the royal throne for his love of Simpson.( The character of Simpson acted as a spiritual guide for Winthrop, in the film. The timeline presented in the film ranges from pre-War II England (193637) to New York in 1998, and the storyline swaps between these two eras. Madonna decided to use the Sothebys auction of Edward and Simpsons estate in 1998, to flash backward from.( After finishing the script and starting work on casting and production, Madonna realised that the budget of film was going to be pretty high. Simpsons character had around 80 costume changes with dresses by designers like Balenciaga, Dior, Vionnet and Schiaparelli. Most of the actual dresses were museum archives, hence unobtainable to Madonna. Instead, many of the couture houses offered to create the dresses for her.( She also enlisted costume designer Phillips to create the dresses for the film. The costumes designed were a combination of real vintage pieces, others were remade based on patterns that were obtained out of the museum archives, and the rest had to be freshly made.( One of the first characters that Madonna developed for the film was a Russian immigrant living in Brooklyn and working in Manhattan, called Evgeni. The character was inspired by Htz, who played the lead role in Filth and Wisdom.() Madonna wanted to shoot the film in certain locations where the British Royal family reside. A representative from her commented: Madonna is keen to make the film as authentic as possible and would be very grateful if we are allowed to film at certain locations, She loves the UK and holds the Queen in the highest regard.()() Madonna decided to move back to the United Kingdom as the film would take six months to shoot.() While casting for the film, she asked for a Michael OConnor wedding dress, in display at the Museum of Costume in Scotland, for a scene where Riseborough would wear it.( National Museum of Costume general manager Margaret Roberts said they were happy to send the dress to Madonna. Our Marriage in the Movies exhibition is packed with fabulous gowns that tell a story not only about the history of the period they represent, but also of Hollywood glamour and style, she said. ... This is a dress that was made for the movies, so when we received the request from Madonnas production company, we were only too happy to oblige.() Other fashion designers working for the film included Galliano and Issa, who provided clothes, Pierre Cartier the jewels, and Stephen Jones the hats.( The budget of the film is 18 million ($36 million).(Casting{| classcollapsible collapsed border0 stylewidth:80%! stylewidth:20em; text-align:left | Cast list!|-   | colspan2 ||}Madonna started work on the casting of W.E, after coming back from Africa where she was working on her Malawi initiative.( She recalled how she found the task of casting actors for different parts as difficult, since many of them would deny to sign for a particular role. Madonna contrasted the process of film casting with her task of making a new album, where she can easily choose the people she wants to work with.( Cornish was signed to play the part of Wally Winthrop, while King Edward VIII and Wallis Simpson was played by DArcy and Riseborough respectively. Winthrops Russian love interest Evgeni was played by Isaac and her husband William will be played by Coyle.() Actress Farmiga was initially asked for the role of Simpson. Farmiga commented: Madonna approached me. We sat for a cup of tea and again for a cup of tea. Hopefully, it will all come together. Im actually not familiar with her work, and I told her this flat-out. She sent a couple of films and I still havent seen them... But no matter. I dont really go by that. I go by other things. I go by scripts. I go with what I think I can do with a character and if I feel a kinetic energy with someone and I feel we can uplift and challenge each other.() Farmiga later withdrew from the project as she had fallen pregnant with her second child, and Riseborough replaced her.( Cornish commented on her role as Winthrop, Madonna is a strong, independent woman who doesnt need a man to define her  and thats admirable. Shes studied every aspect of what happened with Wallis Simpson and Edward VIII. ... Its a fascinating insight into class and romance. Madonnas created a contemporary womanwho I will playcalled Wally, who is fascinated by what happened to Mrs. Simpson.(() Madonnas daughter Lourdes was offered a part, but Madonna decided against the idea.() However, she later allowed Lourdes to appear for a minor role in the film.( The part she played was later confirmed by Cornish in an interview in March 2011 as the younger self of her character Wally Winthrop.( McGregor was offered the part of King Edward VIII,() but was later replaced by DArcy.(() Additionally, producer Parfitt and casting director Nina Gold also quit W.E, with sources claiming that the duo had creative differences with Madonna and found that she struggled to collaborate and delegate.() Actress Stilley was to play the role of Lady Thelma Furness, but left the project, citing artistic differences with Madonna. Stilley said: I had the role, but we had artistic differences. She (Madonna) is really something. I wish the cast luck because they are all really talented.() Parfitt joined the cast to portray Queen Mary and Geoffrey Palmer as Stanley Baldwin.() Real-life father and son James and Fox were signed to the parts of King George V and his son, BertieEdwards younger brother.() BBC reported that members of the London Welsh Center expressed interest in appearing for a scene in the film, which involves Edward being shocked at the living conditions in Welsh mining villages. A spokesperson for the centre, which was contacted by the films casting agency, said: Ive had about 15 phone calls this morning, and yesterday was bedlam because everybody wants to be in a film with Madonna. The centre said Welsh-speakers were needed as extras to create scenes based on Edwards visits to the south Wales valleys in the 1930s.() Actress Dormer was cast to play the part of a young Queen Elizabeth (Queen Mother). Dormer reflected on the role, saying: This country tends to remember the Queen Mother as a rather wrinkly 97 year-old, but I am playing her when she was quite an enchanting, engaging twenty and thirty-something. ... She was quite a savage and savvy game player.( Dormers assertion of the role was confirmed by royal historian Hugo Vickers, who was sought by Madonna to advise her on the characteristics of the different members of the royal family. He confirmed that Madonna was portraying Queen Mother as an unfavorable influence on the relationship between Edward VIII and Simpson.()FilmingThe film started shooting on July 5, 2010, on locations in London and Home Counties, with forays in New York and France.() The Daily Mail reported that Madonna chose a pub in Kensington in West London, on July 21, 2010, to shoot some scenes for the film. She chose the top two floors of The Abingdon Pub, and worked for almost five hours there.() This was followed by shooting scenes in the Club Quarters of Square on July 26, 2010.() Other places where filming took place include the Park Club Hotel and Spa in Buckinghamshire.() Then filming moved to France, where on July 29, 2010, Madonna shot scenes with DArcy and Riseborough in Palm Beach in Marseille, south of France and on the port of Villefranche-sur-Mer on July 30, 2010.() Scenes were also shot at the Hotel Le Meurice, with Cornish in a new look consisting of dyed black hair, pale skin and a fitted black dress.() She shot footage of a ten second bath scene for the film.() While shooting with Riseborough, Madonna and her team approached jewellery company Cartier to create copies of Simpsons extensive gem collection, which Riseborough had to wear during filming. However, one of the bracelets slipped off from Riseboroughs arm while shooting, and was lost in the Sea. Madonna had to immediately order for replicating the jewellry.()In September, Madonna shot some scenes involving Lourdes. Shooting took place around Mayfair, outside the hotel Claridges, as well as in a set of Street, created in Aldwych. Lourdes scenes required her to be dressed as a schoolgirl.() The same month, filming moved to New York, where Madonna shot scenes in Brooklyn.() A dance sequence was shot where DArcy had to do a ballet, but he did not know how to do it and was requested by Madonna to learn the steps. DArcy described the sequence as this extraordinary beautiful dance with lifts and twirls and I cant do that, but you do because she Madonna somehow makes the impossible possible and it gives you amazing self esteem when you do these things. Although the dance scene did not make the final cut of the film, Madonna also asked DArcy to learn to play bagpipes in six weeks and to ride horses.()Release and promotionFile:Madonna Toronto Film Festival.jpg|thumb|upright|Madonna at the premiere of W.E at the Film Festival.|altA blond woman smiling and looking down.In February 2011, Madonna held a private screening of the trailer for W.E at the Film Festival. The attendance included a Q&A session from Madonna and was intended to sell the film to distributors.() The rights were acquired by Releasing for the UK market, Weinstein Company for the US release and Roadshow for Australia and New Zealand.()() Weinstein promoted the film as Madonnas first full-length directorial venture, since her previous directed film, and Wisdom, was considered a film by them for its runtime of 81 minutes.( Madonna had hoped to premiere the film at the 2011 Cannes Film Festival, but could not do so since she was still making finishing touches to the soundtrack and there were three weeks more of post production to complete before the film was ready to be screened to an international audience. A representative for the film festival said that, while the movies distributors will attend the festival, they will preview select cuts to buyers at private screenings instead of showing the entire feature.( The Mail columnist Baz Bamingboye reported that W.E would be premiered at the 2011 Venice Film Festival, where it would be screened out of the competition.()() W.E was shown at the festival on September 1, 2011, with Madonna attending the premiere, along with the principal cast.() Other film festivals where W.E was shown included the Toronto International Film Festival in the same month.()() Along with the film festivals, still images from W.E were released in the September 2011 issue of Vanity Fair magazine.()Madonna had secured backing from Indian billionaire Ambanis IM Global film financiers. A correspondent for Madonna said that they were looking towards a London premiere late 2011 or early 2012  the Queens Diamond Jubilee year  which Madonna hopes will allow them to capitalize on its British Royal theme. A spokesman for Optimum Releasing, the films UK distributor, said: The film was not due to be shown in Cannes. It is in post production and will now be released early next year.() Weinstein Company announced in June 2011, that they planned to release W.E on December 9, 2011, in the United States. It will open in New York and Los Angeles on the said date, expanding to additional markets throughout the month, before the wide release intended for mid-January. Weinstein, head of The Weinstein Company, said of the release date: Madonna beautifully interweaves past and present in W.E, Its a very smart film, and a stunning directorial debut. Im incredibly excited about this movie and I wanted to give it a prominent release date.() After the showcase of the film in Venice and Toronto film festivals, Weinstein decided to cut the time of the film by about ten minutes. Talk of making changes began in advance of the Toronto showcase, and after negotiating with Madonna, they finally decide to remove around ten minutes from the film.()ReceptionIn June 2011, Alison Boshoff from Daily Mail reported that a test screening of W.E, that was kept under wraps, was said to have allegedly drawn up negative reception from its audience. Viewers believed the movie did not add up and seemed more like an advertisement than what its production values were.( After its premiere at the Venice Film Festival, it received mixed reviews. Some news sources reported that critics were completely divided on their opinions.() When nine reviews of the critics who had seen the film in Venice were tabulated, Huffington Post gave the film the overall critical score of D.() Steve Pond of Reuters theorized that W.E probably would not help in turning Madonnas faltering movie career.() Kyle Buchanan of New York wondered whether W.E would receive any significant film related awards, as predicted by industry prognosticators. He concluded that the film still may awards, but to judge from some of the vicious pans coming out of Venice today, it might have longer legs as a Razzie front-runner.() Daily Mails Baz Bamigboye gave the film a mostly positive review, saying that A lot of people will loathe it, simply because its been made by Madonna. But if people were to watch it with no knowledge of who directed, they would be pleasantly surprised. They might even find much of it enjoyable.() David Gritten of Daily Telegraph gave the film three stars and a mixed review stating that, Madonnas W.E. is a bold and confident story about an American womans obsession with the Windsors. Gritten complimented Riseborough and Cornishs acting but felt that the film looked like a commercial of expensive items, thus making it appeal to younger women for its fashion portrayal.() Negative reviews came from Xan Brooks of Guardian, who gave the film one star, describing it as a primped and simpering folly, the turkey that dreamed it was a peacock. Brooks predicted that the film may even surpass 2008s and Wisdom, Madonnas calamitous first outing as a film-maker. Her direction is so all over the shop that it barely qualifies as direction at all. Pointing out a scene, he added that Wallis bound on stage to dance with a Masai tribesman while Pretty Vacant blares on the soundtrack. But why? What point is she making? That social-climbing Wallis-Simpson was the worlds first punk-rocker?() Todd McCarthy from Hollywood Reporter wrote that the film resembled a documentary of a woman out on shopping. McCarthy felt that the storyline was especially dreary during the portrayal of the love affair between Wally and Evgeni. For the audience, Wally, despite Cornishs gentle and warm presence, offers very little in terms of personal interest or as a key into the world of one of the last centurys most discussed couples. However, McCarthy praised cinematographer Hagen Bogdaskis work.() Oliver Lyttelton of indieWire also slammed the film stating that the use of music is horrible and Weve never looked forward to Madonna going back on tour more, if only because it means that well know, for certain, that she wont be using that time to direct another movie.() Emma Pritchard from Grazia added that Wallis Simpson was the kind of woman who was accused of being more style than substance  and that, alas, is what Madonna has recreated on screen with W.E.() Mark Adams of Daily singled out Riseboroughs performance as a highlight, but overall felt that the film was disappointing.() Leslie Felperin from Variety was disappointed in the film, saying that it is burdened with risible dialogue and weak performances. Felperin felt that the reason for the films downfall was its script, which attended to the costumes and fashion more than the actual story, which she felt had much potential, but was unused.()SoundtrackInitial reports claimed that Madonna had composed the score of the film with producer Orbit with Polish composer Korzeniowski assisting them.()Production credits*Madonna  director, screenplay*Keshishian  screenplay*Kris Thykier  producer*Colin Vaines  producer*Scott Franklin  executive producer*Nigel Wooll  executive producer*Hagen Bogdanski  director of photography*Elaine Grainger  casting 	*Lucinda Syson  casting	*Childs  production design	 	*Huw Arthur  art direction	 	*Mark Raggett  supervising art director *Celia Bobak  set decoration 	*Phillips  costume design	*Jenny Shircore  make-up and hair designerProduction credits as per W.E press release from Madonna.com and Weinstein Company.((ReferencesExternal links**fr:W.Ehr:W.E.it:W.E.ru:W.E.
27969844
Nolan_Watson
 children       2Nolan Watson (born August 1, 1979) is a Canadian entrepreneur, known for his work in the mining industry and his humanitarian efforts in Africa.  When Watson was named the Financial Officer of Silver Wheaton in 2006,() he became the youngest CFO (age 26) of a multi-billion dollar capitalization company listed on the York Stock Exchange() and helped build Silver Wheaton into the largest metal streaming company in the world.()Since his departure in 2008, Watson has helped launch two metal streaming companies, Resources (now Gold)() and Metals & Energy,() and has sat on a number of boards of directors including Gold Wheaton and Bear Creek Mining.()()   In addition to his work in the mining sector, Watson founded a Canadian Charitable organization called Nations Cry, which is dedicated to providing education to children in Africa.()Early yearsNolan Watson was born in Surrey, Columbia, Canada, where he grew up with his brother Andrew and his parents, Stuart and Linda.  He attended Crescent Park Elementary School, later moving on to Rock Christian Academy for secondary school, where he was the valedictorian of his graduating class.()CareerUpon graduating with a Bachelor of Commerce degree (with honors) from the of British Columbia in 2001, Watson enrolled in the of Chartered Accountants and began articling with the professional services firm and Touche. The future looked bright for Watson as he was awarded the BC Gold Medal on the final CA examination (the UFE), scoring the highest mark in Western Canada and becoming the Valedictorian of in the Institute of Chartered Accountants of British Columbia.(  Later, he continued to upgrade his education by completing the Chartered Financial Analyst designation through the Institute, and was later recognized as one of the Most Motivated CFA charterholders by CFA magazine.( Although Watsons area of focus during his time at Deloitte was mining and metals, he had not considered a career in the industry until he was given the opportunity to join Silver Wheaton alongside Ian Telfer, the highly regarded mining entrepreneur. Telfers new venture aimed to create the first ever streaming company by completing Production Payment transactions.  At 25 years of age, Watson became the Controller of Silver Wheaton and a short time later by the age of 26, was named Chief Financial Officer making him the youngest CFO of a multi-billion dollar market capitalization company listed on the York Stock Exchange.  In his four year tenure with Silver Wheaton, Watson helped raise over US$1 billion in debt and equity to fund the organizations growth.()With his experience at Silver Wheaton behind him, Watson decided to embark on a new venture with his business partner David Awram, and created Resources, (now Gold)(, a metal streaming company focused on gold purchase agreements.()   Although the organization began during a tumultuous time in the capital markets, Watson was able to raise the necessary capital and begin to build his own legacy in the mining industry.  With six metal stream deals completed and the first revenue from Sandstorm Gold in his sights, Watson saw an opportunity to apply the metal streaming business model to the base metals sector and Metals & Energy was born.()  Watson also currently sits on the board of directors for Bear Creek Mining Corp.PhilanthropyAmidst all of his business endeavors, Watson has always been a philanthropist at heart and in 2005 he founded Nations Cry, a Canadian charitable organization focused on providing world class education to underprivileged children in Africa.(   Nations Cry is a volunteer based organization with a financial structure such that 100% of all donations go directly to the end cause, helping the children who need it.  Watsons vision has led Nations Cry to Leone, a country that was marred by more than a decade of civil war ending in 2001.Nations Cry has completed a school building project at the International DOVE orphanage in Gloucester, Leone, and has purchased land with plant to build a community school just outside of the capital city of Freetown.()Achievements*2004 - Named the Valedictorian of the Institute of Chartered Accountants of BC (*2006 - Top-40-Under-40 Award Recipient by BIV Magazine ()*2008 - Rated as the Most Motivated CFA by CFA Magazine (*2009 - Recipient of the Early Achievement Award by the Institute of Chartered Accountants of BC (*2010 - Named to the Casey Research Caseys NexTen list as one of the Top Ten Rising Stars in the Natural Resource Sector ()*2010 - Sandstorm Resources (now Sandstorm Gold) named as one of B.C.s Top 100 Companies ()*2011 - Canadas Top 40 Under 40 2010 Award Recipient ()NotesArticles**********External links* Sandstorm Gold Ltd.* Sandstorm Metals & Energy Ltd.* Nations Cry* Silver Wheaton
27984878
Carbonates_and_Evaporites
Carbonates and Evaporites is an international journal published 4 times a year by Springer and provides a forum for the exchange of concepts, research and applications on all aspects of carbonate and evaporite geology.  This includes the origin and stratigraphy of carbonate, and evaporite rocks and issues unique to these rock types: weathering phenomena, notably karst; engineering, environmental   issues; mining, minerals extraction and caves and permeability.   Editorial Board Editor: J.W. LaMoreaux  References  External links * 
28000226
White_Hills,_Arizona
footnotes  White Hills is an community in Mohave County, Arizona, States. White Hills is  northwest of Dolan Springs.HistoryIn 1892, Henry Shaffer discovered silver deposits in the area, with the help of local American Indians. The resulting mining efforts led to the creation of the town of White Hills, which reportedly grew to a population of 1,500. The mines consisted of  of tunnels, and a full fifteen mines were being worked within one mile (1.6 km) of the town. In 1894, the White Hills Mining Company was formed to run the operations, but they sold out in 1895 for a price of $1,500,000. The new owners, part of an English company, constructed a 40-stamp mill in the town. However, water had to be piped in from  away, and the supply was never able to meet the mine and mills demands.  Production peaked in 1898, and soon after the mill began operating only half of the time. The town went into decline, and eventually became a town.()ReferencesExternal links*Mohave Museum of Arts and History entry for White Hills.*Ghosttowns.com entry for White Hills.*Historical Marker Database entry for White Hills.Hills (Arizona)
28015666
Kal_Tire
Kal TireTypePrivateFounded1953, Vernon, British Columbia, CanadaHeadquartersBritish Columbia, CanadaKey peopleThomas J. Foord , Founder Robert Foord, PresidentIndustryRetail DistributionProductsTires and Automotive parts, sales and serviceLocations230 (As of July, 2010)Employees4,000 (As of July, 2010)Websitewww.kaltire.comKal Tire is a wholly owned Canadian company based in British Columbia, where it was originally founded in 1953 by Thomas J. Foord .  Its business comprises retail tire sales for passenger and light truck vehicles, mechanical services for passenger and light trucks, commercial truck tires, mining and off-road sales and service and retreading of both commercial and off-road tires.HistoryKal Tire was started in 1953 by Thomas J. Foord with the initial goal of servicing the commercial logging operations that operated in the Okanagan Valley around British Columbia and British Columbia with his partner Jim Lockhead by building customers trust.(Tire Business Magazine, T.J. Foord; Business foundation built on a simple word:Trust.)Kal Tire was named after Lake, the prominent Lake of Many Colours landmark in Vernon. The company is still based in its birthplace of Vernon.Since 1953, Kal Tire has expanded steadily.(Report On Business, How Kal Tire is Making Tracks.)  Kal Tire comprises 165 company-owned branches, 49 independent associate dealers, 11 mining/industrial/commercial locations, 10 retread facilities, one OTR plant and four distribution warehouses.  The business covers a market that includes British Columbia, Alberta, Yukon, Northwest Territories, Saskatchewan, Manitoba, Northern Ontario, parts of Southern Ontario and Quebec, as well as mining operations in Mexico, Argentina, Chile, South America, The United Kingdom, Ghana and Australia.MarketingKal Tire started with the motto of If we sell it, we guarantee it which is still used by the company today.  That was followed by the slogan of Youll like us for more than our tires.  This campaign proved very successful for the company but was then replaced by service stories.  Kal Tire currently uses the brand position of True Service.(Marketing Magazine, Kal Tire rolls with roadies.)Participation in industry trade shows and participation in organizations is a key part of the marketing strategy of Kal Tire.  Some of the organizations that Kal Tire is associated with include Western Canada Tire Dealers Association, Tire Industry Association and BC Roadbuilders Association.Services Retail Kal Tire sells and services many name brand manufacturers including: Bridgestone, Firestone, Michelin, Uniroyal, BFGoodrich Yokohama, Nokian, Falken, Nitto, Maxxis and Multi-Mile products. Kal Tire also recently expanded its service offering to include  mechanical work ranging from shocks and struts to brakes and oil service, but it is not provided at all locations.  Mechanical part suppliers include Raybestos friction parts, Truxxx lift and leveling kits, Moog steering parts, Trico wiper blades and Pennzoil lubrication products.  Batteries are also sold for cars, trucks and marine vehicles using the DieHard line of batteries.Commercial and industrialKal Tire carries a full range of commercial truck tires and is also the largest retreader(Tire Business, Tire Distributor Rankings - 2009.) of commercial tires in Canada with ten retread facilities across Canada that use the Bandag process.  Kal Tire also carries and services industrial-use tires for equipment such as forklifts, excavators and tracked vehicles.OTR and miningOTR or off-the-road tires are generally larger, for use on heavy equipment that would not normally operate on paved roads.  Recently Kal Tire partnered(Tyre Press News, Kal Tire and OTR Tyres Partnership.) with OTR Tyres in the UK to create a global earthmover tire sales and service company.ReferencesExternal links*Kal Tire official website - July 9, 2009*Commitment to Safety - Work Safe BC*OTR Tyres Official Website*Western Canada Tire Dealers Association*Tire Industry Association*BC Roadbuilders Association
28031853
History_of_Gaborone
Gaborone is the capital of Botswana. Archaeological evidence in the area dates back to 400 BCE,() and the first written accounts of Gaborone are from the earliest European settlers in the 19th century. Since the 1960s, when Botswana gained its independence from Britain and Gaborone became the capital, the city has grown from a small village in the Botswana scrubland to a major center in Africa.Early historyEvidence shows that there have been inhabitants along the River for centuries, all the way back to the Stone Age.( The area that is now modern-day Botswana was inhabited exclusively by the Khoikhoi pastoralists, who valued cattle because of nutritional benefits,() until around the 8th century CE when the Toutswe people arrived in Botswana. The Toutswe (also called the Toutswemogala society after their main settlement, Toutswemogala) settled in the area around Palapye and Serowe, and they introduced the cultivation of sorghum and millet.() By 900 CE, the Toutswe culture started to gain a foothold in Botswana. Like the earlier Khoikhoi people, the Toutswe society heavily centered around cattle: kraals, or cattle enclosures, have been found in numerous locations around eastern Botswana. In this society, wealth and hierarchy was based on the number of cows, not in the amount of gold like the adjacent Mapungubwe society.( The Toutswe engaged in long-distance trade, acquiring beads and porcelain.( The Toutswe culture started to collapse in the 13th century due to overgrazing and drought; however the prestige of cattle remained in Botswana society.()19th centuryFile:Matabeleland.png|thumb|right|German map of Matabeleland with the city of Gaborone (referred to as Moschaweng) in the lower left-hand corner on the border between the Protectorate (pink) and the African Republic (bright yellow)The Mfecane (the crushing or scattering in Zulu) is a period in the early 19th century marked by major upheavals and migrations of the tribes in southern Africa. Before the arrival of Europeans to the area, the Batswana were the dominant ethnic group in the southern half of Botswana, subjugating the Bakgalagadi people and the Khoikhoi to become malata or servants. In the 1830s, the Boers embarked on the Trek from the Colony towards the northeast. This movement caused the Amandebele people, led by Mzilikazi, to attack the Batswana as they moved northwards to present-day Zimbabwe in the 1830s, forcing them to pay tribute. The Bakololo people also fought with the Batswana during this time when they migrated to Barotseland in modern-day western Zambia. Along with the Bakololo and the Amandebele, the Boers also created skirmishes with the Batswana. Kgosi Setshele I ( means chief in Tswana) of the Bakwena led the Batswana side during the of Dimawe from 18521853. An agreement was signed between the Boers and the Batswana in January 1953.( During this time, Eruopean missionaries from the Missionary Society, such as Livingstone and Moffat, spread Christianity throughout the region. David Livingstone started the first church and school in 1845 in Kolobeng, near Gaborone.(In the 1880s, Kgosi Gaborone of the tribe left the Magaliesberg area in the African province of North West to settle in the southeastern part of Botswana and called the settlement Moshaweng.() There is an unrelated Moshaweng in the District northwest of Gaborone. The city that Kgosi Gaborone founded was called first called  Gaborones Village by the first European settlers. It was later shortened to Gaberones. Rhodes, a mining magnate and founder of the Beers mining company, built a fort for colonial administration across the river from Gaberones.( The fort was where Rhodes planned the Raid during the Boer War.( The site of the fort became Gaborone and the city of Gaberones became Tlokweng.(After gold was discovered in South Africa in 1871, III of the Bamangwato tribe made an alliance with the Kingdom against advancing Boer gold miners. On 31 March 1885, United Kingdom created the Protectorate from the land north of the River to the Strip of South-West Africa. The area south of the Molopo River became part of South Africa.( Until the 1890s, Britain ruled Bechuanaland indirectly, letting the  (plural of kgosi) rule themselves. Things changed when Rhodes established the South Africa Company with a government charter. Rhodes wanted to have control over the entire southern African region. Three , Khama III, Sebele I, and Bathoen I, traveled to Great Britain in 1895 to ask Queen Victoria not to incorporate Botswana into Rhodess company or other British colonies like Rhodesia or the Colony, and they proved successful. Today, in Gaborone, there is a memorial called the Dikgosi Monument in honor of the three chiefs who helped the founding of Bechuanaland and later Botswana.(20th centuryFrom 1961 to 1965, the city experienced a major drought, killing more than 250.000 head of cattle.()In 1965, the capital of the Protectorate moved from Mafeking to Gaberones. When Botswana gained its independence, Lobatse was the first choice as the nations capital. However, Lobatse was deemed too limited, and instead, a new capital city would be created next to Gaberones.() The city was chosen because of its proximity to a fresh water source, its proximity to the railway to Pretoria, and its central location among the central tribes.() Another reason Gaborone was picked to be capital was that it had a history of being the administrative center of Botswana. During the Second Boer War, the city served as the temporary capital of Bechuanaland while Mafikeng was under siege by the Boers. Gaborone was not affiliated with any tribe either, another reason for its designation as the capital.() The old colonial Gaberones became a suburb of the new Gaberones and is now known as the Village.(On 30 September 1966, Bechuanaland became the eleventh dependency in Africa to become independent. The first mayor of Gaborone was Reverend Derek Jones.()The city was planned under Garden city principles with numerous pedestrian walkways and open spaces.() Building of Gaborone started in mid-1964. During the citys construction, the chairman of Gaberones Township Authority, Geoffrey Cornish, likened the layout of the city to a brandy glass with the government offices in the base of the glass and businesses in the mall, a strip of land extending from the base.( )Most of the city was built within three years, earlier than expected so the government offices could move in earlier. 2,000 workers helped construct the city, shoveling  and making 2,500,000 blocks of concrete.( Buildings in early Gaborone include assembly buildings, government offices, a power station, a hospital, schools, a radio station, a telephone exchange, police stations, a post office, more than 1,000 houses() and apartments, a British high commission, a library, a brewery, a church, and numerous other structures. By 1966, the population of Gaborone was about 5,000 people.(The city changed its name from Gaberones to Gaborone in 1969.()Because the city was built so quickly, there was a massive influx of labourers who had built illegal settlements on the new citys southern industrial development zone. These settlements were named Naledi. Naledi literally means the star, but could also mean under the open sky or a community that stands out from all others. In 1971, because of the growth of illegal settlements, the Gaborone Town Council and the Ministry of Local Government and Lands surveyed an area called Bontleng, which would contain low-income housing. However, Naledi still grew, and the demand for housing was greater than ever. In 1973, the Botswana Housing Corporation (BHC) built a New Naledi across the road from the Old Naledi. Residents from Old Naledi would be moved to New Naledi. However, the demand for housing increased yet again; moreover, the residents who relocated to New Nadeli disliked the houses. The problem was solved in 1975 when Sir Seretse Khama, the president of Botswana, rezoned Naledi from an industrial zone to a low-income housing area.()In the 1970s, the city was involved in the conflicts of the Bush War and Africa under apartheid. Thousands of South Africans and Rhodesians crossed the border and into the country where they either stayed in Gaborone or Francistown, or flew to Zambia or Tanzania to participate in anti-apartheid movements or freedom-fighting activities with Nkomos African Peoples Union. The runaways put economic stress on the city, caused the standard of living to decrease, and created tensions not only between the governments of Botswana, South Africa, and Rhodesia but also between the citizens within Botswana and the refugees.() A quote from a government official summarizes the conundrum:authorJ. H. Munamati()Gaborone has experienced a multitude of attacks by the South African military in the 1980s. On 13 May 1983, South Africa sent helicopters to attack the army base outside of Gaborone.() On 14 June 1985, South Africa attacked an anti-apartheid group in the city of Gaborone. The raids resulted in fifteen civilian deaths.() After the raid, the United States withdrew its ambassador to South Africa. South African forces also ambushed the Defence Force barracks just northwest of the city towards Mogoditshane on 19 May 1986; a government worker was killed during the helicopter-borne attack. South Africa claimed that they were rooting out National Congress terrorists.() Another attack on 28 March 1988 left four dead in Gaborone.()Gaborone gained the title of city in 1986 after being classified as a town.()In 1992, the African Development Community (SADC) was founded in Gaborone, uniting the economies of the member nations.(After the 1994 General Elections, riots started in Gaborone because of high unemployment and other issues.( Today, Gaborone is growing very rapidly. The city originally planned on 20,000 citizens,( but by 1992, the city had 138,000 people. This has led to many squatter settlements on undeveloped land.()See also* of Botswana* Gaborone* stamps and postal history of Bechuanaland ProtectorateReferences
28037054
Large_margin_nearest_neighbor
Large margin nearest neighbor (LMNN) classification is a statistical learning algorithm. It learns a Pseudometric designed for neighbor classification. The algorithm is based on programming, a sub-class of optimization. It was originally invented by Q. Weinberger and K. Saul.The goal of learning (more specifically classification) is to learn a decision rule that can categorize data instances into pre-defined classes. The  neighbor rule assumes a training data set of labeled instances (i.e. the classes are known). It classifies a new data instance with the class obtained from the majority vote of the k closest (labeled) training instances. Closeness is measured with a pre-defined metric. Large Margin Nearest Neighbors is an algorithm that learns this global (pseudo-)metric in a supervised fashion to improve the classification accuracy of the k-nearest neighbor rule.SetupThe main intuition behind LMNN is to learn a pseudometric under which all data instances in the training set are surrounded by at least k instances that share the same class label. If this is achieved, the leave-one-out error (a special case of validation) is minimized. Let the training data consist of a data set  D\{(\vec x_1,y_1),\dots,(\vec x_n,y_n)\}\in R^d\times C, where the set of possible class categories is C\{1,\dots,c\}. The algorithm learns a pseudometric of the type :d(\vec x_i,\vec x_j)(\vec x_i-\vec x_j)^\top\mathbf{M}(\vec x_i-\vec x_j).For d(\cdot,\cdot) to be well defined, the matrix \mathbf{M} needs to be semi-definite. The Euclidean metric is a special case, where  \mathbf{M} is the identity matrix. This generalization is often (falsely) referred  to as Metric. Figure 1 illustrates the effect of the metric under varying \mathbf{M}. The two circles show the set of points with equal distance to the center \vec x_i. In the Euclidean case this set is a circle, whereas under the modified (Mahalanobis) metric it becomes an ellipsoid. The algorithm distinguishes between two types of special data points: target neighbors and impostors.Target NeighborsTarget neighbors are selected before learning. Each instance \vec x_i has exactly k different target neighbors within D, which all share the same class label y_i. The target neighbors are the data points that should become nearest neighbors under the learned metric. Let us denote the set of target neighbors for a data point \vec x_i as N_i.ImpostorsAn impostor of a data point \vec x_i is another data point \vec x_j with a different class label (i.e. y_i\neq y_j) which is one of the k nearest neighbors of \vec x_i. During learning the algorithm tries to minimize the number of impostors for all data instances in the training set.AlgorithmLarge Margin Nearest Neighbors optimizes the matrix \mathbf{M} with the help of programming. The objective is twofold: For every data point \vec x_i, the target neighbors should be close and  the impostors should be far away. Figure 1 shows the effect of such an optimization on an illustrative example. The learned metric causes the input vector \vec x_i to be surrounded by training instances of the same class.  If it was a test point, it would be classified correctly under the k3 nearest neighbor rule. The first optimization goal is achieved by minimizing the average distance between instances and their target neighbors:\sum_{i,j\in N_i} d(\vec x_i,\vec x_j).The second goal is achieved by constraining impostors \vec x_l to be one unit further away than target neighbors \vec x_j (and therefore pushing them out of the local neighborhood of \vec x_i). The resulting inequality constraint can be stated as::\forall_{i,j \in N_i,l, y_l\neq y_i} d(\vec x_i,\vec x_j)+1\leq d(\vec x_i,\vec x_l)The margin of exactly one unit fixes the scale of the matrix M. Any alternative choice c>0 would result in a rescaling of M by a factor of 1/c.The final optimization problem becomes:: \min_{\mathbf{M}} \sum_{i,j\in N_i} d(\vec x_i,\vec x_j) + \sum_{i,j,l} \xi_{ijl}:\forall_{i,j \in N_i,l, y_l\neq y_i} :   d(\vec x_i,\vec x_j)+1\leq d(\vec x_i,\vec x_l)+\xi_{ijl}: \xi_{ijl}\geq 0: \mathbf{M}\succeq 0Here the variables \xi_{ijl} absorb the amount of violations of the impostor constraints. Their overall sum is minimized. The last constraint ensures that \mathbf{M} is semi-definite. The optimization problem is an instance of programming (SDP). Although SDPs tend to suffer from high computational complexity, this particular SDP instance can be solved very efficiently due to the underlying geometric properties of the problem. In particular, most impostor constraints are naturally satisfied and do not need to be enforced during runtime. A particularly well suited solver technique is the set method, which keeps a small set of constraints that are actively enforced and monitors the remaining (likely satisfied) constraints only occasionally to ensure correctness.Extensions and efficient solversLMNN was extended to multiple local metrics in the 2008 paper.() This extension significantly improves the classification error, but involves a more expensive optimization problem. In their 2009 publication in the Journal of Machine Learning Research,() Weinberger and Saul derive an efficient solver for the semi-definite program. It can learn a metric for the MNIST handwritten digit data set in several hours, involving billions of pairwise constraints. An source  Matlab implementation is freely available at the authors web page.Torresani and Lee,() use the Kernel_trick to indirectly incorporate non-linear feature transformations and solve LMNN in an inner_product_space.See also* discriminant analysis* Vector Quantization* Pseudometric* neighbor search* analysis* classification* mining* learning* recognition* analytics* reductionReferencesExternal links* Matlab Implementation* ICML 2010 Tutorial on Metric Learning
28055445
Philkeram_Johnson
 intl  yesPhilkeram Johnson S.A. is the first and largest ceramic tiles producer in Greece and was established in 1961 by the Philippou family and Christos Constantopoulos. Nowadays it occupies 350 people and has an annual production of 4.500.000 m. Almost 30% of the production is exported to 20 countries.HistoryUp until 1962 the Greek market covered its needs of ceramic tile by importing from advanced industrial countries. The Philippou family, devoted to the ceramic art for 120 years, studied the market requirements and with the establishment of PHILKERAM in 1962, proceeded to design and produce a high industrial level product: the Earthenware tile. The successful operation of Philkeram during the first two years of its existence drew the attention of international investors. So the English house Richard Tiles Ltd proposed a 50% cooperation with the company, which was accepted and renamed Philkeram - Richards S.A., thus tripling its production and substantially increasing the companys exports.In 1966 Philkeram - Richards S.A. introduced, for the first time, the relief tile, thereby increasing its exports to the EEC and the Middle East. The increased demand was dealt with investment in new equipment and the quadrupling of staff. In 1969 Richard Tiles Ltd merged with H & R Johnson Ltd, leading the companys title to be changed again to Philkeram - Johnson S.A. The invested capital reached 100,000,000 GRD, while the ownership structure is maintained at previous levels. The staff stood at 350 people and the sheltered company area covered 21,000 m2. In 1979, H & R Johnson was acquired by Nocros Plc, which today still owns 50% of Philkeram - Johnson S.A. In 1982 Industrial Mining S.A. is founded, which produces and markets building materials, with special expretise in tile adhesives and grouts.At first Philkeram Johnson produced only white square tiles (15x15 cm). Soon, however, the range spread to other colours. Then the company proceeded to install decorative machines that allowed the company to present a wider range of designs and colours, thus beginning the first exports. Development continued with the production of wall tiles of various dimensions as well as experimenting with and studying the production of tiles and flooring.After extensive research and testing, production began in new facilities in 1982. The main features of these facilities was not only flexibility in production but also a significant advantage in quality output. Foundations were placed for subsequent development in single-fired technology which were completed in August 1988. The production method of the single-fired tiles was based on Western European technology. Philkeram Johnson was one of the first units of its field who adopted and implemented this technology. This new method is automatic, producing high quality products, and is mainly used for flooring indoor and outdoor spaces, with the necessary technical specifications.In 1987, the company invested heavily in new technology. The same year a new product became available to the market, Kerastar. These are floor tiles for special purposes, made with the most innovative technological global developments and exceeding even the highest standards. The company participated in the exhibition tiles in Los Angeles, 1987, and was awarded second prize among 400 exhibitors, thus entering dynamically in the U.S. market.In 1994, Hippocampus S.A. was founded, focusing on the production of specific pieces for pools and accompanying ornamental tiles. The pool sector had to be separated, being an area which must strictly adhere to basic standards of safety and hygiene. Two years later, Philkeram Johnson was certified with the ISO: 9002, while Industrial Mining with ISO: 9001.In 2003, Jumpo I, a sophisticated production line is installed, an investment of  6.000.000 which radically changed the production structure of the company. Five years later, in 2008, the second sophisticated production line, Jumpo II, was installed, which premiered in October 2008 at an event attended by the Minister of Development. In these difficult economic times, the company dares to invest and modernize, expressing its willingness to strengthen and maintain leadership, but also continues to valuably contribute to society.The People17 September 1994 - Extract from speech G. K. Philippou:... someone once told me,  My mother taught me patience. My father, persistence. I heard them both and prospered. I trusted man, I trusted him and did not regret ...Aspiring to the philosophy of the founder of the company, Philkeram Johnson has set itself as part of its vision the essential element of supporting people and their needs and taking care of them at all times, to the extent possible. Philkeram Johnson was the first company established to facilitate its workers with its own means of transport and special economic benefits (loans, facilities, etc.). It is standard policy to reach out and support its staff.The Financial Crisis and the DownfallThe rise and evolution of Philkeram Johnson, but was interrupted by the arrival of the global financial crisis, which struck at first, and perhaps more heavily than other sectors of the area in which we operate, that this construction. The lack of interest by consumers to purchase new property and the general decline in investor interest as regards the construction and building materials affected and our company.The year ended 31/12/2008 (use 01/01 - 31/12/2008) showed the direct impact that the events were cyclical market in our company. The general manufacturing downturn that began and was maintained throughout the year, coupled with the extremely high price of energy resources and especially of liquid and gaseous fuels by object disproportionately borne the cost of our products. The movement of this cost was impossible to go on the market because of the reported downturn in the construction industry and the huge competition, which appeared in our products. Consequence of all these was the limitation of our turnover (sales, products, etc.) from 34,360 million euros in 2007, to 30,369 million, a decrease of 3,991 million euros, corresponding to rate of 11.61%.The second major weight we received was the cost of energy (electricity and gaseous fuels), which, from 4,187 million euros (890 + 3297) in 2007 reached 5,511 million euros (1.107 + 4.404), an increase of 1,324 million or 31.62%. Also, the financial costs of 2,129 million euros in 2007 totaled 2,506 million euros, an increase of 377 thousand euros, which equates to 17.70%. The losses for the years 2007 and 2008 amounted to 654 thousand euros and 5,170 million euros respectively ..During the year ended on 31/12/2009 (using 1.1-31.12.2009) continued the downward trend of the company. The amount of sales decreased by  6.372.478,02 or 20.98%, reaching over  23.996.138,88  30.368.616,90, while financial expenses amounted to 2,444 million euros. The unit cost of energy (electricity and gaseous fuels) decreased by 16.78%. The net result amounted to a loss of around  5.649.186,00  5.170.331,00 against a loss last year. The construction market continues to decline, reaching an annual basis to (-) 49%.2010 (01/01 to 12/31/10) sales amounted to  14.099.464,44 compared, a decrease of 9,897 million, or 41.24% while financial expenses amounted to 2,114 million euro against 2,444 in 2009. The unit cost of energy has increased by 33.62% while losses amounted to  7.954.990, compared to 5,649 million in 2009.The above described difficult economic conditions prevailing in our industry, a further increased) by the accumulation of the (requirements of our customers) our customers debts to the company, and b) the unexpected change in policy of some banks, with which work and which instead support us through this crisis, exacerbating the liquidity problems facing our business, as well as citing the unfavorable position, which has reached the global financial system, drastically reduced funding in the face and the company us, and simultaneously increased their guarantees through post-dated checks.References
28064149
Richard_Thomas_(tin_plate_manufacturer)
Richard Thomas (18371916) was an English plate manufacturer. He was the founder of Richard Thomas & Co., which later merged with Baldwins Ltd to become Thomas and Baldwins, which in turn was absorbed into Steel in the 1960s.(BiographyRichard Thomas was born 1837 in Bridgwater, Somerset. His father was Richard Thomas, a Somerset shipowner and merchant. The younger Richard Thomas attended the Wesleyan Collegiate Institute in Taunton before starting work as a clerk in his uncles drapers shop in Oxford.( He then worked at various jobs in the mining industry in Wales, including as a coal exporter, a commission agent, a works manager and an accountant. In 1863, he moved into the tin plate industry when he became accountant and sub-manager of an iron and tin plate works in Neath. In 1871, he founded his own company: Richard Thomas & Co. He acquired tin plate works at Lydbrook in Gloucestershire and Lydney, and then the colliery at Lydbrook. Financial problems led Thomas to liquidate his company in 1883, but it was relaunched as Richard Thomas & Co. Ltd in 1884, with the financial backing of the Barrow Hematite Steel Company.(Thomas married Anne Loveluck (1836/71914) in Cardiff on on 18 February 1859. They had four sons and a daughter. His son, Beaumont Thomas, succeeded him as managing director of Richard Thomas & Co. Ltd. Richard Thomas died in Bath on 28 September 1916.( By this time, Richard Thomas & Co. Ltd and its associated companies employed over 11,000 in South Wales.(Referencesrefs()
28086956
P&H_Mining_Equipment
#REDIRECT Mining
28097720
Finnish_military_administration_in_Eastern_Karelia
title_leader  Military CommanderFinnish military administration in Eastern Karelia was an interim administrative system established in those areas of the Soviet Socialist Republic (KFSSR) of the Union which were occupied by the army during the War. The military administration was set up on July 15, 1941 and it ended during the summer of 1944. The goal of the administration was to prepare the region for eventual annexation into Finland. The administration did not encompass the territories ceded to the Soviet Union in the Peace Treaty and subsequently recaptured by the Finns during the summer offensive of 1941.BackgroundFinnish interest in Russian Karelia goes back to the 19th century.()  Eastern Karelia was seen as the cradle of Finnish culture and the ancient land of the heroic sagas of the Kalevala.( Along with the rise of Finnish Russophobia, the question became politicized.( During and after the civil war several voluntary expeditions were launched with the intended goal of liberating the Karelian kindred people, without success.( The Continuation War and a trust in a quick German victory over the Soviet Union once again gave rise to Finnish irredentism.( The legality of the Finnish claims on Eastern Karelia was justified by both ethno-cultural and military security factors.( During the spring of 1941, when the Finnish political leadership understood the full extent of the German plans concerning the Soviet Union, president Ryti commissioned professor of geography Auer and historian Jutikkala to demonstrate scholarly that Eastern Karelia formed a natural part of the Finnish living space.() The resulting book Finnlands Lebensraum (Finlands Living Space) was published in the autumn of 1941, and was intended to legitimize Finnish claims and actions to the international audience.( A similar book by historian Jalmari Jaakkola, Die Ostfrage Finnlands (Finlands Eastern Question) was published in the summer of the same year.()  The Finnish expansionist aims are present in Finnish Commander-in-Chief G. E. Mannerheims of the Day given on July 10, 1941, which was based on an earlier declaration given by him during the Finnish civil war.(I will not sheath my sword before law and order reigns in the land, before all fortresses are in our hands, before the last soldier of Lenin is driven not only from Finland, but from White Sea Karelia as well.)OrganizationThe military administration was established on the order of the Commander-in-Chief, and was mainly under the control of the Army, not the Finnish government.((Mannerheim - Eastern Karelia)  It was originally divided into three districts (piiri), which were further divided into sub-regions (alue). The military administration used exclusively Finnish-Karelian place-names (Russian name in parenthesis).* Aunus (Olonets) district:*Aunus:*Aunuksenranta:*Kontupohja (Kondopoga):*Munjrvi (Munozero):*Prs (Pryazha):*Soutjrvi (Shyoltozero):*Yl-Syvri:*Smjrvi (Sjamozero):*Vaaseni (Vainy):*nislinna (Petrozavodsk):*nisniemi (Zaoneje):*nisenranta (Prionezhsky)* Maaselk (Maselga) district:*Rukajrvi (Rugozero):*Paatene (Padany):*Porajrvi (Porosozero):*Karhumki (Medvezhyegorsk)* Viena (Belomorye) district:*Kiestinki (Kestenga):*Uhtua (Ukhta)The Maaselk district was terminated in late 1942, and its sub-regions were divided among the remaining two districts.HeadquartersThe military administration was originally stationed in Mikkeli, Finland, where the general staff of the Finnish army was located.  On October 15, it was transferred to Joensuu, Finland, and finally on November 15, 1943 to nislinna (Petrozavodsk), KFSSR.(Rautio (2002), p. 175)Military CommandersThe first commander of the military administration was mining counselor and CEO of Enso-Gutzeit, Col Vin Kotilainen. Kotilainen was followed by Col J. V. Arajuuri from June 15, 1942 to August 19, 1943, and finally by Col Olli Paloheimo who held the position to the end of the war.(Olli Paloheimo - The National Biography of Finland) On the staff of the military commander worked professor of law Veli Merikoski, whose task was to ensure that the military administration functioned in accordance with international law.(Hannikainen et al. (1992), p. 88)  After the end of the Continuation War, Merikoski wrote a booklet on the military administration, describing it in an overtly positive light.( This was done to help the Finnish cause in the coming peace negotiations.(Academic Karelia SocietyMembers of the Karelia Society (AKS), a Finno-Ugric activist organization, held a dominating role in the military administration.(Trifonova (2005), p. 65) During the Continuation War the liberation of Eastern Karelia had become the main focus point of AKS activities, and its members were highly influential in choosing the policies of the military administration in accordance with the organizations Greater Finland ideology.(Trifonova (2005), p. 65) In the summer of 1941, over half of the initial higher leadership of the military administration were AKS members.(Trifonova (2005), p. 65)PoliciesThe long-term goal of the military administration was to make it possible for Eastern Karelia to be permanently integrated to the Finnish state after the ultimate German victory over the Soviet Union.( This was to be done by inspiring the native populations confidence towards the Finnish occupiers.(FennicizationAs most place-names in Eastern Karelia had a historical Finnish or Karelian alternatives which were still in use in the KFSSR, extensive renaming was not necessary.(Rautiainen (2007), p. 73) The notable exception is Petroskoi (Petrozavodsk), which was deemed as sounding too Russian, and was renamed nislinna, a literal Finnish translation of the name Onegaborg used in the Orbis Terrarum of Ortelius.((Cartographica Neerlandica Topographical names for Ortelius Map No. 160) Although Finnish troops never reached Kemi (Kem) on the shores of the sea, this town was also to be renamed, as a town with an identical name already stood in Lapland.(Trifonova (2005), p. 70) The new name was tentatively suggested to be Vienanlinna (Castle of Viena), a continuation of several Finnish cities and towns ending in suffix -linna (e.g. Hmeenlinna, Savonlinna).(Streets were to be named after prominent Finns and patriots (such as Mannerheim, Lnnrot, Simojoki and Talvela), and also after names featured in the Kalevala and the Kanteletar.(Trifonova (2005), pp. 70-71)  The Karelian population was also discouraged to give newly-born children names.(Ethnic policiesThe remaining population of Eastern Karelia was estimated to be under 85 000 in 1941, and consisted mainly of women, children and the elderly, while the pre-war population was c. 300 000.(Vehvilinen (2002), p. 105) The Finnish authorities further estimated that of the remaining 85 000, circa half could be classified as national; that is, Karelians, Finns, Estonians, Ingrians, Vepsians and other smaller Finnic minorities considered kindred peoples (heimo).((Trifonova (2005), p. 66) The majority of the population was defined as non-national, with most being Russian or Ukrainian.( The Finns encountered considerable challenges in dividing the population into these two groups, as linguistic and ethnic boundaries were not very apparent.( Ultimately, the division was based on ethnic principles (sometimes expressing somewhat pseudo-scientific anthropological theories), and thus monolingual Russian-speaking Karelians and children from multinational families were usually classified as national.(( The long-term goal of this pursued policy was to expel the non-national part of the population to German-occupied Russia after the war had reached a victorious conclusion.(Education and propagandaFinnish propaganda directed for the Karelian population focused on pan-Finnicism, presented the occupiers as liberators, and also tried to encourage antagonism between the Karelians and Russians.(Trifonova (2005), p. 67) Main propaganda tools of the military administration were the newspaper Vapaa Karjala (Free Karelia) and Radio.(Trifonova (2005), p. 68)Obligatory school attendance applied to 7-15 year-old children classified as national in ethnicity.(Hannikainen et al. (1992), p. 90)  The language of instruction was Finnish and the teaching had a heavy focus on Finnish nationalistic and religious themes.(( If the children were monolingual Russian or Veps speakers, with the latter language differing considerably from Finnish, Karelian-speaking children were used as translators.( By the end of 1942, 110 elementary schools were opened, with an attendance of over 10 000 children.(One of the aims of the military administration was the revival of religious observation, which had been completely repressed under Soviet rule.(Vehvilinen (2002), p. 106) The central idea of this policy was to bolster anti-communist feelings among the nationals.(Planned population transfersSuffering from severe underpopulation, especially after the planned expulsion of the non-national ethnic groups, the Finns theorized several possible ways to repopulate the region. Most suggestions revolved around the re-settlement of certain Finnic minorities of Russia.(Rautiainen (2007), p. 131) The Karelians of Tver, who had escaped Swedish and Lutheran rule from the of Kexholm and Ingria after the War and the of Stolbovo of 1617 were especially considered,( as the Soviet Census of 1926 had counted them as numbering over 140 000, making the Karelian population of Tver more numerous than the Karelians in the KFSSR itself. The transfer was not, however, possible before Finnish and German fronts reached each other on the Svir, which never happened during the war.The other main group intended to be settled in Eastern Karelia were the Ingrian Finns of the Oblast,( who according to the 1926 census numbered c. 115 000.() However, during Stalins purges tens of thousands of Ingrians had perished or were transferred to other parts of the Soviet Union,(Pohl (1999), pp. 22-24) and in 1941 the Ingrians of Leningrad probably numbered only c. 80 000-90 000. In the autumn of 1941, Western and Central Ingria were occupied by the advancing German forces and placed under German military administration. Because Ingria was to be reserved for German colonization according to the Ost (Ingermanland), the German and Finnish authorities agreed on a treaty which stated that Ingria was to be totally emptied of Finns and other Finnic minorities, mainly Votes and  Izhorians. This treaty was implemented during March 1943 to the summer of 1944, when over 64 000 people were transferred from Ingria to Finland.(Hannikainen et al. (1992), p. 97)  The Ingrians remaining areas still under the control of the Red Army (c. 20 000 - 30 000) were deported to Siberia during the winter of 1942-1943. After the Armistice, some 55 000 Ingrians were repatriated to the Soviet Union, but were not allowed to return to theirs homes in the Leningrad Oblast before the 1950s.(Hannikainen et al. (1992), p. 98)  Around 7000 to 8000 Ingrians moved from Finland to Sweden to escape the Soviet authorities.(Other discussed sources for East Karelian settlers included the Finnish immigrants of America and Canada, the Finnic Soviet prisoners of war under German capture, Eastern Karelian refugees currently living in Finland, and Finnish war veterans.(  Land redistribution was to favor those without farms or land, disabled veterans who were still capable of working, former NCOs, border jgers and soldiers distinguished in battle.( Internment and labor camps At the beginning of the Finnish occupation of Karelia, over 20,000 of the local ethnic Russians (almost half of them) were placed in internment and camps. In the end of 1941 the number rose up to 24,000. During time prisoners were gradually released and they were transferred to empty villages. However, their movement were controlled as they had a red clearance, while national people had a green clearance. Furthermore, ethnic Russians did have permission to travel to Finland.(Rautio (2002), p. 179)Living in Finnish camps was harsh as 4,000-7,000 of civil prisoners died, mostly from hunger during the spring and summer of 1942 due to failed harvest of 1941.(The occupiers set in Karelia the network of concentration, transfer and labor camps where over 20 thousand of locals were placed. Thousands of them died)(Laine, Antti: Suur-Suomen kahdet kasvot, 1982, ISBN 951-1-06947-0, Otava) Also segregation in education and medical care between Karelians and Russians created resentment among the Russian population. These actions made many local ethnic Russian people support the partisan attacks.(Planned future expansionIn a conversation held on November 27, 1941 with the Finnish Foreign Minister Witting, Hitler proposed that the new Finnish border should run from the peninsula to the Svir, and in the case Leningrad was razed to the ground as originally planned, to the Neva.( In Finland this theoretical border was sometimes referred to as Kolmen kannaksen raja (the Border of Three Isthmuses, referring to the Isthmus, Olonets Isthmus and the White Sea Isthmus). The exact border of the White Sea Isthmus was left undefined during the war, but Rosenberg, head of the Ministry for the Occupied Eastern Territories (RMfdbO), held that Finland should annex the whole KFSSR.(Rautiainen (2007), p. 9) The most eastward suggestion discussed among the Finnish officer corps before the war drew the line from Nimenga in the Oblast to the District on Onega.(Rautiainen (2007), p. 13) Professor von Mende (RMfdbO) had consulted Finnish far-right activist Rikknen on Finlands natural eastern borders, and sent to Rosenberg a memorandum suggesting that the northeastern border between Finland and Germany should run along the Dvina River () near Arkangelsk.(Manninen, O. (1980), Suur-Suomen riviivat, p. 151, ISBN 9512617358)Kola peninsula was to be de jure a part of Finland, but the nickel deposits of the region were to be exploited jointly with Germany.(Rautiainen (2007), p. 128) Jalmari Jaakkola estimated in Die Ostfrage Finnlands that some 200 000 Russian had to be expelled from the region, leaving the peninsula with a population of c. 20 000 Finns, Samis and Karelians.(Rautiainen (2007), p. 129)References Notes  Bibliography *sotilashallinto
28110626
Jos_de_la_Borda
Jos de la Borda (Joseph de Laborde in French; ca. 1700-May 30, 1778) was a French/Spaniard who migrated to Spain in the 18th century, amassing a great fortune in mines in Taxco and Zacatecas in Mexico. At one point, he was the richest man in Mexico.(  )(  ) He is best remembered today through several architectural works that he sponsored, the most monumental being the Santa Prisca Church in Taxco(  ) (barroco).Early life and arrival to MexicoBorda was born either in the province of Jaca in the then kingdom of Aragon (Spain) or in the French city of Barn in either 1699 or 1700. He was the second son of Pierre Laborde, an officer in the army of XIV of France and Spaniard Magdalena Sanchez.(( His older brother, Francisco, left Europe for Mexico in 1708. Eight years later, he wrote for Jos to join him to work with him at the La Lajuela mine he founded in Tehuilotepec, near Taxco.(  ) At the time, the Taxco area had the richest mining in Mexico, producing iron, silver, gold and more.( Jos arrived to Mexico in 1716, when he was only 17.(In 1720, Jos married Teresa Verdugo, the daughter of Captain Verdugo and the younger sister of Franciscos wife. The union produced two children, Ana Mara and Manuel. Shortly after the birth of the second, Ana Mara died of illness.(Mining careerAfter working with his brother for a number of years, Jos set off to find new mineral strikes, arriving to Tlalpujahua in 1734. Here he founded a mine that was very successful. In 1738, his brother Francisco died and Borda inherited his brothers property. Deeper exploration of the original La Lajuela mine yielded an abundance of silver. It is from this strike that Borda first funded the building of the Santa Prisca Church.(  When this mine had nearly run out, he discovered a richer one in the Taxco called San Ignacio. With this money, he rebuilt and expanded the Santa Prisca Church. However, the San Ignacio mine produced for only nine years.(By 1760, Bordas mines had run out, forcing him to explore in de Monte and then in Chontalpa in 1761. By this time, he was practically bankrupt.(  Borda mortgaged the last major possession he owned in Taxco, the richly ornate Santa Prisca Church, in order to finance an expedition to Zacatecas. Once there, he initially worked in a mine called La Quebradilla but it did not produced as much as hoped and payments were coming due on the mortgage. With the last of his money, he opened the mine La Esperanza which again made him a wealthy man.(( With this new mine, Borda became the richest man in Zacatecas, as he had been before in Taxco.( He was named a regent of Zacatecas.( However, by 1776, the aging Borda was affected by mercury poisoning and other illnesses. He wanted to return to Taxco, but his son Manuel convinced him to retire to the family house in Cuernavaca, where he thought the climate would be better. Here, Manuel was already living and practicing as a priest. Just before Borda died in 1778, his son administered rites.((In total, Bordas earnings from his mines in Mexico totaled 40 million pesos, and at the heights of his career was the richest man in Mexico and perhaps the world.((Architectural worksBorda is remembered mostly through three architectural works which remain to this day: the Santa Prisca Church in Taxco, the Borda House in Mexico City and the Borda Garden in Cuernavaca. The most lavish and monumental of these is the Santa Prisca Church. Built between 1751 and 1758, Borda hired the best artists, such as Cabrera, as well as the best artisans for the project. As he completely financed the building and operation of the church, he had total control over it aesthetically.( It is described as exuberant Baroque or Churrigueresque with two large towers of pink stone.(  ) The churches organ is made with fine wood and is still played 250 years after it was brought from Germany.( The church is named after Prisca, a female Roman  aristocrat who defied II by repudiating Apollo in favor of Christ.(barrranco) At the time, it was one of the most richly adorned churches in New Spain. Many of its sculptures and other decorative features were covered in gold and jewels. Eventually, many of these items would make their way to the City Cathedral and Notre Dame in Paris.(The Borda Garden was originally a large mansion owned by the Borda family in Cuernavaca. This is where Borda died in 1778. Later, Bordas son, Manuel, transformed the grounds of the house into gardens filled with flowers and fruit trees to satisfy his passion for botany. These gardens also contain a number of fountains and an artificial lake and were completed in 1783.  In 1865, this was the summer home of Emperor Maximilian I and his wife Carlota Amalia. It hosted major political soirees in the 19th and 20th centuries such as those sponsored by Daz and Zapata. Today the area is a public park where the gardens have been maintained, and the house itself has been converted into a museum .( )The last is the Borda House located in Mexico City on Madero Street in the historic center. Originally the building encompassed an entire city block and was supposed to rival the palaces of Corts and his descendents. It was also a present from Borda to his wife after he regained his wealth from his mines in Zacatecas. The building has two ironwork balconies on the two upper floors that went around the entire structure, allowing Borda to walk around the block without ever leaving his house. Since Bordas death, this building has been partitioned and most of it is lost except for a small section on Madero Street. The remains of the double balcony are still present.(  )(LegacyGod gives to La Borda and La Borda gives to God, reads his familys motto, explaining his generosity to the Catholic Church.( The Santa Prisca Church is the largest work associated with Borda, although he funded numerous social charities as well. Archbishop of New Spain, Antonio Jimenez y Frias said that he was a miner distinguished for his charity, rare in his virtue, exceptional for his humility, a phoenix for his liberal views and, in a word, a hero of the rich miners of this America. There is a parchment signed by XIV dedicated to the miner referring to him as a friend. However, he is also remembered as one who made his fortune by cruelly exploiting native labor.(References  
28135032
Bannered_routes_of_U.S._Route_98
There are five routes along Route 98 and six former routes. Most US 98 banered routes are located in the U.S. state of Florida.ExistingMcComb business routePensacola alternate routePensacola business loopU.S. Highway 98 Business is an eastwest route located mostly in downtown Florida. It is also known as Garden Street, Alcaniz Street, Childers Plaza and Gregory Street.roadroadnotesOnly direct access is from southbound I-110 to westbound US 98 BusinessroadPanama City alternate routePanama City business routeBrooksville truck routeU.S. Route 98 Truck is the truck detour for US 98 around Florida. Although a significant portion of the truck route exists within the city limits, it still avoids historic downtown Brooksville to the south and the west. The route exists in concurrency with two existing Florida State Roads and one Hernando County Road, and never independently.Beginning at Jasmine Avenue, and East Jefferson Road(State Road 50A), Truck US 98 runs in concurrency with State Road 50 in a southwesterly direction. As it approaches Hernando County Road 581 it turns from southwest to direct west. Crossing the railroad tracks near Hernando County Road 445, the road passes by a large church before curving slightly to the northwest. This segment also contains the secret designation of State Road 700, until it reaches the intersection of U.S. Route 41. Here, State Road 700 leaves the truck route, and heads north along US 41(SR 45) until branching off to Ponce De Leon Boulevard to rejoin US 98. Meanwhile, SR 50/Truck US 98 passes a branch of the Brooksville Post Office, and makes a northbound curve at Horse Lake Drive, then at the Hernando County Sheriffs Office before meeting West Jefferson Road.  This entire section of SR 50/US Truck 98 was widened from two lanes to four lanes in the early-21st Century.left|75pxWhile SR 50 takes its sharp left turn toward Wachee, and SR 50A begins eastbound into downtown Brooksville, Truck Route US 98 continues north along Hernando County Road 485, also known as Cobb Road. From that intersection it narrows down to two lanes, as it approaches a four-way stop intersection and accompanying red blinker-lights with Hernando County Road 484(West Ford Dade Avenue).Two old sections of Cobb Road used to exist. One is to the right north of Hernando County Road 484(West Fort Dade Avenue), and the other is a mining road that runs from the intersection with Yontz Boulevard to an isolated section of Hernando County Road 476(Lake Lindsey Road) in Stafford.Crossing the railroad tracks a second time after the intersection with Yontz Road(Former Hernando County Road 485B), the road winds through a rural field between a mining area and a hilly region before finally reuniting with US 98 south of the Willow Prairie Lake area. Truck Weigh Stations exist just west of the northern terminus of Truck US 98 on the right of way of a former railroad crossing.FormerPensacola toll routePanama City Beach bypass routeDade City truck routeTruck U.S. Route 98-301 was a truck bypass of the concurrency of U.S. Routes 98 & 301 in City, Florida. The road was also unsigned State Road 533.Truck US 98-301 ran to the east of the original US 98-301, which previously ran through the heart of Dade City along 7th Street. After the intersection with Alternate Pasco County Road 35 it ran parallel to a CSX railroad line, and passes by the old City Atlantic Coast Line Railroad Depot.In February 2007, this section was converted into the main branch of the US 98-301 concurrency.SR 39roadnotesroadSR 39Dade City business routeBusiness U.S. Route 98-301 was the main line of the concurrency of U.S. Routes 98 & 301 in City, Florida until February 2007. The road was also unsigned Road 35, Road 39, and Road 700. During the decommissioning of US 98-301 Truck Route, FDOT was carrying out a resurfacing project of the road, and exposed the roads status as State Road 39. SRs 35 and 700 remain hidden, however.Lakeland business routeBartow business routeReferences*US 98/Alt US 98/Bus US 98/Byp US 98/Toll US 98 (Florida in Kodachrome)
28139618
F._B._Hinsley
Frederick Baden Hinsley (1900 &ndash; 1988) left school at the age of 13 and worked in his local mine. Encouraged by his mother, he studied at night school and was eventually admitted to study engineering at University in 1920. On graduation, he worked in the mining industry, initially in Staffordshire before returning to academia. He worked at University and then founded the School of Mining Engineering at University. He stayed at Nottingham until retirement and remained actively involved as emeritus professor there. His specific area of expertise was mine ventilation and for which his expertise was much in demand around the world.Hinsley became a founding fellow of the Fellowship of Engineering (now the Academy of Engineering) in 1976.The Institute of Materials, Minerals and Mining awarded him the Sir Andrew Bryan award in 1982/3 for outstanding and sustained contribution to the institute.ReferencesExternal links*http://www.raeng.org.uk/about/fellowship/founder_fellows/default.htm*http://findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_hb5976/is_200908/ai_n39229593/*http://www.iom3.org/content/past-winners*http://www.pubs-newcomen.com/cgi-bin/somsid.cgi?typeheader&record0792&session(*http://www.nottsheritagegateway.org.uk/themes/coal/coalprinted.htm*F. B. Hinsleys Rootsweb profile
28147804
Urumi_(film)
 budget         22 crores(Urumi () is a 2011 Malayalam historical-fantasy film directed and co-produced by Sivan and written by Ramakrishnan.(http://expressbuzz.com/entertainment/news/prithviraj-turns-film-producer/190649.html)(Review: Watch Urumi for the effort - Rediff.com Movies) It stars Prithviraj, who was also one of the producers of the film, as Chirakkal Kelu Nayanar, Deva as Vavvali, ONell as Estvo da Gama, DSouza as Princess Aysha of Cannanore, Gupte, Robin Pratt, Sreekumar, Menon, whilst featuring Balan, Arya and Tabu in guest roles. Background score and songs were composed by Dev, lyrics were by Damodaran Namboothiri, Rafeeq Ahammed and Engandiyur Chandrasekharan.It was made on a budget of more than 200 million, making it the second-most expensive Malayalam film ever, after Pazhassi Raja (2009).() Urumi was dubbed and released in Telugu as Urumi and English as Vasco da Gama. Urumi is awaiting release in Tamil as Urumi- Padhinaintham Nootrandu Uraivaal and dialogues are written by S. Sasikumaran for the Tamil version.The film is set in the backdrop of the fierce warrior clans of Northern Kerala in the sixteenth century and focuses on the cult of Chirakkal Kelu Nayanar (Prithviraj), a man with an epic mission. His target and mission is Dom da Gama (Robin Pratt), the Viceroy of Portuguese Empire in India. The film is spread between the second and third visit of Gama to India and chronicles a varied version of how da Gama could have met a bloody death in AD 1524. In the journey of Kelu Nayanar, he has to encounter the seamless conflicts within the kinsmen and also kings, ministers, peasants and a warring Muslim warrior princess Ayesha (Genelia) of the famed Arackal Sultanat. Kelu has a forte, a legendary golden Urumi, specially made from the left over ornaments of the dead women and children who were burnt alive in the massacre of a Mecca Ship, Miri, commanded to be set on fire and drowned by Vasco da Gama during his second visit to Kerala in AD 1502. Kelu is supported by Vavvali (Prabhudeva), his childhood friend and in a way his elder brother, though he comes from the Muslim neighborhood. The film also has mystical characters like Vidya Balan, who plays Makkom, a displaced Devi Deity in the Oracle form. Kelu tracks his mission through the wild roads of treachery, treason and a hidden passion to reach a master plan to create his own army against the mighty empire. His action in creating an organized revolt becomes the first of its kind movement against the first Colonial advance in India. PlotThe film starts with a short introduction to the history of Portuguese exploration in the in the of Discovery to India, referring the legendary landing of explorer da Gama on 20 May 1498 in Calicut, the kingdom ruled by Zamorins of Calicut. The typical Primary School teachers narration (by Malayalam actor P. A. C. Lalitha) is initially accompanied with Image Search on Vasco da Gama, followed by stills from his journey and moving images at the end. The meeting of Vasco da Gama (Robin Pratt) with Zamorin with traditional hospitality, and the failed interview to produce any concrete results is also depicted. Then the celebrations of the greatest discovery till in Lisbon is shown (Vasco da Gamas expedition was successful beyond all reasonable expectation, bringing in cargo that was worth sixty times the cost of the expedition). In a party, da Gama is seen talking to his young son, Estvo, who will later turn crucial character in the film. The scene changes to a club in present day Goa, where we see two young men, Krishna Das (Prithviraj) and his friend, dancing. These two young men are running a music troupe and are completely unaware of the history or heritage of their land. From the agents of a multinational mining cooperation, Krishna Das knows that his ancestral property in Kerala leased out to a N. G. O. by his late mother is rich in minerals and is free to be sold as the lease period has lapsed. The company offers him a large of money as advance. Krishna Das is told that there some problems exist, that he has to convince the people running the N. G. O. for this transaction. When he reaches the plot, he is kidnapped by some tribal (who will have to vacate their lands, if the mining begins) men to cave deep in the forest, and where he meets their chief Thangachan (Arya). Thangachan explains to him that he is the descendant of Chirakkal Kelu Nayanar, and Thangachan resumes the narration.The narration continues with Portuguese activities in India, and effects of Colonization on the Coast. In 1502, Gama commanded the 4th Portuguese Armada to India, a fleet of fifteen ships and eight hundred men, with the object of enforcing Portuguese interests in the east. On reaching India in October 1502, Gama started capturing any Arab vessel he came across in Indian waters. On his way to Cannanore when he had reached the northern parts of the Indian Ocean, Gama waited for a ship to return from Mecca and seized all the merchandise on it. The Portuguese chases the pilgrim ship down, which surrenders rather quickly, probably imagining that its master and they had enough money to ransom it off. But Vasco da Gama shrugs off all the offers. The Nair (Nairs were fierce warrior clans in Malabar) general of the king of Kolathunad, Chirakkal Kothuwal (Arya), sents a Brahmin negotiator and his own son, Kelu, to the Portuguese ship So Gabriel for negotiations on Mr. But, da Gama rejects all peace talks and barbarously cut off the Brahmins ears and sews ears of his dog on the same spot. He then ordered the hundreds of passengers be locked in the hold and Mr, and which contained many wealthy Muslim merchants  to be set on fire.  It took several days to finally go down completely, and general of the king of Kolathunad, Chirakkal Kothuwal storms to So Gabriel to rescue his son, Kelu. But, on this charismatic attempt Chirakkal Kothuwal loses his life to the Portuguese, and only Kelu escapes devastated by his fathers loss. Vavvali, a Tamil Muslim boy, takes Kelu with him to his dwelling, and treats him as his own younger brother. Kelu forms an Urumi, specially made with the left over ornaments of the dead women and children of a Mecca Ship, Miri. He takes the oath that he wants to kill da Gama.Then it shows a foreshadowing of Kelu (Prithviraj) and Vavvali (Prabhu Deva) as adults hunting rabbits in a forest somewhere in Kolathunad. Where they are confronted by some strangers trying to abduct Bala (Menon), the princess of Kolathunad. Kelu and Vavvali save the princess, but they are subsequently captured by the soldiers of Kolathiri, accompanied by the heir apparent, Bhanu Vikraman (Ankur Khanna) of Chirakkal. They are charged with attempted kidnap of the Princess and keeping foreign weapons such as pistol. Originally the pistol belonged to the real abductors, but the kings judgement was the by elephant. On the way, Princess Bala comes and reveals that these men are in fact saviors, not attempted abductors.He joins hands with the king to jointly kill Vasco da gama and the remaining part forms the rest of the storyCastHistorical accuracyThe tale of Kelu Nayanar depicted in the film is fictional, and though it is based on historical events, the film has a mystical fantasy flavour. Santosh Sivan told the media that the film was designed to be a representation of historical facts on a fictional platform rather than an accurate narration of history.() Historical inaccuracies in the film include:*Costumes are designed for aesthetic appeal rather than representing the true clothing at the time. The Kelu Nayanar is seen wearing a lower garment similar to pants and a coloured upper garment. At the time all upper-caste Hindu men wore a mundu and white veshti (upper garment), and during exercise or battle would have worn a short dhoti like those worn by Kalaripayattu warriors.*Hindu men wore their hair in the kuduma style (this fell out of favour in the early 20th century), as well as earrings and forehead markings with vibhuti or chandanam. Wild, unkempt hair (as seen in Kelu Nayanar) was only kept in such a way during times of mourning or great sadness.*The blouse was only introduced to Kerala society in the 19th century and even up until the mid-20th century it was common to see elderly women only covering their upper body with a robe of linen. The character, played by Vidya Balan, is shown wearing a black blouse. Soundtrack The songs and the background score for the film have been composed by Dev with lyrics penned by Damodaran Namboothiri, Rafeeq Ahammed and Engandiyur Chandrasekharan. The music album consists of nine songs. According to Deepak Dev, composing songs for Urumi was a challenge as Santosh Sivan had proscribed all electronic music, as the film is set in the sixteenth century. It was Prithviraj who suggested Deepak Dev to Sivan. The songs encompasses many genres  folk, lullaby, ballad etc. The vocalists range from the most experienced J. Yesudas to newcomers Job Kurian and Reshmi Sathish. The song Chimmi Chimmi is done as a tribute to M. G. Radhakrishnan, a composer Deepak Dev admired a great deal, but the similarities of the track with the Hindi song Nayan Tere from the Ashutosh Gowarikar movie Khelein Hum Jee Jaan Sey is stunning. Another track,  Aaro Nee Aaro in the film is alleged to be plagiarized from Loreena McKennitts Caravanserai of the album An Ancient Muse. The track also uses major hooks from Loreenas famous track Mummers Dance.The theme music is blatantly lifted from the track Gone with the leaves  from the 2002 Jet Li starrer Chinese film,  Hero; with some elements also borrowed from the soundtrack of the Hollywood movie Gladiator.(http://www.itwofs.com/) Few fight sequence background music has similarities with of the Caribbean soundtrack also. Production Shooting for the film started on August 17, 2010.() The main locations were Kerala and the forests of Ghat in Maharashtra.(Prithviraj turns producer with Urumi) Reception  Critical response The film did well in the Kerala and Andhra boxoffices. Deepa Garimella of fullhyd.com recommended the movie even to a Telugu audience, calling it a Chandamama bedtime story brought alive like little else. ()References  09. ^ http://cinema.currentweek.net/2011/08/urumi-telugu-movie-review-rating-375.htmlExternal links* * *()
28149880
Stigmella_hissariella
 Stigmella hissariella is a moth of the Nepticulidae family. It is found in Tadzhikistan.The larvae feed on Crataegus species.External links*Revised Check-List Of Mining Lepidoptera (Nepticuloidea, Tischerioidea And Gracillarioidea) From Central Asiahissariella
28150231
Stigmella_malifoliella
 Stigmella malifoliella is a moth of the Nepticulidae family. It is found in Tadzhikistan.The larvae feed on Malus species.External links*Revised Check-List Of Mining Lepidoptera (Nepticuloidea, Tischerioidea And Gracillarioidea) From Central Asiamalifoliella
28159696
Japan_Labour-Farmer_Party
country             JapanThe  was a socialist party in Japan between December 1926 and December 1928. During its existence, it occupied a centrist position in the divided socialist movement.FoundationThe Japan Labour-Farmer Party was one of several proletarian parties that existed in Japan in the late 1920s.(Robert A. The Japanese Communist Movement, 19201966. Berkeley: University of California Press, 1967. pp. 24, 33) It was founded in Tokyo on December 9, 1926 , as a split from the Social Democratic Party (the founding occurred just four days after the founding of the Social Democratic Party).((Large, Stephen S. Organized Workers and Socialist Politics in Interwar Japan. Cambridge Cambridgeshire: Cambridge University Press, 1981. p. 108) The split had both personal and ideological dimensions. Amongst the founders of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party were Inejir and his followers in the Japan Peasant Union and leftwing socialist intellectuals such as As Hisashi, Kono Mitsu, Mosabur, Tanahashi Kotora and Kato Kanju.((Garon, Sheldon. The State and Labor in Modern Japan. United States: U CALIF BERKELEY PR (CA/NJ), 1987. p. 118)(Large, Stephen S. Shwa Japan: Political, Economic and Social History, 19261989. Vol. 2, 19411952. Routledge library of modern Japan. London: Routledge, 1998. p. 123)(Smith, Henry DeWitt. Japans First Student Radicals. Harvard East Asian series, 70. 1972. p. 252) As Hisashi became chairman of the party, whilst Miwa Jus became its general secretary.(Political outlookIn terms of its programme, the party differed little from the Party (which, although having non-Communists amongst the ranks, was essentially controlled by the Party of Japan). In fact several members of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party were former communists themselves (such as Kondo Eizo, the founder of the Peoples Communist Party). However, in practice there was a clear political demarcation between the Japan Labour-Farmer Party and the Labour-Farmer Party.((Robert A. Democracy and the party movement in prewar japan: the failure of the first attempt. Berkeley u.a: Univ. Of California Pr, 1975. p. 332)(Beckmann, George M., and Genji Okubo. The Japanese Communist Party 19221945. Stanford, Calif: Stanford University Press, 1969. pp. 34, 49, 372) The Japan Labour-Farmer Party occupied a centrist position in the Japanese left at the time, between the Communist Party of Japan and the Labour-Farmer Party on the left and the Social Democratic Party on its right. The party sought to mobilize the class masses in legal struggles.((Beckmann, George M., and Genji Okubo. The Japanese Communist Party 19221945. Stanford, Calif: Stanford University Press, 1969. pp. 102104)(Hunter, Janet. Concise Dictionary of Modern Japanese History. Berkeley: University of California Press, 1984. p. 79) The party opposed Japanese intervention in China.(Polemics with other socialist partiesWhilst the leadership of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party rejected links to the International, they did identify themselves as revolutionary Marxists. The party stated that its had adopted the correct line in the proletarian movement. In their discourse, the leftwing of the socialist movement suffered from an infantile disorder whilst the rightwing was senile. However, the party was also criticized from its two flanks, the left characterizing its as bourgeois and the right claiming that the party was used by the communists.( There were also some other, regional, proletarian parties, which also found themselves having centrist positions like the Japan Labour-Farmer Party.(Colegrove, Kenneth. Labor Parties in Japan, in The American Political Science Review, Vol. 23, No. 2 (May, 1929), pp. 329363)In its 1927 thesis the Communist Party stated that the role of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party was particularly treacherous, and that the Japan Labour-Farmer Party differentiated itself from the right-wing Social Democrats merely by utilizing a fake leftist discourse.(Beckmann, George M., and Genji Okubo. The Japanese Communist Party 19221945. Stanford, Calif: Stanford University Press, 1969. p. 304) In 1928, however, the Communist Party adopted a position to work for the unification of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party and the Labour-Farmer Party. The Communist Party directed cadres to work within the Japan Labour-Farmer Party. In practice, however, they could not establish any foothold inside the party like they had in the Labour-Farmer Party.(Beckmann, George M., and Genji Okubo. The Japanese Communist Party 19221945. Stanford, Calif: Stanford University Press, 1969. pp. 143, 150)Mass organizations of the partyThe 1926 split in the Social Democratic Party was followed by a split in the Sodomei union centre. The leaders of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party were asked to resign from their leadership positions in Sodomei, as they refused they were expelled from the organization. The Japan Labour-Farmer Party regrouped their followers in the labour movement and formed a new trade union centre of their own, the Labour Union League.( In February 1927, farmers sympathizing with the party broke away from the Social Democratic Party-led Federation of Japanese Peasant Unions, and formed the All-Japan Peasant Union as the agrarian wing of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party.(Wakukawa, Seiyei. Japanese Tenant Movements, in Far Eastern Survey, Vol. 15, No. 3 (Feb. 13, 1946), pp. 4044) In October 1927, a womens organization connection to the party was formed, the National Womens League.(Mackie, Vera C. Creating Socialist Women in Japan: Gender, Labour and Activism, 19001937. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 2002. p. 138)1927 and 1928 electionsAccording to a 1927 Communist Party document, the party was estimated to have around 6,000 members.( The party won three seats in the prefectural elections in October 1927.((Large, Stephen S. Organized Workers and Socialist Politics in Interwar Japan. Cambridge Cambridgeshire: Cambridge University Press, 1981. pp. 124125) In total it had presented 32 candidates, whom together got 34,718 votes.(Banno, Junji. The Political Economy of Japanese Society. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1997. p. 238)Ahead of the 1928 national Diet elections the Japan Labour-Farmer Party proposed various far-reaching reforms, such as scrapping military education for students and introducing government regulations on food prices. The election was characterized by fierce confrontations not only between the governing side and the opposition, but also between the different proletarian parties.( Moreover, the proletarian parties lacked well-known candidates and the financial resources of the established politicians. Bribery and coercion was common in several constituencies. In Ashio, where the Japan Labour-Farmer Party leader As Hisashi stood as a candidate, police used to break up electoral meetings of the party and the local mining company contributed financially to the campaigns of As Hisashis opponents.(The party supported 14 candidates in the elections, whom together mustered 93,400 votes (0.9% of the nationwide vote). One of its candidates got elected.(Beckmann, George M., and Genji Okubo. The Japanese Communist Party 19221945. Stanford, Calif: Stanford University Press, 1969. p. 151)(Colegrove, Kenneth. The Japanese General Election of 1928, in The American Political Science Review, Vol. 22, No. 2 (May, 1928), pp. 401407) (Banno, however, states that the party had 13 candidates, with a combined vote of 86,698 votes, out of whom one was elected.)(Banno, Junji. The Political Economy of Japanese Society. Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1997. p. 240) The sole winner of a parliamentary seat of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party was Kawakami Jtar, a lawyer from Kobe.((Stockwin, J. A. A. Dictionary of the Modern Politics of Japan. Routledge in Asia. London: RoutledgeCurzon, 2003. p. 136) The overwhelming majority of the votes for the party in these elections had come from urban areas (where most of its candidates had been launched).(Following the election the three proletarian parties in the assembly (the Japan Labour-Farmer Party, Labour-Farmer Party and the Social Democratic Party) managed to form a joint parliamentary committee, in spite of their political contradictions. The committee did however not last, as the government banned the Labour-Farmer Party. The Japan Labour-Farmer Party wanted the joint committee to protest against the ban, whilst the Social Democratic Party did not want neither to protest against the ban nor retain any contacts with the Labour-Farmer Party after the ban had been issued.(Merger into the Japan Masses PartyIn December 1928 the party merged with the Masses Party, the Farmers Party and four regional political parties, forming the Masses Party.(Beckmann, George M., and Genji Okubo. The Japanese Communist Party 19221945. Stanford, Calif: Stanford University Press, 1969. p. 173)(Labour Office. Industrial Labour in Japan. Japanese economic history, 19301960, v. 5. New York: Routledge, 2000. p. 114) However, even after the merger the leadership clique of the Japan Labour-Farmer Party maintained itself as a separate grouping throughout the 1930s.(Referencesja:
28172088
Inland_Feeder
| ends             Valley Lake| maint            Water District of Southern California| length           | height           | width            | diameter         | capacity         | began            1997| open             2010| closed           | map_cue          | map_image        | map_text         | map_width        | extra            References()}} The Inland Feeder is a  high capacity water conveyance system that connects the State Water Project to the River Aqueduct and Valley Lake. The Water District of Southern California designed the system to increase Californias water supply reliability in the face of future weather pattern uncertainties, while minimizing the impact on the Francisco Bay/Joaquin Delta environment in Northern California. The feeder takes advantage of large volumes of water when available from Northern California, depositing it in surface storage reservoirs, such as Diamond Valley Lake, and local groundwater basins for use during dry periods and emergencies. This improves the quality of Southern California drinking water by allowing more uniform blending of better quality water from the state project with River supplies, which has a higher mineral content.(The feeder system includes three large tunnels, two running through the Bernardino Mountains and one running under the Riverside Badlands between Redlands and Moreno Valley. Construction began in 1997 and water began flowing through the system in mid-2010. It is currently the primary source of water for Diamond Valley Lake. Geography The feeder begins at the Devil Canyon afterbay in the foothills of Bernardino, where water is received from Silverwood Lake, and makes its way through the Arrowhead West and Arrowhead East tunnels into Highland. From there the Highland pipeline and Mentone pipeline carry water to Redlands and the northern end of the Riverside Badlands Tunnel. The Riverside Badlands Tunnel runs south into Moreno Valley where a series of pipelines carries and deposits water into Valley Lake near Hemet.() Construction Construction of the Inland Feeder began in 1997 with the excavation of the Riverside Badlands Tunnel followed by the excavation of the two Arrowhead tunnels. Water began flowing through the system in mid-2010. Construction of the tunnels was such a large project that it was featured in the television shows Marvels and to Practical on the Channel, and Channels It Bigger.() Because of the challenges faced during construction of the tunnels, the project received the 2010 E3 Environmental Sustainability Honor Award by the Academy of Environmental Engineers.() Arrowhead West Tunnel The Arrowhead West Tunnel is  long and  in diameter. The tunnel begins at Devils Canyon and is the first of the three tunnels in the feeder project. It continues east to the Waterman portal at Old Waterman Canyon Road and Highway 18. The tunnel was constructed with a grade to allow water to flow by gravity; from the time the water enters the Devil Canyon Portal until it exits the Waterman Portal, the tunnel will have dropped about 31 feet in elevation.(The west tunnel was the most difficult of the three tunnels to excavate. It was excavated using a boring machine (TBM) that took over four years to bore its way through the mountain. The TBM was launched from the Waterman Portal and tunneled in a westerly, uphill direction toward the Devil Canyon portal at a slight uphill gradient of approximately 2 inches per 100 linear feet. Crews faced many challenges during the excavation including the 2003 Fire which destroyed construction equipment at the Waterman Portal and halted tunneling for ten days. Later that year, a flash flood engulfed the Waterman Portal site and submerged the TBM. It took four months to restore operations in the aftermath of the flooding.(The TBM faced many challenges during the tunneling. Much of the tunneling took place in water-bearing strata of metamorphic and granitic rock. The presence of water, coupled with the depth of the tunnel, up to 1,100 feet underground, forced the tunneling team to deal with water pressures in excess of 150 pounds per square inch. Additionally, the tunnel alignment crossed or traversed near several significant faults and shear zones, including branches of the San Andreas and Arrowhead Springs Faults. In these faulted areas, the massive blocks of rock were broken into fine debris that were treated with grout before tunneling could safely cross through these zones. A particularly challenging reach of the tunnel alignment was encountered in the last 1,500 feet of the tunneling work as the TBM crossed five significant fault and shear zones along the tunnel alignment on its way to completion at the Devil Canyon Portal. While tunneling in this zone in mid-2008, the TBM began dipping as it encountered a 40-foot-wide fault zone of completely crushed, weak rock. Concrete and steel foundation pads were constructed in front of the cutterhead to stabilize the TBM and correct the alignment of the machine as it crossed the weak ground within the fault zone. The tunnel was completed in August 2008 with installation of pipeline being completed in 2009.( Arrowhead East Tunnel The Arrowhead East Tunnel is  long and  in diameter and runs under McKinley Mountain. It begins at the Strawberry Portal in Strawberry Canyon near State Highway 18 and continues east to the City Creek Portal near Highway 330. The East tunnel was also constructed at a slight downhill grade to allow water to flow by gravity; from the time the water enters the Strawberry Portal until it exits the City Creek Portal, the tunnel will have dropped about 55 feet in elevation.() The tunnel was constructed in two segments. Original construction commenced in early 1997 at the City Creek Portal, and mining progressed along an uphill gradient from east to west. After two years of mining effort, and more than 8,000 feet into the tunnel alignment, groundwater flows into the excavated tunnel began to steadily increase. Following extensive consultation with the Forest Service, MWD decided to halt mining on the east tunnel and install the final 12-foot diameter pipe liner in the excavated portion of the tunnel. MWD and the U.S. Forest Service worked to determine how best to complete the remaining 22,458 feet of the tunnel. This collaboration resulted in significant revisions to the original design, revisions that would ultimately allow the tunneling effort to meet the strict groundwater inflow requirements of the U.S. Forest Service Special Use Permit. The tunnel was redesigned to use bolted and gasketed precast concrete tunnel segments. Not only were these segments designed to provide structural support to the mined tunnel, but they also were capable of delivering a nearly watertight environment inside the tunnel to dramatically limit the amount of groundwater inflow during the mining operations. Construction resumed from the Strawberry portal working towards the original City Creek Portal construction.(The tunnel was constructed using a TBM, originating from the Strawberry Portal and mining at a slight downhill gradient of approximately 18 feet per 100 linear feet. Much like the West Tunnel, the TBM in the east tunnel encountered water-bearing strata of metamorphic and granitic rock. The presence of water, coupled with the depth of the tunnel below the surface, up to 2,100 feet underground, forced the tunneling team to deal with water pressures in the tunnel heading in excess of 200 pounds per square inch. Also much like the West tunnel mining efforts, the TBM had to traverse branches of the San Andreas fault, and on one occasion in late 2006, the TBM became stuck as mining efforts approached some particularly difficult ground. Hand-mining efforts above the TBM shield were eventually employed to free the stuck machine. The tunnel was completed in May 2008 with the installation of pipeline being completed in 2009.( Riverside Badlands Tunnel The $119 million Riverside Badlands Tunnel is  long, the longest tunnel in the feeder project, with a diameter of  and runs from Redlands, underneath the Crafton Hills and San Timoteo Badlands through to Moreno Valley. The tunnel ranges in depth from 50 to 850 feet and contains  of pipeline. It has two primary portals; the Gilman portal in Moreno Valley and the Opal portal in Redlands, each with permanent concrete structures. Along with the two portals are two access-ventilation shafts: one along San Timoteo Canyon road and another along Live Oak Canyon road. The tunnel was finished in 2003, a year ahead of schedule.()()Construction of the tunnel began in October 1998 with the excavation of the Gilman Portal and dewatering work at the two intermediate shafts. Tunnel excavation was carried out from November 1999 through July 2001 using a shielded TBM. Construction of the tunnel included many challenges. The TBM had to bore its way through diverse ground conditions consisting of weak sedimentary rocks; strong, fractured rocks; and alluvium, all of which were below the groundwater table. Special measures such as probing and grouting ahead of the TBM and, in particular, deep dewatering wells, were demonstrated to be effective for controlling adverse ground conditions. The project also showed the advantage of working from a portal. The Gilman Portal site proved to be ideal, supporting very efficient mining and muck disposal operations and also allowing long pipe sections to be installed in the tunnel, significantly reducing the amount of field welding required.(NotesThis article incorporates text from publications of the Metropolitan Water District of Southern California, which is in the domain.(
28193654
Treherbert_RLFC
Treherbert Rugby League Football Club was a professional league club based in Treherbert, Wales playing in the Welsh League and Northern Union.() Based at the Ground, Treherbert were one of the first professional Welsh teams, formed in 1908 but folding after just two seasons. Treherbert also produced a single player, David Galloway, who gained international caps directly from the team. FormationIn 1908 Treherbert was a large village at the head of the Rhondda Valley, a heavy industrial coal mining area. The village already had a union team, RFC, but after the creation of two rugby league clubs in 1907, Tydfil RLFC and Vale RLFC, attempts were made to form a professional team to play in the Northern Rugby League. In April 1908, the Treherbert and District Northern Union Club Ltd was formed with capital of 500.(Lush (1998), pg. 32) The team played at the Athletic Ground in the village, and set their headquarters at the local pub, the Dunraven Hotel.( Treherbert were admitted to the Northern Union, along with fellow Rhondda team Mid-Rhondda. Treherbert not only joined the Northern Union, but with the addition of Barry and Aberdare, the six newly formed teams set up the League.Club history1908-1909Treherberts first game of the 1908/09 season was on 5 September 1908 against fellow Welsh club Barry, Treherbert lost 3-6.(Lush (1998), pg. 259) A week later the club faced their first team from the Northern Leagues, a home tie with Halifax which Treherbert being outscored seven tries to two, losing 6-27.(  The very next game was against Mid-Rhondda, and resulted in Treherberts first win. Although failing to beat the north of England teams, they continued to do well against their fellow Welsh teams. On 17 December 1908, Treherbert faced the touring Australian national team. In front of a crowd of 4000,(Kangaroo Tour: 1908-1909 Sean Fagan, rl1908.com) the Welsh club lost to Australia by a narrow 3-6 score, the Kangaroos outscoring Treherbert by two tries to one.(Lush (1998), pg. 33) Treherberts results continued to be poor in the second half of the season, including a heavy 29-0 defeat away to Dewsbury. More difficulties occurred when, in a 10-0 defeat to Merthyr, two newly acquired players, Bob Williams and H. Harding, were prevented from playing after their joining forms had been destroyed.( After a further loss to Ebbw Vale and a draw with Barry,( Treherbert faced Merthyr again, this time a Welsh League match. Treherberts win over Merthyr was described as one of the greatest surprises of the football season,(  but bad followed good, when in the last game of the season, in a Welsh League encounter with Mid-Rhondda, the referee left the pitch before the end of the game in protest of both teams rough play.( Treherbert finished their first season with four wins, a draw and 13 loses, finishing 28th out of 31 clubs.( 1909-1910Treherberts second season was also their last, Barry, Aberdare and Mid-Rhondda had all already folded after just a single season, leaving only three clubs to contest the Welsh League. The season was a poor experience on and off the pitch, starting with a 10-22 loss to Kingston Rovers, which was followed by a further straight loses. To complicate matters further, the attendance figures at home matches were poor, last minute team changes were frequent and their club secretary, H.R. Jones, resigned during the season.( The only good news the club received was when one of their forwards, David Galloway was selected for the Wales national team, in a late 1909 away encounter with England. Galloway did enough to impress as four months later he was reselected for the national team again, again against England, but this time played on home soil at Ebbw Vales Bridge End Field.(Gate (1986), pg. 141)On 12 February 1910, Treherbert played their last home game, a 5-7 loss to Merthyr. The next Monday, the team failed to appear for the Welsh League clash with Ebbw Vale.(  They then failed to honour an away fixture with Hull Kingston Rovers, who instead arranged a match with a newly formed Coventry team instead.(  Almost two months after their last home game, Treherbert managed to put together a team to face Oldham, a terrible 13-54 loss. After the game the press described Treherbert as pathetic.( This was the end of Treherbert. At the Northern Rugby Leagues 1910 AGM in Huddersfield, the Northern Union secretary stated that Treherbert were defaulters and that although they had been given help by other clubs they had failed to fulfill their fixture list, and were therefore not eligible to return to the Union the following season.( Treherbert were replaced the next season by Coventry and never played a league game again.(Players of notePlayers Earning International Caps While at Treherbert*David Galloway won two caps for Wales while at Treherbert in 1909 and 1910 against EnglandBibliography* * * * Notes
28221082
Yin_Tong
Yin Tong (Hanzi: , Pinyin: Yn Tng, Wade-Giles: Yin Tung) (1889(By Zhong Renjia and Xu Youchun, different view says 1890.) - December 30, 1942) was a politician and military personnel in the of China. He was an important person during the Government of the Republic of China and Jingwei regime. Adult Name was Tongsheng (). He was born in Jiangyin, Jiangsu. Biography  After graduating the Nanjing Fourth Military Junior High School, Yin Tong went to Japan where he graduated the Military Account School (:ja:. Later he returned to China, in 1913, he was appointed chief staff officer to the 1st brigade, 3rd division, Jiangsu Army. In 1917 he was transferred to be Chief of the Account Department, Military of Entering the War ().From 1921 Yin Tong successively held the positions of Chief of the Statistics Division in the Military Ministry, Head of the Zichuan () Mining Office, etc. In 1928 he was appointed Supervisor of Salt industry office, Hebei Province. On that time, he, Ke (), Liang () and Yin Rugeng (Ju-keng) was regarded as Four Prominent Figures of Japan hand.(He Lipo.)In May 1933 Yin Tong became a Chinese negotiator on the Truce. In next month he was appointed advisor to the Beiping Political Affairs Readjustment Commission() and member to the Requisitioning Committee on North Chinese Military Region. He became a brain to the Chairperson of the Readjustment Commission Fu(Committee for Problems of East Asia, The Biographies of Most Recent Chinese Important People, p.3. ), and was in charge of negotiating with Japan. In October he was transferred to director of the Administrative bureau of Beining Railway (). He successively held the positions of adviser and counselor of the Ministry for Railway.In December 1937 Kemin established the Provisional Government of the Republic of China, Yin Tong also participated in it. In next March he was appointed Governor to the General Office for Construction () of the same Government. In March 1940 the Wang Jingwei regime was established, he was appointed Executive member of the China Political Council () and Member to the Central Political Committee of Kuomintang (Wangs Clique), etc. He also held the position of Governor to the General Office for Construction, the North China Political Council.   Yin Tong died by Uremia with disease at Beijing on 30 December, 1942.(Shimbun (Tokyo), 31 December, 1942.) References  Footnotes * Zheng Renjia (), The biographical sketch of Yin Tong ()Biographical Writings () Website (need Traditional Chinese font)* isbn  * He Lipo (), Eastern Hebeis fake government in Self-Governing Movement on North China ()21st CenturyOnline Version, Volume 49, April, 2006.  * isbn  978-7-202-03014-1* isbn  7-101-01320-1* isbn  ja:zh:
28234681
Ombilin
Ombilin, known formally historically as PT Tambang Batubara Ombilin (TBO) is an open-pit coal mine near Sawahlunto, located approximately 70 kilometres northeast of Padang, Sumatra. Production in the mine peaked in the 1950s but it was later closed. In recent times, the Chinese have invested $100 million to reopen the mine, and the National Technology Import-Export Corporation (CNTIC) and working with Bukit Asam to exploit further reserves which as of 2003 totalled roughly 100 million tons according to Antara.(PT BUKIT ASAM TO EXPLOIT COAL IN OMBILIN WITH CHINESE FIRM., April 7, 2003) Current activities On 2011, the region continues to bring benefits to its contituents through reforestation of the former mining location and its conversion into a tourist destination. A well maintenance pit with sufficient lighting and air supply from blower attract local and foreign tourists mainly from Malaysia and Singapore. Seeing the pit cost Rp.30,000 (US$3.5) per person.(http://www.thejakartapost.com/news/2011/03/23/from-coal-mine-tourist-spot.html)ReferencesExternal links*Infomine
28259864
Laskar_Pelangi_(film)
 Laskar Pelangi (The Rainbow Troops) is a 2008 Indonesian film adapted from the popular same titled novel by Hirata. The movie follows a group of 10 schoolboys and their two inspirational teachers as they struggle with poverty and develop hopes for the future in Gantong Village on the farming and tin mining island of Belitung off the east coast of Sumatra. The film is the highest grossing in Indonesian box office history(  Local Movie to Open Jakarta Film Festival The Jakarta Globe, Lisa Siregar, June 22, 2009) and won a number of local and international awards.SynopsisThe movie, set in the 1970s, opens on the first day of the year at a Muhammadiyah elementary school on Belitung. The school needs 10 students but is one short until near the end of the day, when a straggler fills out the ranks for their teachers, Muslimah and Harfan. Muslimah dubs the children The Rainbow Troops (sometimes translated as The Rainbow Warriors) and the movie traces their development and relationships with the teachers.Background and impactThe film reportedly cost 8 billion rupiah (US$890,000) to make and was a year in production. Most of the child actors in the film are from Belitung, and Producer Mira Lesmana explained that choice by saying: In my opinion, there wont be any actors with a deeper connection to the roles than those who were born and lived in Belitong their entire life.(  Laskar Pelangi: The Audacity of Hope The Jakarta Post, Iwan Seti, September 7, 2008)  The Belitung Provincial government declared some of the locations used in the film as areas of importance to culture and tourism in 2010, and provincial tourism chief Yan Megawandi said the decision was primarily made to help raise funds for the Muhammadiyah elementary school on which the film and novels story are centered.(  Lokasi Pengambilan Gambar Laskar Pelangi Dilestarikan Republika newspaper, June 25, 2010) The films local and international success fueled a tourism boom on Belitung, with Indonesian airline Garuda reopening direct service from Jakarta to Pangkalpinang, Belitungs capital, on June 1, 2009. A provincial government official that month said he had no hard data on the increase in tourist arrivals as a result of the film, but said that almost all seats on flights to the island from Jakarta were booked in the first week it was open and that most arrivals were asking about information on how to visit the films locations.(  Melihat Bumi Laskar Pelangi Kompas Newspaper, June 8, 2009)Awards* Best Film, Bandung Film Festival, 2009* Best Film, Film Festival, 2009* Nomination for Best Film and Best Editor, Film Awards, 2009* SIGNIS Award, Kong International Film Festival 2009* Golden Butterfly Award, 23rd International Children & Young Adults Film Festival, Iran, 2009* 3rd Place Audience Award, 11th Udine Far East International Film Festival, Italy, 2009 (  Andrea Hirata Official website)References
28275292
Wongawilli
 location1 WollongongWongawilli is a southern suburb of Wollongong, Australia and is located at the foot hills of the escarpment. The word Wonga is a native aboriginal word meaning native pigeon. It contains a mixture of small rural properties and family homes. It houses a Rural Fire Service station and a small community hall where the Wongawilli colonial dance club meets regularly. The community has had a long history with coal mining, with the mine opening in 1916.(http://www.nswmin.com.au/Mining-in-NSW/History-of-Mining/Illawarra-Region/Illawarra-Mining-History/default.aspx Mining in New South Wales, ) Since this time the mine has expanded and has had multiple owners, and is currently owned and operated by the Indian company Gujarat NRE.Notable residents*Actor Jarratt born 1951. References * * * * 
28293305
Navachab_Gold_Mine
The Navachab Gold Mine is an open-pit mine situated near Karibib, in the Region of Namibia. The operation is owned by Ashanti.(Annual Report 2009 AngloGold Ashanti website, accessed: 27 July 2010)(Country report: Namibia AngloGold Ashanti website, accessed: 8 August 2010)Navachab, the only gold mine in Namibia, takes its name from the local Navachab farm, which the gold deposit was found beneath. The deposit is located 6 km south of the Okahandja-Swakopmund road.()HistoryThe first gold discoveries in Namibia were made in 1899. Gold mining begun in the country in 1933 but was later abandoned again because of low grades.((The Navachab gold deposit was discovered in October 1984 as a result of an exploration programme conducted. An appraisal was carried out in 1986, followed by feasibility study in 1987, which decided to proceed with the development of the mine. Construction work at the site began in 1988 and was completed within 21 months. Production started at Navachab in 1989, pouring its first gold bar in December 1989.( Originally jointly-owned by the Erongo Exploration and Mining Company (70%), the Metal Mining Company of Canada (20%) and Rand Mines Exploration, AngloGold acquired a 70% interest in the mine in 1998, which it increased to a 100% the following year.( In 2004, AngloGold and Ashanti merged to form AngloGold Ashanti.The mine is the only gold mine in Namibia.( In 2003, the AngloGold made the decision to switch to owner-mining instead of using contractors. The decision was made after the life of the mine could be extended considerably.(Navachab to switch to owner mining miningweekly.com, published: 17 October 2003, accessed: 8 August 2010) It was later claimed by some former contract employees that they had been promised permanent jobs with AngloGold after the switch but not received them.(Navachab shrugs off claims on job offers Namibian, published: 7 July 2004, accessed: 8 August 2010) In 2009, the mine employed 578 people, all of which were permanent employees.(For the first time since the start of operations at Navachab, the mine experienced a fatal accident on 2 June 2009 when a drill-rig operator was fatally injured.(ProductionProduction figures of the recent past were: References  External links * AngloGold Ashanti website* Navachap mine (NAM-00072) Secretariat of the Caribbean and Pacific Group of States website* Gold Geological Survey of Namibia website* Controls of gold-quartz vein formation during regional folding in amphibolite-facies, marble-dominated metasediments of the Navachab Gold Mine in the Pan-African Damara Belt, Namibia
28307822
Drummond_Mine_explosion
The Drummond Mine explosion , also the Drummond Colliery Disaster, was a mining accident that happened in Westville, County, Nova Scotia on May 13, 1837.The Drummond mine was, in 1873, considered Canadas leading colliery. However, small fires were constantly erupting in the seams. On May 13, Fireman Robert McLeod started a small fire with gunpowder on a ledge of coal and attempted to extinguish it in the usual way, with a bucket of water. Unable to do so after 20 minutes and several buckets, he left and alerted the manager, James Dunn. When he returned, the blaze had grown beyond control. He ran for safety, just as the first explosion occurred, around 12:15. The first explosion killed and wounded many in the mine, including manager James Dunn. As miners on the surface were discussing the rescue of the injured, the second explosion occurred. This was far more powerful, acting with the force of a volcano.() Towers of flame spewed miners, timber, and rocks from all the mine entrances. A closed older mine, the Campbell Workings, connected to the Drummond mine was also reopened by the blast. The second explosion was followed by others. The fire was finally contained and extinguished five days later by diverting streams into all openings(, republished in ) and then filling them with gravel, clay and debris. Seventy men either died in the explosion or were sealed in the mine.()CauseThe causes are uncertain. A firedamp explosion, likely of sulfide, that triggered off a dust explosion is most likely. The mine had been just re-opened following a strike, leading to a buildup of foul air.( A coroners inquest ruled that the fire had followed from the use of gunpowder in the mine.()ReferencesExternal links* The Drummond Colliery Disaster, 1873 A History of Mining Activity in Nova Scotia, 1720-1992* The Drummond Colliery Disaster History of Westville
28336429
Spratly_Islands_dispute
The Spratly Islands dispute is a dispute over the ownership of the Islands, a group of islands located in the China Sea. States staking claims to various islands are: the Republic of China, the of China (Taiwan), Malaysia, the Philippines, Vietnam, and Brunei. All except Brunei occupy some of the islands.The Spratly Islands are important for a number of reasons: the Spratly area holds significant reserves of oil and gas, it is a productive area for world fishing and commercial shipping, and coastal countries would get an extended continental shelf. But some countries, like the Peoples Republic of China, the Republic of China, and Vietnam make claims based on historical sovereignty over the islands.Reasons for the disputeHydrocarbonsThere are multiple reasons why the neighboring nations would be interested in the Spratly Islands. In 1968 oil was discovered in the region. The Geology and Mineral Resources Ministry of the Peoples Republic of China (PRC) has estimated that the Spratly area holds oil and natural gas reserves of 17.7 billion tons (1.60  1010 kg), as compared to the 13 billion tons (1.17  1010 kg) held by Kuwait, placing it as the fourth largest reserve bed in the world. These large reserves assisted in intensifying the situation and propelled the territorial claims of the neighboring countries.In 1968, the Philippines started to take their claims more seriously and stationed troops on three islands which had been claimed by the adventurer Cloma as part of Freedomland.() In 1973 Vietnamese troops were stationed on five islands.()On 11 March 1976, the first major Philippine oil discovery occurred off the coast of Palawan, within the Spratly Islands territory, and these oil fields now account for fifteen percent of all petroleum consumed in the Philippines. In 1992, the PRC and Vietnam granted oil exploration contracts to U.S. oil companies that covered overlapping areas in the Spratlys. In May 1992, the China National Offshore Oil Corporation (CNOOC) and Energy (a U.S. company based in Colorado) signed a cooperation contract for the joint exploration of the Wanan Bei-21 block, a 25,155 km section of the southwestern South China Sea that includes Spratly Island areas. Part of the Crestones contract covered Vietnams blocks 133 and 134, where PetroVietnam, PetroStar Energy(USA) and ConocoPhillips Vietnam Exploration & Production, a unit of ConocoPhillips, agreed to evaluate prospects in April 1992. This led to a confrontation between China and Vietnam, with each demanding that the other cancel its contract.Commercial fishingAn additional motive is the regions role as one of the worlds most productive areas for commercial fishing. In 1988, for example, the South China Sea accounted for eight percent of the total world catch, a figure which has certainly risen. The PRC has predicted that the South China Sea holds combined fishing and oil and gas resources worth one trillion dollars. There have already been numerous clashes between the PRC, the Philippines and other nations over foreign fishing vessels in its Economic Zone (EEZ) and the media regularly report the arrest of Chinese fishermen. In 1984, Brunei established an exclusive fishing zone encompassing Reef in the southeastern Spratly Islands.(Borneo Post: When All Else Fails Additionally, pages 48 and 51 of The Brunei-Malaysia Dispute over Territorial and Maritime Claims in International Law by R. Haller-Trost, Clive Schofield, and Martin Pratt, published by the International Boundaries Research Unit, University of Durham, UK, points out that this is, in fact, a territorial dispute between Brunei and other claimants over the ownership of one above-water feature (Louisa Reef))Commercial shippingThe region is also one of the busiest shipping lanes in the world. During the 1980s, at least two hundred and seventy ships passed through the Spratly Islands region each day, and currently more than half of the worlds supertanker traffic, by tonnage, passes through the regions waters every year. Tanker traffic through the South China Sea is over three times greater than through the Canal and five times more than through the Canal; twenty five percent of the worlds crude oil passes through the South China Sea.Confrontations and other incidencesThere have been occasional naval clashes over the Spratly Islands. In 1988, China and Vietnam clashed at sea over possession of Johnson Reef in the Spratlys. Chinese gunboats sank Vietnamese transport ships supporting a landing party of Vietnamese soldiers. 64 Vietnamese soldiers were killed. (http://www.bbc.co.uk/vietnamese/vietnam/2009/10/091002_truong_van_hien_iv.shtml)On May 23, 2011, Philippine President Aquino III warned the Chinese defense minister of a possible race in the region if tensions worsened over disputes in the South China Sea. Aquino said he told visiting Chinese Defense Minister Guanglie in their meeting that such an arms race could result if there were more encounters in the disputed and potentially oil-rich Spratly islands. The Philippines warned China that it might increase its military capabilities. (http://globalnation.inquirer.net/2247/philippines-warns-of-arms-race-in-south-china-sea)Extended continental shelf claimsThe Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea (UNCLOS) procedure for countries with coastlines to submit claims for their continental shelf to be extended beyond 200 nautical miles of their shores brought the spotlight back to the South China Sea and Spratly Islands in May 2009.() Two such submissions were made - one by Vietnam for a claim over the northern portion of the sea which included the Islands, and another jointly by Vietnam and Malaysia for a joint claim over a defined area in the middle of the sea between the two countries which included part of the Spratly Islands. Brunei, a potential claimant, has not submitted such a claim but had provided preliminary information to the United Nations notifying it of its intention to claim a continental shelf beyond 200 nautical miles from its shores.(See the Commission on the Limits of the Continental Shelfs website)China immediately issued protests over the two submissions and called on the United Nations not to consider them. It also issued a stern warning to countries not to claim the islands which it said were its sovereign territory.()Moves towards resolutionDiplomatic movesi duyt binh  Trng Sa.JPG|thumb|230|Vietnamese troops on Spratly IslandFollowing a 1995 dispute between China and the Philippines, an ASEAN-brokered agreement was reached between the PRC and ASEAN member nations whereby one country would inform the other of any military movement within the disputed territory and that there would be no further construction. The agreement was promptly violated by China and Malaysia. Claiming storm damage, seven Chinese naval vessels entered the area to repair fishing shelters in Panganiban Reef. Malaysia erected a structure on Investigator Shoal and landed at Rizal Reef. In response the Philippines lodged formal protests, demanded the removal of the structures, increased naval patrols in Kalayaan and issued invitations to American politicians to inspect the PRC bases by plane. The Philippine senate also debated to send troops and navy forces to attempt the invasion in the islands.In the early 21st century, the situation is improving. China recently held talks with ASEAN countries aimed at realizing a proposal for a free trade area between the ten countries involved. China and ASEAN have also been engaged in talks to create a code of conduct aimed at easing tensions in the disputed islands. On 5 March 2002, an agreement was reached, setting forth the desire of the claimant nations to resolve the problem of sovereignty without further use of force. In November 2002, a Declaration on the Conduct of Parties in the South China Sea was signed, easing tensions but falling short of a legally binding code of conduct.Declaration on the Conduct of Parties in the South China Sea 2002This declaration(Online version available from the ASEAN website.) was signed by the 10 foreign ministers of ASEAN countries and China on 4 November 2002 in Phnom Penh where the signatory countries pledged to resolve their sovereignty disputes in a peaceful manner, without resorting to the use of force and through direct negotiations among the countries concerned. The parties also undertook to exercise self-restraint with activities that would complicate or escalate disputes and affect peace and stability, including refraining from inhabiting on the presently uninhabited islands, reefs, shoals, cays, and other features.In the interim, the parties pledged to carry out confidence building measures, such as by holding dialogues and exchange of views as appropriate between their defense and military officials; ensuring just and humane treatment of all persons who are in danger or distress; notifying on a voluntary basis other Parties concerned of any impending joint/combined military exercise; and exchanging, on a voluntary basis, relevant information.The Parties may also explore or undertake cooperative activities such as marine environmental protection; marine scientific research; safety of navigation and communication at sea; search and rescue operation; and combating transnational crime, including but not limited to trafficking in illicit drugs, piracy and armed robbery at sea, and illegal traffic in arms.United States interventionStates Secretary of State Clinton announced on July 23, 2010 in Vietnam that the U.S. had a national interest in... respect for international law in the South China Sea and supported a regional solution to the dispute. This was seen as a victory for Vietnam,() because Vietnam had been seeking to negotiate the status of the Paracels multilaterally through forums like ASEAN, while China prefers bilateral negotiations.() Small country claimants such the Philippines were secretly pleased... to have a friend in court, i.e. the United States, an opinion in the Manila Times claimed, despite the Philippine Government criticizing the intervention.() Chinese foreign minister Jiechi said that Vietnams invitation to the United States to mediate was an attack on China.()Various claimsBruneiBrunei claims the part of the China Seas nearest to it as part of its shelf and Economic Zone (EEZ). In 1984, Brunei declared an EEZ encompassing the above-water islets it claims in Reef.((Territorial claims in the Spratly and Paracel Islands, globalsecurity.org) Brunei does not practice military control in the area.Basis of Bruneis claimBruneis claims to the reef are based on the of the Sea.(United Nations Law of the Sea) It states that the southern part of the Chain is actually a part of its continental shelf and therefore a part of its territory and resources.(Case of the Spratly Island Dispute)MalaysiaMalaysia has militarily occupied three islands that it considers to be within its continental shelf. Reef (Layang Layang) has been turned into an island through land reclamation and hosts a dive resort.The Malaysian military currently occupies Reef (Terumbu Ubi), Reef (Terumbu Mantanani) and Reef (Terumbu Layang or Pulau Layang Layang).(Basis of Malaysias claimMalaysias claims are based upon the continental shelf principle, and have clearly defined coordinates.(Peoples Republic of China and Republic of China (Taiwan) The Peoples Republic of China (PRC) claim all of the Spratly Islands as part of China and had a historical naval presence. Recently, they have had a profound military impact on the area.The Republic of China (ROC), which ruled China before 1949 and has been confined to Taiwan since 1949, also claims all of the Spratly Islands. The ROC occupies Aba, the largest island.From 1932 to 1935, the ROC continued to include the territory in its administrative area through the Map Compilation Committee. When France claimed nine islands of the territory in 1933, it immediately encountered a revolt from Chinese fishermen and a protest from the Republic of China government in Nanking. Although China continued to claim the islands, the Sino-Japanese war drew its attention for the meantime from 1937 onwards. After the second world war, China reclaimed sovereignty over the islands through post World War II arrangements based on various treaties of the Allied Powers(Jurisprudential Evidence To Support Chinas Sovereignty over the Nansha Islands;Historical Evidence To Support Chinas Sovereignty over Nansha Islands;International Recognition Of Chinas Sovereignty over the Nansha Islands, Foreign Ministry of the Peoples Republic of China) and China built a stone marker on the island.In 1947, the ROC government renamed 159 islands in the area and published the Map of the South China Sea Islands. The ROC was the first government to establish a physical presence in the Spratley Islands. It has occupied Aba Island, the largest island in the Spratleys, constantly since 1956.()Image:1958 diplomatic note from phamvandong to zhouenlai.jpg|thumb|In 1958, North Vietnamese Prime Minister Vn ng sent a formal note to Enlai.In 1958, the Peoples Republic of China, having taken over mainland China and having left the Republic of China with control over Taiwan, Penghu, Kinmen, Matsu, and some outlying islands, issued a declaration of a 12 nautical mile limit territorial waters that encompassed the Spratly Islands. Vietnams prime minister, Vn ng, sent a formal note to PRCs Premier Enlai to recognize these claims; and stated that the Government of the Democratic Republic of Vietnam (North Vietnam) respects the decision on the 12 nautical mile limit territorial waters, although South Vietnam continued to claim sovereignty over the islands.Today, the Liberation Army and the of China Armed Forces are both stationed in several islands, including the largest, Island.Basis for PRCs and ROCs claimsThe PRC and ROC base their claims on the belief that the islands have been an integral part of China for nearly two thousand years and that neighboring countries and European Powers took advantage of Chinas poor condition and diversity to impinge on its sovereignty.China claims to have discovered the islands in the Dynasty in 2 BC. The islands were claimed to have been marked on maps compiled during the time of Han Dynasty and Wu (one of the Kingdoms). Since the Dynasty in the 12th century, several islands that may be the Spratlys have been labeled as Chinese territory,(;) followed by the Dynasty() and the Dynasty from the 13th to 19th Century.() In 1755,()() archaeological surveys the remains of Chinese pottery and coins have been found in the islands and are cited as proof for the PRC claim.(Undersea Treasure Chest Stirs up Tensions, BBC, April 29, 1999.)In addition, the PRCs military presence ensures a tangible claim to other potential challengers of sovereignty over at least those inhabited areas.Criticisms to the PRCs and ROCs claimsSurveying an area without establishing a civilization there or a military garrison does not hold the same political weight as staking an official claim. However, the PRCs claim to the Spratly Islands is grounded in the philosophy that since they were present there first they rightly have sovereignty.Many of these claims to sovereignty come directly from the of Foreign Affairs of the Peoples Republic of China. There is also doubt as to whether these sources state a claim of sovereignty or simply mention the Spratlys alongside other foreign lands.Claims of pottery being found are mostly shipwrecked treasure from Chinese galleons that sailed through the area and did not necessarily come from anyone who inhabited or even visited the islands.(PhilippinesThe Philippines base their claims of sovereignty over the Spratlys on the issues of nullius and geography. The Philippines contend their claim was Res nullius as there was no effective sovereignty over the islands until the 1930s when France and then Japan acquired the islands. When Japan renounced their sovereignty over the islands according to the Francisco Treaty, there was a relinquishment of the right to the islands without any special beneficiary. Therefore, argue the Philippines, the islands became Res nullius and available for annexation.This is an anachronistic claim however, because the Philippines did not register these claims until the 1970s. In 1956, a private Filipino citizen, Cloma, unilaterally declared a state on 53 features in the South China Sea, calling it Freedomland. As the of China moved to occupy the main island in response, Cloma sold his claim to the Philippine government, which annexed (jure) the islands in 1978, calling them Kalayaan.The Philippine claim to Kalayaan on a geographical basis can be summarized using the assertion that Kalayaan is distinct from other island groups in the South China Sea, because of the size of the biggest island in the Kalayaan group.() A second argument used by the Philippines regarding their geographical claim over the Spratlys is that all the islands claimed by the Philippines lie within its 200-mile Economic Zone according to the 1982 Nations Convention on the Law of the Sea. This argument still requires that the islands were nullius, though.() The Philippines also argue, under maritime law that the Peoples Republic of China can not extend its baseline claims to the Spratlys because the PRC is not an archipelagic state.VietnamVietnams response to Chinas claim is that Chinese records on Qianli Changsha and Wanli Shitang are in fact records about non-Chinese territories.(The Sino-Vietnamese difference on the Hoang Sa and Truong Sa archipelagos, Luu Van Loi, 1996, The Gioi publisher)  For example, Changsha and Shitang were referred to in the ancient Chinese texts Ling Wai Dai Da (Ling Wai Dai Da (Information on Things Beyond the Passes) by Zhou Choufei) and Zhu Fan Zhi (Zhu Fan Zhi (Notes on Foreign Countries) by Zhao Juguo) as being in the Sea of Jiaozhi, Jiaozhi being the old name for a Chinese province in modern day northern Vietnam (Giao Ch), or as writings on foreign countries.Vietnams view is that the Chinese records do not constitute the declaration and exercise of sovereignty and that China did not declare sovereignty over the Spratlys until after World War II.On the other hand, Vietnam claims the Spratlys based on international law on declaring and exercising sovereignty.Vietnamese claims that it has occupied the Spratley and the Paracel islands at least since the 17th century, when they were not under the sovereignty of any state, and that they exercised sovereignty over the two archipelagos continuously and peacefully until they were invaded by Chinese armed forces.() In Bin Tp Lc (Miscellaneous Records of Pacification in the Border Area) by the scholar Qu n, Hong Sa (Islands), and Trng Sa (Spratly Islands) were defined as belonging to Qung Ngi District. In Nam Nht Thng Ton  (Dai Nam Unified Map), an atlas of Vietnam completed in 1838, Trng Sa was shown as Vietnamese territory. Vietnam had conducted many geographical and resource surveys of the islands. The results of these surveys have been recorded in Vietnamese literature and history published since the 17th century. After the treaty signed with the Dynasty, France represented Vietnam in international affairs and exercised sovereignty over the islands.The Declaration, drafted by the Allies and China towards the end of World War II, listed the territories that the Allies intended to strip from Japan and return to China. Despite China being among the authors of the declaration, this list did not include the Spratlys. Vietnams response to Chinas claim that the Cairo Declaration somehow recognized the latters sovereignty over the Spratlys is that this claim has no basis in fact.At the San Francisco Conference on the peace treaty with Japan, the Soviet Union proposed that the Paracels and Spratlys be recognized as belonging to China. This proposal was rejected by an overwhelming majority of the delegates. On July 7, 1951, Tran Van Huu, head of the i Governments delegation to the conference declared that the Paracels and Spratlys were part of Vietnamese territory. This declaration met with no challenge from the 51 representatives at the conference.The text of the of San Francisco listed the Spratlys as not part of the list of territories to be returned to China.(San Francisco Peace Treaty)After the French left, the Vietnamese government exercised sovereignty over the islands. Up to the end of the War the army of the South Vietnamese still held military control over the majority of the Spratly islands. After the War, the unified Vietnam SRV (Socialist Republic of Vietnam) continued to claim the Spratly islands as an integral part of Vietnam, accordingly the Phan Van Dong DRV notice to the PRC in 1958 had not ceded the ROV and consequently the SRV claims, hence that Notice became of no effect on the ROV/SRV rights.Vietnam currently occupies 31 islands. They are organized as a district of Hoa Province. At the 12th National Assembly Election held early in Trng Sa, the people and soldiers also voted for their local district government for the first time. For the first time, Trng Sa is organized like a normal inland district, with a townlet (th trn Trng Sa) and two communes (x Sinh Tn, x Song T Ty). Forty nine people were elected to the communes peoples councils.Tabular listing of features showing country possessionsOccupied featuresA feature is occupied by a country if one of the following is true:*Soldiers and/or civilian citizens of a country are present in the feature, either by building structures over the feature to house the citizens (most features are of this type) or by manning a ship anchored over the feature (Philippine-occupied Irving Reef is of this type).*Regularly visited by soldiers of a country, not necessarily having soldiers present in it 24 hours. These features must lie near (within ) a feature occupied by the country in the way of the first condition. Presence of structures is not necessary. This is the case of Philippine-occupied Flat Island and Lankiam Cay where soldiers stationed at Nanshan Island and Loaita Island respectively, regularly visit on a daily basis.The effective visible distance of horizon from a 15 meter (typical large structure) height above sea-level is . This makes features occupied by the second condition to be also labeled as occupied since they can be guarded far away. However not all features within the  radius can be considered as absolutely occupied. This is especially true for features that lie between and within  of two or more features occupied by different countries. (See Virtually Occupied or Controlled table)Virtually occupied or controlledAn unoccupied feature that lies within  radius of an occupied feature, provided that it does not lie between the occupied feature and another occupied feature controlled by a different country and is not within  of the feature occupied by the other country, can be considered as virtually occupied.  is the effective horizon distance that can be seen from a 15 meter high structure. The nearer the feature, the better.While virtually occupied features are not actual occupied features (e.g., no structures built and no soldiers are stationed or regularly visits), they are on the other hand largely controlled. If a naval vessel of another country was seen within the effective horizon of a feature and in an inconvenient direction, it can be taken as a military assault. Thus, the forces occupying the feature may attack the vessel. Claimant countries currently cannot upgrade the status of these virtually occupied features to absolutely occupied because other countries may view this as an expansion motive which clearly violates the Code of Conduct signed in 2002. Also, making the virtually occupied to absolutely occupied requires building of structures which will serve as barracks of new soldiers who will guard it. Building of structures in unoccupied (including virtually occupied) features is prohibited by the Code of Conduct.Note that most virtually occupied features are by the Philippines. Vietnam in the past, prior to signing of the Code of Conduct, have acquired many features as much as it can. As of now, it has a total of 26 occupied features. Whenever it occupied a feature in the past, it immediately occupies features which are near to it. Example of this is South Reef which Vietnam immediately occupied after it successfully invaded Southwest Cay. Thus, no feature has been virtually controlled by Vietnam since it always occupy features which it can see within its horizon. Also, Vietnams occupied features in Tizard and Union Banks are near other countries occupied features. Hence, many unoccupied features near to Vietnams occupied features in these banks also lie near other countries occupied features. As for Malaysia, it only occupied reefs at the southern tip of the Spratly chain where features are dispersed. No other features can be found within the horizon of Malaysian-occupied features.Unoccupied featuresClaimed features by country but occupied by other country20th century timeline{|| 1900 - || Vietnams Nguyn Dynasty continued to assert that the state Bac Hai Company had exercised Vietnams sovereignty in the Spratlys since the 18th century.|-| 1927 || The French ship SS De Lanessan conducted a scientific survey of the Spratly Islands|-| 1930 || France launched a second expedition with the La Malicieuse, which raised the French flag on an island called le de la Tempte. Chinese fishermen were present on the island, but the French made no attempt to expel them.|-| 1932 || The of China sent the French government a memorandum contesting their sovereignty over the Paracels, stating that the Paracels were the extreme south of Chinese territories, based on the Chinese interpretation of the 1887 treaty ending the War.|-| 1933 || Three French ships had taken control of nine of the largest islands and declared French sovereignty over the archipelago to the great powers including the UK, US, China and Japan, according to the principles found in the Berlin convention. France administered the area as part of Cochinchina. Japanese companies applied to the French authority in Cochichina for phosphate mining licence in the Spratlys.|-| 1939 || The of Japan disputed French sovereignty over the islands, citing that Japan was the first country to discover the islands.Japan declared its intention to place the island group under its jurisdiction. France and the United Kingdom protested and reasserted French sovereignty claims.|-| 1941 || Japan forcibly occupied the island group and remained in control until the end of World War II, administering the area as part of Taiwan. A submarine base was established on Aba.|-| 1945 || After Japans surrender at the end of World War II, the Republic of China claimed the Spratly Islands. The Republic of China sent troops to Aba, and Chinese landing forces erected sovereignty markers.|-| 1946 || France dispatched warships to the islands several times but no attempts are made to evict Chinese forces.|-| 1947 || China produced a map with 9 undefined dotted lines, and claimed all of the islands within those lines.() France demanded the Chinese withdraw from the islands.|-| 1948 || France ceased maritime patrols near the islands and China withdrew most of its troops.|-| 1951 || At the 1951 San Francisco Conference on the Peace Treaty with Japan, the Soviet Union proposed that the Spratlys belonged to China. This was overhelmingly rejected by the delegates. The delegates from Vietnam, which at that time was a French protectorate, declared sovereignty over the Paracel and the Spratly Islands, which was not opposed by any delegate at the conference. China did not attend the conference and was not a signatory of the treaty.|-| 1956 || Tomas Cloma, director of the Maritime Institute of the Philippines, claimed sovereignty over much of the Spratly Islands, naming his territory Kalayaan (Freedomland). The Peoples Republic of China, the Republic of China, France, South Vietnam, the United Kingdom and the Netherlands all issued protests. The Republic of China and South Vietnam launched naval units to the islands, though South Vietnam left no permanent garrison. Later in the year, South Vietnam declared its annexation of the Spratly Islands as part of its Tuy Province.|-| 1958 || The Peoples Republic of China issued a declaration defining its territorial waters which encompassed the Spratly Islands. North Vietnams prime minister, Vn ng, sent a formal note to Enlai, stating that the Government of the Democratic Republic of Vietnam respects the decision on the 12 nautical mile limit of territorial waters. Both the South Vietnamese government and the communist revolutionary movement in South Vietnam continued to assert that the Spratlys belonged to Vietnam.|-| 1961-3   || Vietnam established sovereignty markers on several islands in the chain.|-| 1968 || The Philippines sent troops to three islands on the premise of protecting Kalayaan citizens and announced the annexation of the Kalayaan island group.|-| 1971 || Malaysia issued claims to some of the Spratly Islands.|-| 1972 || The Philippines incorporated the Kalayaan islands into its Palawan province.|-| 1975 || The unified Vietnam declared claims over the Spratly Islands.|-| 1978 || A presidential decree from the Philippines outlined territorial claims to the islands.|-| 1979 || Malaysia published a map of its continental shelf claim, which includes twelve islands from the Spratly group.Vietnam published a paper outlining its claims to the islands and disputing those of the other claimants.|-| 1982 || Vietnam published another white paper, occupied several of the islands and constructed military installations.The Philippines also occupied several more islands and constructed an air strip.|-| 1983 || Malaysia occupied Swallow Reef (Layang Layang), one of the Spratly Islands. A naval base and resort was later built at this location.|-| 1984 || Brunei established an exclusive fishing zone encompassing the Louisa Reef and neighboring areas in the southeastern Spratly Islands.|-| 1996 || The first Philippine-Vietnam Joint Marine Scientific Research Expedition in the South China Sea was conducted aboard the RPS Explorer of the and Geosciences Bureau of the of Environment and Natural Resources.|-| 1987 || The Peoples Republic of China conducted naval patrols in the Spratly Islands and established a permanent base.|-| 1988 || PRC warships and Vietnamese transport ships had a minor clash over Reef. PRC forces prevailed and the PRC won control over some Spratly reefs for the first time in the dispute.|-| 1995 || The Philippine government revealed Chinese military structure being built at the Reefs. Philippine President Ramos ordered increased patrol of the Philippine-controlled areas, the incident leads to numerous arrests of Chinese fishermen and naval clashes with Chinese pirate vessels.|-| 2008 || Taiwans President became the first head of state from the claimant countries to visit Spratly islands. His visit sparks criticism from other claimants.|-| 2009 || The Office of the Philippine President enacted the Philippine Baselines Law of 2009 (RA 9522). The new law classifies the Kalayaan Island Group and the Scarborough Shoal as a regime of islands under the Republic of the Philippines. This means that the Philippines continues to lay claim over the disputed islands.(Philippine Baselines Law of 2009 signed, GMA News, March 11, 2009.)|-| 2009 || Two submissions to the Commission on the Limits of the Continental Shelf were made on May. A joint submission by Malaysia and Vietnam claims jurisdiction over their respective continental shelves out to 200 nautical miles. A lone submission by Vietnam claims jurisdiction over an extended shelf area. The Peoples Republic of China and the Philippines both protested the moves stating that they violated agreements made with regards to the islands.(Commission on the Limits of the Continental Shelf (CLCS) Outer limits of the continental shelf beyond 200 nautical miles from the baselines: Submissions to the Commission: Joint submission by Malaysia and the Socialist Republic of Viet Nam. United Nations Commission on the Limits of the Continental Shelf. 28 May 2009. Retrieved 18 September 2009.)(Commission on the Limits of the Continental Shelf (CLCS) Outer limits of the continental shelf beyond 200 nautical miles from the baselines: Submissions to the Commission: Submission by the Socialist Republic of Viet Nam. United Nations Commission on the Limits of the Continental Shelf. 28 May 2009. Retrieved 18 September 2009.)|-| 2011 || On 18 May 2011, Mobile announced that its mobile phone coverage has expanded to the Spratly Islands, under the rationale that it can allow soldiers stationed on the islands, fishermen and merchant vessels within the area to use mobile services, and can also provide assistance during storms and sea rescues. The deployment of China Mobiles support over the islands took roughly one year to fulfil.(Ian Mansfield, 18th May 2011, China Mobile Expands Coverage to the Spratly Islands, Cellular News)|-|2011 || In June, the Chinese navy conducted three days of exercises, including live fire drills, in the disputed waters. This was widely seen as a warning to Vietnam, which had also conducted live fire drills near the Spratly Islands. Chinese patrol boats fired repeated rounds at a target on an apparently uninhabited island, as twin fighter jets streaked in tandem overhead. 14 vessels participated in the maneuvers, staging antisubmarine and beach landing drills aimed at defending atolls and protecting sea lanes.( |dateJune 18, 2011}})|}See also* Islands dispute* Office for Xisha Islands, Zhongsha Islands and Nansha IslandsReferencesFurther reading* External links*Spratlys website (pro-China)*Paracels and Spratlys website (pro-Vietnam)*Mariners page of the Spratly Islands*Taiwanese List with ~170 entries* *List of atolls with areas* A tabular summary about the Spratly and Paracel Islands* Third Party Summary of the Dispute**A collection of documents on Spratly and Paracel Islands by Nguyen Thai Hoc Foundation* of Conflict and Environment (ICE), Spratly Islands Dispute over de Spratly-eilanden
28360663
Nakivubo_Pronouncement
The Nakivubo Pronouncement (or Pronouncements, often shortened to NP) was a commitment issued by Obote, of the ruling party of Uganda, the Peoples Congress, in 1970. It outlined the increased nationalisation of major industries as part of the move towards socialism described by the Mans Charter of 1969 (the to the Left).( It was ultimately a failure insofar as it did not achieve the socialist ideal it was supposed to portray.OutlineOn 1 May 1970, Obote issued the pronouncement, proclaiming that, with immediate effect, the government was to take control of 60% (up from at most 51%) of over 80 corporations in Uganda;( they would now be run by state corporations, trade unions, municipal councils and cooperative unions.() The list included all banks, insurance companies, manufacturing and mining industries, plantations, oil companies and transport undertakings in Uganda.( The pronouncement added that a government monopoly would be enforced in Ugandas import-export markets( with the exception of oil.() Foreign investors were to be compensated out of the post-tax profits of the firms themselves over the next 15 years.()(In reality, little preparation had been carried out, nor thought given to the pronouncements consequences; it seems that the President did not even give the Cabinet any prior warning of his decision.( The criteria for nationalisation were not made clear and there was great uncertainty as to whether the nationalisation exercise was complete. It was not even clear whether the nationalisation was supposed to complement the Africanisation of Uganda commerce or to re-prioritise it.( The governmental machine was thrown into the kind of incoherent muddle which became increasingly characteristic of the regimes final phase.() Nationalisation had been widely anticipated, and given the uncertainty, foreign investors had been pulling their money out of the country rapidly with disastrous consequences for the economy. Taking advantage of Obotes unwillingness to have the state directly run the affected companies, multinationals, particularly Shell and BP, used threats and brought concerted pressure to bear on thegovernment to reduce their stake and to compensate them profits or no profits.( The result was that nationalisation was never fully realised, and the government never took control of Ugandas major industries.(World responseEven so, the move proved very unpopular on the world stage. Banks felt particularly aggrieved. They had been asked to reincorporate their Ugandan operations in Uganda; now the reasons for that became clear.( The Chairman of Bank, Sir Seebohm, spoke for many affected companies when he remarkedthat:Whilst the banks could use their political clout to achieve a better settlement, local Asian firms which had none of the same sort of leverage were left deeply unhappy, and many threatened to leave. They feared the move was part of a long transition to remove them from whole lines of business. In this way, the pronouncement contributed to Asian support of Obotes overthrow by Amin in 1971.( It has also been suggested that the strong anti-foreign sentiments illustrated by the pronouncement helped motivate foreign support for Amins coup; declassified papers seem to support this.()In any event, Amin disliked the socialist attitude demonstrated by his predecessor; the pronouncement was soon revoked and in some industries the government refrained even from controlling stakes, though Africanisation was completed with the expulsion of Asians and later British holdings.() References 
28370964
Henckel_von_Donnersmarck
The Henckel von Donnersmarcks are a Silesian noble family from the former region of Spi in Hungary, now in Slovakia. The founder of the family was Henckel de Quintoforo in the 14/15th Century. The family estate is in Donnersmarck (slovak: tvrtok).HistoryIn 1417, during the time of the of Constance, the German and Hungarian King Sigismund of Luxembourg granted the three brothers Peter, Jakob and Nicholas a coat of arms.During the 15th and 16th Centuries lived John II (14811539), an eminent scholar who corresponded with Luther, of Rotterdam and Melanchthon. He began his career as a pastor in Levoa and Koice. Later, he stayed at the court of the Hungarian King Ludwig II and his wife Maria of Austria. In 1531, he came to Silesia and became a canon in Breslau (Wroclaw), Silesia. He died there eight years later and was buried in the local cathedral.Lazarus Henckel (or Lazarus the Elder) (15511624) was a banker and mine owner, and financier to II, Holy Roman Emperor for his war with the Turks. In return for his service he gained a number of privileges; in 1607 he was ennobled and became Lazarus(I) Henckel von Donnersmarck. In 1615 he became a baronet. The family seat became the castle at Neudeck (wierklaniec).Lazarus the second (or Lazarus the Younger) (15731664), called the lazy received the title of Freiherr (Baron) from Ferdinand of Habsburg at Regensburg in 1636, in 1651 from Ferdinand Karl of Austria and Tyrol he received the title Graf (Count) in Innsbruck. In 1661 Leopold I Habsburg gave him in Vienna also the title of a Bohemian count. In the following centuries the descendents of Lazarus II split into several lines and branches.At the beginning of the 20th Century, the family was the second richest in Prussia after the Krupps.() Hugo I Henckel von Donnersmarck (18111890) (a steelworks founder and owner), and Henckel von Donnersmarck (18301916) were both wealthy industrialists. Guido received the Prussian title of Frst (Prince) from Emperor Wilhelm II.Following the defeat of the Third Reich in 1945, the Henckel von Donnersmarcks completely lost their fortune due to the forced expulsion from eastern Germany by both Polish and Soviet forces, but retained their position as aristocrats.In 2007 the family name was all over the news when director Henckel von Donnersmarck received the Award for Best Foreign Language Film for his spy drama Lives of Others.Family members*Lazarus(I) Henckel von Donnersmarck (15511624), banker and mining entrepreneur.*Carl Maximilian Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck,  castle owner *Lazarus III. Henckel von Donnersmarck (17291805), mining industrialist.*Elias Maximilian Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck, Prussian major general (17461827)*Eleonore Ottilie Maximiliane Henckel von Donnersmarck (17561843)*Carl Lazarus Henckel von Donnersmarck (17721864),  industrialist.*Wilhelm Ludwig Viktor Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck, (17751849), Prussian Lieutenant-General*Leo Victor Felix Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck, (17851861), German botanist*Henckel von Donnersmarck, (18111890), land owner and industrialist*Count Henckel von Donnersmarck, Prince, (18301916), land owner and industrialist*Lazarus IV Henckel von Donnersmarck (18351914), landowner and member of the German Reichstag*Gregor Henckel-Donnersmarck (Ulrich Maria Karl Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck), (born 1943), Abott of Abbey*Henckel von Donnersmarck (b. 1973), film director, screenwriter and film producer, Oscar-winner 2007 (Best Foreign Language Film)*Heinrich Henckel von Donnersmarck, 2000 to 2008 CEO of the Swiss Exchange*Georg Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck, (19021973), politician of the Social Union of Bavaria, member of parliament*Carl Joseph Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck (November 7, 1928 Romolkwitz, Neumarkt,  April 16, 2008)  Maria Adelaide of Luxembourg (19242007), father of Felix Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck (March 2, 1960  October 28, 2007)*Herr. Augustine Heinrich Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck, Priest (19352005)*Leo-Ferdinand Graf Henckel von Donnersmarck, (19352009), 1997-2006 President of the German Association of the Order of Malta*Winfried Henckel von Donnersmarck, a member of the Sovereign Council of the Order of Malta*Odo Deodatus I. Tauern (18851926), anthropologist, D.phil., father of the family Tauern.*Count Hugh II and Edgar Henckel von Donnersmarck, resident in the Castle Polnisch KrawarnReferences(Bibliographie* Henckel von Donnersmarck, A. Perlick, w: Neue Deuitsche Biographie, Bd 8, Berlin 1969, s. 516* Henckel von Donnersmarckowie. Kariera i fortuna rodu, A. Kuzio-Podrucki, Bytom 2003*  * Zamki Donnersmarckw, J. A. Krawczyk, A. Kuzio-Podrucki, Radzionkw 2002* Herbarz bytomski, A. Kuzio-Podrucki, P. Nadolski, D. Wonicki, Bytom 2003* Henckel von Donnersmarckowie. Kariera i fortuna rodu, Arkadiusz Kuzio-Podrucki: . Rococo, Bytom 2003 ISBN 83-86293-41-1 (polnisch)* Zamki i paace Donnersmarckw. Schlsser der Donnersmarcks, Jarosaw Aleksander Krawczyk, Arkadiusz Kuzio-Podrucki: . 2. Auflage. Drukarnia Skill, Bytom 2003 ISBN 83-86293-41-1 (deutsch und polnisch)* Guido Graf Henckel Frst von Donnersmarck:in: Schlesier des 19. Jahrhunderts ( Schlesische Lebensbilder; Band 1). Hrsg. namens der Historischen Kommission fr Schlesien von Friedrich Andreae. 2. Auflage. Thorbecke, Sigmaringen 1985 ISBN 3-7995-6191-9, J. Bitta* Henckel von Donnersmarck Graf (seit 1901 Frst) Guido: H. Nussbaum, in:Biographisches Lexikon zur Deutschen Geschichte. Deutscher Verlag der Wissenschaften, Berlin 1967 , Karl Obermann, Heinrich Scheel u.a. (Hrsg.)* Hugo Reichsgraf Henckel Freiherr von Donnersmarck und die Geschichte seines Hauses. Wien nach 1890?* Henckel von Donnersmarck Hugo, in: sterreichisches Biographisches Lexicon 1815-1950. Band II. Verlag der sterreichischen Akademie der Wissenschaften, Wien 1959* Allgemeine Enzyklopdie der Wissenschaften und Knste. Zweite Sektion H-N. Leipzig, 1829 S.389*  External links * Henckel von Donnesmarck family www.arekkp.plvon Donnersmarckja:von Donnersmarck
28383977
South_Superior_Union_Hall
 refnum  83004305()The South Superior Union Hall was built in 1921 in the southern part of what is now Wyoming. The hall was built by six locals of the Mine Workers to accommodate union and community activities in the coal-mining community of Superior. Built in 1921, the two-story brick halls plan is a parallelogram, though to be unique for its time in Wyoming. The hall housed doctors and dentists offices, a bowling alley and a grocery store.  Dances were held in the upstairs meeting space.. With the closing of the Superior mines in the 1960s the union hall was sold in 1964. The hall was converted to a cafe, but the business did not prosper and the hall was abandoned.()() The South Superior Union Hall has been restored and is the center of an interpretive park.()The South Superior Union Hall was added to the Register of Historic Places in 1983.(ReferencesExternal links* South Superior Union Hall at the Wyoming State Historic Preservation Office
28416221
SAND_CDBMS
SAND CDBMS is a DBMS software system optimized for intelligence applications, delivering the data warehousing component, developed by SAND Technology Inc.Company HistorySAND Technology was founded in 1983.SAND CDBMS traces its roots to developments by Nucleus International Corporation research and eventual patent issued to, among others, Edward L. Glaser (Memorial Tributes: National Academy of Engineering, Volume 7 (1994)) on Bit string compressor with boolean operation processing capability.(http://patents.justia.com/1991/05036457.html | Bit string compressor with boolean operation processing capability)Originally encoded on firmware, the application is now completely software based.DescriptionA fully tokenized, bit array encoded and compressed database, data storage is column-oriented using domains across schemas/tables rather than as rows of data within tables.  This results in an optimized platform for data analytics and data mining, although not suitable for transaction processing.This architecture exhibits the following characteristics:-	All columns act as if they are indexed-	Actual data values are stored only once and referenced by their token-	Columns use lossless data compression when stored-	Only columns requested in a query are accessed from the database-	Queries are done directly on the compressed columns and only the result set is decompressed.Platform agnostic, SAND CDBMS runs on 32 and 64 bit Windows or the following 64 bit Linux/Unix environments:*HP-UX*IBM-AIX*OSF/1*Red Hat Linux*SuSE Linux*Sun SolarisAdministrationSAND/DNA Analytics is managed via ANSI standard SQL and DML commands.Database space allocation and core management are done by the database engine.  This means typical database administration is focused on data modeling, data content, managing the data life cycle and managing the user profiles and access permissions.Data loading is straight forward and only requires pointing to the source and destination in load scripts.  There are multiple data manipulation functions and commands available, but all internal structure optimizations are automatically managed by the database engine.While data load performance can be slower than row based databases, it is mitigated by not having to build any indexes or run post-load administration routines once complete.  Parallel load processing or segmented pre-load processing can also be used to improve load performance.A core feature of SAND CDBMS is its support of virtual mounting of a database (/Sand/Documentation/vdb1_intro.html).  This provides an isolated environment for developing and testing changes to a database, where upon dismounting, the entire environment is removed. References  External links * SAND Technology Inc. website
28443775
List_of_companies_of_Honduras
This is a list of notable companies of Honduras.Airlines* Sosa* Atlantic Airlines* Airlines* AeroHonduras (defunct)* SAHSA (defunct)Airports* InterAirportsMining* Mining CompanyUtilities* Nacional de Energa Elctrica
28476411
David_Watts_Morgan
awards              Service Orderof the Order of the British EmpireDavid Watts Morgan CBE DSO JP (18 December 1867  23 February 1933) (later in his life his name was hyphenated to Watts-Morgan( accessdate22 August 2010)) was a Welsh unionist, a Labour politician, and a Member of Parliament (MP) from 1918 to 1933.Described as straddling the transition in south Wales miners politics from Lib-Labism to socialism, but ... never fully representative of either,() Morgan encouraged Rhondda miners to enlist in the army in 1914 following the outbreak of the First World War, and was appointed of the Order of the British Empire for his efforts. He initially served in the Regiment, before becoming a lieutenant-colonel in the Labour Corps. Morgan was awarded the Service Order for bravery at the Battle of Cambrai in 1917,() earning him the nickname Dai Alphabet in South Wales.(()Early lifeDavid Watts Morgan was born in Skewen, Wales, in 1867 to Thomas and Margaret Morgan. He was educated at Skewen Elementary School until the age of eleven, when he began work as a pit boy, helping miners with the less strenuous work such as manning ventilation doors. At the age of seventeen he was employed as a coal miner in Ynyshir in the Rhondda. In 1880 Watts Morgan became a checkweightman at the newly opened National Colliery in Wattstown, a responsible position that involved tallying the weight of coal extracted by each miner when it reached the surface. During his time at Wattstown he took evening classes to become a mining engineer. He never practised once qualified, but the knowledge he gained was useful to him in his role as the leader of several mine rescues, and gave him a practical knowledge that informed his later political life.(Trade unionismFrom checkweighter Watts Morgan rose to the position of district miners agent in 1898, becoming a member of the Rhondda Labour and Liberal Association (RLLA). Watts Morgan followed in the political Liberalism of William Mabon Abraham, and began speaking at RLLA meetings and banquets.( In 1899 the Porth and Cymmer seat for the Glamorgan County Council (GCC) fell vacant, and Watts Morgan was seen as a viable candidate from both Liberal and Labour standpoints, but was surprisingly defeated at the by-election by local timber merchant David Jenkins. The next year Jenkins declined to stand for re-election, but the miners district committee refused Watts Morgan time off from his agents duties and the seat was won uncontested by colleague James Baker.(Williams (1996), p. 64)In 1902, James Baker died at the age of 41, leaving an opening in the GCC. On this occasion Watts Morgan was permitted to advance as a Labour candidate and was returned unopposed.(Williams (1996), p. 65) By 1903 he was being talked of as a possible candidate for a south Wales parliamentary constituency. He joined the Wales Miners Federation at its inception and by 1902 he was pushing for a greater political role for the organisation.( By 1908 the Federation was making great headway in the Rhondda and was substantially improving conditions for the miners. At this time Watts Morgan was Agent and District Secretary at No.1 Rhondda District under William Abraham.(Lewis (1959), p. 173)A moderate leader, he worked fruitlessly alongside William Abraham to resolve the 191011 Cambrian Combine dispute, after the two men were shunned by the more radical miners leaders. Although espousing Liberalism and opposing the affiliation of The Miners Federation of Great Britain to the Labour Party, Watts Morgan joined the more radical and Marxist League and sat on the board of governors for the Labour College.(Military serviceOn 4 August 1914, Watts Morgan enlisted as a private in the 10th Battalion (1st Rhondda) of the Regiment, one of the service battalions formed as part of Army.( He was commissioned as a lieutenant in the 17th Battalion (1st Glamorgan) on 7 October,() and was promoted to captain on 16 January 1916.() Watts Morgan was not initially sent to France, being used instead as a strong voice in the recruitment of men from the Rhondda into the British Army. He also took part in recruitment campaigns in North Wales, where his fluency in the language was invaluable.( Watts Morgan regularly made known his opposition to peace cranks who were insulting the boys of whom we are all so proud.(Williams (1996), pg. 86) In March 1915, a committee of Rhondda figures presented Morgan with a cheque for 100 guineas to mark his contribution to recruiting, and the Western Mail named him The Organiser of Victory.()On 15 May 1916 Watts Morgan transferred to a Works Battalion of the Liverpool Regiment,( he was promoted to major on 24 November 1916,() and went to serve in France.(  The Works Battalions were absorbed by the Labour Corps (forerunner of the Pioneer Corps) in 1917.() Watts Morgan was three times in Despatches,( and on 4 May 1918 was awarded the Distinguished Service Order for leading his pioneer unit in a counter-attack against German forces that were breaking through British lines.(()  The citation for this award was published on 5 July 1918 and read:()After the armistice he commanded a demobilisation station;( for his work there he received a letter of thanks from the king.( Despite the Dictionary of National Biography reporting Watts Morgan being promoted to lieutenant-colonel on 8 March 1919, his retirement from the forces, the Gazette entry of May 1919 describes him as major.(() Until early June 1921 he is described in Times and London Gazette as Major D. Watts Morgan, later in the month this changed to Lieutenant-Colonel Watts Morgan.()() On 30 March 1920 was appointed Commander of the Order of the British Empire for services in connection with recruiting in South Wales.()Member of ParliamentIn February 1918, Watts Morgan was selected as the Labour candidate for the newly formed Rhondda East constituency. As one of the patriotic miners leaders, the Lloyd George coalition did not run a candidate against him, therefore Watts Morgan was elected to the seat unopposed.( There was evidence that some wished to run a Liberal candidate against Watts Morgan, but nothing came of it.(Williams (1996), pp. 8485) Watts Morgan made his maiden speech in the House of Commons in April 1919, on one of his special interests, housing. He addressed the House on the state and shortage of housing in the Welsh coalfields as the chief cause of the industrial unrest. People have been herded together, and that is the reason why there is much unrest in our district at present.((Williams (1996), p. 129) Not a regular speaker in the House, Watts Morgan busied himself with work on various committees, dealing mainly with gas, electricity, river pollution, the Home Office and the Police Council.( Despite his work on private bills and his friendly relationship with Prime Minister MacDonald he was never considered for office.( In the 1922 election, Watts Morgan was forced to contest his seat for the first time when he was challenged by Frederick William Heale.(Williams (1996), p. 89) Watts Morgan made it clear that he would defend the interests of ex-servicemen and those injured in industry; he opposed the temperance demand for the local veto.(Whos Who in the New Parliament ed. by T. W. Walding, Philip Gee, 1922, p. 163.) It was a close result for a Rhondda election; Heale lost by just over 3,000 votes. The 1923 election was a different affair, with Watts Morgan defeating Conservative candidate Alfred John Orchard by nearly 13,000 votes.Watts Morgan was a socialist and trade unionist, but he was also a strong anti-communist and opposed the local men of Moscow, trade unionists who had embraced communism and whom he saw as extremists.() In the 1929 election his main rival was well-known local Liberal Dr. R. D. Chalke, but the biggest interest came from the first communist challenger in the Rhondda, Arthur Horner.(Williams (1996), p. 157) Although Watts Morgan had been unwell for the first few months of the year, he roused himself to attend the Ferndale May Day demonstration.( When he discovered he was sharing the platform with Communist Party of Great Britain members, Horner, A. J. Cook and Dai Lloyd Davies, he left the stage and joined the crowd so he could heckle Horners speech from the floor.( Watts Morgan described Horner as the emissary of the blood-stained Comintern of Russia ... working to break down the democratic Government and Trades Union organization of this country. He had little cause for concern, and was re-elected to Rhondda East by a majority of almost 9,000. A smaller turnout in the 1931 election and the absence of a Liberal candidate may have led to Horner making a considerable advance against Watts Morgan in the number of votes polled,(Williams (1996), p. 158) but Watts Morgans majority remained substantial.(Williams (1996), p. 159) Watts Morgans death in 1933 forced a by-election, which was won by Mainwaring.()Personal lifeWatts Morgan was married twice, first to Elizabeth Williams then to Blanche Amy Morgan. Blanche was herself a strong campaigner for miners rights, and was among a group of agents wives who promoted the provision of pithead baths, bathing areas for the miners at the surface. She was outspoken in her views, and once supported a political rival of her husbands party, forcing Watts Morgan to make a public apology.(Watts Morgan was a keen sportsman and enjoyed playing golf and bowls. He was a member of several organisations including the Freemasons, Ivorites and Foresters friendly societies and was president of the Rhondda and Pontypridd district of the Legion. A Calvinist Methodist his local place of worship was Bethlehem Church in Porth.(Watts Morgan died at his home in Porth on 23 February 1933 while still in office. He was survived by his wife, two sons, and four daughters. Thousands of people lined the route along which his funeral cortege passed on its way to his burial at Llethr Du cemetery in Trealaw. Local shops and businesses closed as a mark of respect.(NotesReferences*** External links * 
28487990
2010_San_Jose_mining_accident
#REDIRECT Copiap mining accident
28505042
Marble_Community_Church
 refnum89000990()Marble Community Church, formerly called St. Pauls Church is a historic Episcopal church at 123 State Street in Colorado. The churchs main building was originally the building of the St. Johns Episcopal Chapel, which was built in Aspen, Colorado in 1886. The church was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1989.(HistoryBy 1900, Marble, Colorado, was home to an active childrens school, though the town lacked a church building for which to hold the school in. By 1908, the one room St. Johns Episcopal Chapel building, constructed in 1886, a short distance northeast of Marble in Aspen was no longer required there and the diocese made it available for its relocation to Marble. The chapel building was dismantled and moved by railroad car before being reassembled on two lots of land purchased with a $2500 donation by the Episcopal Womens Guild. The building was placed at 123 State Street, and renamed the St. Pauls Church. Soon after the installation of the building it was extended with the addition of two side rooms.() Further enlargement of the church was carried out in 1911, with the addition of a belfry containing a 500 pound bell.( The church represents an example of an early religious structure in a mining community and is the towns only example of architecture.(St. Pauls Church was a center for religious and social activities and provided for three congregations: Episcopal, Union Congregational, and Catholic, as well as acting as a meeting place for other groups. The imminency of the approaching War II however, brought about the closure of the towns local marble quarries and Marble Company mill. As a result the town saw a decline in its population which resulted in the closure of the church in 1941. The building was left empty and unused for a number of years remaining in the care of the Williams brothers.((Over ten years later, in the early 1950s, permission was granted from the Williams brothers, to use the old church, was cleaned and used to hold prayer meetings and hymn singing services. The interest in these services grew, and shortly after they began a congregation had formed and adopted the name Marble Community Church. During the summers of 1960 and 1961 A. Drake, who went on to become of Grinnell College, served the congregation.( In 1974, the congregation received permission to move back into the old church in exchange for assuming responsibility for the care and maintenance of the building. In 1983, The Marble Community Church became incorporated under the laws of Colorado and after negotiation the Rev. Fr. Cyril Coverly of the Episcopal Diocese was able to present the deed to the building and land back to the congregation on July 7, 1985.() The church was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1989 as a Historic Place in Gunnison County, Colorado.(From 2002 to 2004, the church began renovations of the original church and the construction of a new hall with a grant from the Colorado Historical Society, donations from the community and volunteer labor allowing the project to be completed ahead of schedule. A breezeway to connect these two buildings was completed in 2004 and in July 2008 the Marble Community Church celebrated its 100th Anniversary and the dedication of a marble angel sculpture by Connie Hendrix.(File:MarbleChurch.jpg|Marble Community ChurchReferencesExternal links*Marble Community Church Web Site* A plaque detailing the history of the church
28538434
The_Reminder_(Flin_Flon)
The Reminder (formerly The Flin Flon Daily Reminder and The Daily Reminder) is a newspaper published three times a week (Monday, Wednesday, and Friday) in Flon, Canada, a city located on the border of Manitoba and Saskatchewan.((Sun Media to buy Stratford Beacon Herald, CBC News, November 10, 2000 (The list of independent dailies in Canada keeps dwindling. Others remaining ... and the felicitously-named Flin Flon Reminder in Manitoba))  It is the only locally published newspaper in the area (which includes adjacent Saskatchewan, Beach, Saskatchewan and Portage, Manitoba). History The Reminder was founded as The Flin Flon Daily Reminder on Oct. 16, 1946 by the late Tom Dobson, an employee of Flin Flons largest employer, Hudson Bay Mining and Smelting. Originally publishing six days a week, The Reminder competed directly with the communitys original newspaper, The Flin Flon Daily Miner, which ended its run in 1966 after a fire struck its headquarters.Dobson sold The Reminder in 1989. By then the publication schedule had been cut back to five days a week, Monday to Friday. In 2005, The Reminder became a tri-weekly newspaper with editions every Monday, Wednesday and Friday. It also adopted a larger page format. Within several months, the publication introduced an editorial page that included regular commentary on local affairs. The papers reduction to a tri-weekly trimmed the number of daily newspapers in the Canadian Prairie provinces from 18 to 17.(Newspaper Association. Circulation Data Report 2009, Retrieved August 25, 2010)References
28584901
Tax_protester_administrative_arguments
Tax protesters in the United States make a number of administrative arguments that the assessment of the federal income tax in the United States violates regulations enacted by responsible agencies (primarily the Revenue Service) tasked with carrying out the statutes enacted by the States Congress and signed into law by the President. Such arguments generally claim that the administrative agencies fail to create a duty to pay taxes, or that their operation conflicts with some other law, or that the IRS is not authorized by statute to assess income taxes, to seize assets to satisfy tax claims, or to penalize persons who fail to file a return or pay the tax assessed.These kinds of arguments are distinguished from related constitutional arguments, statutory arguments, and general conspiracy arguments. Administrative arguments presuppose that Congress has the constitutional power to assess a tax on incomes, and has drafted statutes that effect this imposition, but that the administrative agencies tasked with carrying out the directives of the statute have failed to enact regulations enabling them to do so. Supporters of such arguments may or may not be inclined to contend that constitutional, statutory, and conspiracy arguments apply as well.The courts that have been presented with such arguments have ruled them to be spurious, unpersuasive, frivolous, or all three.Arguments about tax administration and processSome arguments relate to the regulatory process, the authority of IRS employees to assert penalties, the IRS authority to seize assets, or the validity of IRS tax forms.Arguments about lack of regulationsSome tax protesters have tried to argue that because the Department of the Treasury has promulgated official regulations for some but not all Internal Revenue Code provisions, there can be no obligation to file income tax returns or pay taxes. The courts have uniformly rejected this argument, ruling that duties imposed by statute cannot be avoided merely because the IRS or some other agency has not promulgated a regulation under that statute, and that the mere fact that a statute specifies that an agency is authorized to promulgate a regulation does not necessarily mean that the agency is required to do so.For court decisions on the lack of regulations arguments, see Carpa v. Smith;(98-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,627 (D. Ariz. 1998).) United States v. Langert;(902 F. Supp. 999, 95-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,504 (D. Minn. 1995).) Russell v. United States;(95-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,029 (W.D. Mich. 1994).) United States v. Washington;(947 F. Supp. 87, 97-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,129 (S.D.N.Y. 1996).) United States v. Hicks.(947 F.2d 1356, 91-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,549 (9th Cir. 1991).)Arguments about authority of IRS employees to collect penaltiesSome tax protesters argue that even if the Internal Revenue Code provides for penalties, IRS employees do not have the authority to assert penaltiesbasing the argument on Internal Revenue Code section 6020(b)(1) which states::Authority of Secretary to execute return.:If any person fails to make any return required by any internal revenue law or regulation made thereunder at the time prescribed therefor, or makes, willfully or otherwise, a false or fraudulent return, the Secretary shall make such return from his own knowledge and from such information as he can obtain through testimony or otherwise.Some protesters contend that this provision shows that IRS agents have no authority to impose penalties unless they have a delegation from the Secretary of the Treasury.Tax protesters sometimes assert that court decisions that IRS agents have delegated powers from the Secretary of the Treasury constitute a blatant disregard for the law, which tax protesters cite as proof that the finding of the court is somehow opposite of what the law says. At any rate, under , , and  and the Treasury regulation at 26 C.F.R. section 301.6020-1(a)(1), IRS agents do indeed have the delegated power to prepare section 6020(b) returns (see Craig v. Lowe(96-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,416 (N.D. Calif. 1996), affd on other grounds, 97-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,316 (9th Cir. 1997).)). See also Delegation Order 182, which specifically delegates this authority to Internal Revenue Agents, to Tax Auditors, to Revenue Officers of grade GS-9 and above, and to various other IRS personnel.(Delegation Order 182 (Rev. 7), 5 May 1997, updated 2 October 2000, Internal Revenue Manual, IRM 1.2.44.5, Internal Revenue Service, U.S. Dept of the Treasury at http://www.irs.gov/irm/part1/ch02s23.html#d0e51308. See also IRM 5.1.11.6.3.1, paragraph 2 (1 March 2007), at http://www.irs.gov/irm/part5/ch01s12.html#d0e17628, which authorizes the Automated Substitute for Return (ASFR) unit of the IRS to prepare income tax returns for individuals who fail to file their own tax returns after having been notified.) In Craig, the taxpayer argued that only the Secretary of the Treasury himself or herself was authorized under section 6020 to prepare returns for taxpayers despite the plain language of section 6020 which uses the word Secretary (without the phrase of the Treasury). Under section 7701(a)(11)(B), where used in the Internal Revenue Code without the phrase of the Treasury, the term Secretary means the Secretary of the Treasury or his delegate (Italics added). The phrase or his delegate is defined in part as any officer, employee, or agency of the Treasury Department duly authorized . . .  to perform the function mentioned or described . . . .(See .) The Court rejected the taxpayers argument, and ruled that an IRS Revenue Agent plainly falls within the cited Treasury regulation.Another group of protesters claims the existing law demands income tax only from federal employees and residents of US territories. Their argument does not rely on nonpassage of the 16th Amendment, but does suggest it.() They have asked the IRS and other authorities to cite the laws requiring others to pay income tax. This group claims never to have received an answer.Arguments about authority of IRS employees to seize assetsSome tax protesters argue that the Internal Revenue Service has no authority to seize assets to satisfy tax claims. For example, tax protester Schiffs web site, in reference to the 2005 Federal trial resulting in his most recent conviction and imprisonment on tax charges, includes the statement: . . .  the Governments prosecutors and Judge Dawson interceded in order to prevent me from proving that all IRS seizures are illegal, and not provided for by law.(Irwin Schiffs website)In United States v. Rodgers, the United States Supreme Court stated:::Administrative levy, unlike an ordinary lawsuit, and unlike the procedure described in 7403, does not require any judicial intervention, and it is up to the taxpayer, if he so chooses, to go to court if he claims that the assessed amount was not legally owing.(United States v. Rodgers, 461 U.S. 677, 103 S. Ct. 2132, 83-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 9374 (1983) (dicta).)Similarly, in United States v. Baggot, the Supreme Court stated:::The IRS need never go into court to assess and collect the amount owed; it is empowered to collect the tax by nonjudicial means (such as levy on property or salary, 26 U. S. C.  6331, 6332), without having to prove to a court the validity of the underlying tax liability.(United States v. Baggot, 463 U.S. 476 (1983) (dicta) (parenthetical text in original).)The statute authorizing the Internal Revenue Service to seize assets without going to court is .(For exceptions to this rule, see . For more background, see the United States Supreme Court decisions in United States v. National Bank of Commerce, 472 U.S. 713 (1985), at http://scholar.google.com/scholar_case?q%22472+U.S.+713%22&hlen&as_sdt3,44&case744606628031780731&scilh0 and G.M. Leasing Corp. v. United States, 429 U.S. 338 (1977), at http://scholar.google.com/scholar_case?case6568348095940464022&q%22472+U.S.+713%22&hlen&as_sdt3,44&scilh0.) In the case of Brian v. Gugin, a group of taxpayers (including a Mr. Ralph Brian) sued a group of IRS and other government employees, (including Ms. Phylis Gugin), for what the taxpayers claimed was a violation of their rights. The following is an excerpt from the courts decision in the case:::The plaintiffs premise for their complaint is that the IRS agents were required to have a court order in order to be able to legally seize property for delinquent taxes. Unfortunately, this is a faulty premise. Title 26 U.S.C. 6331 authorizes the IRS to seize property of any person liable for any tax upon ten days notice. The plaintiffs are incorrect in stating that 6331 and 6321 only apply to the Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms. The statute specifically states that any person may have their property levied upon. 26 U.S.C. 6331(a) and 6321. The plaintiffs also cite 26 U.S.C. 7402 which grants jurisdiction to the district courts to issue orders, processes and judgments as well as enforce IRS summons. This section does not require a court order in order to levy on property under 6331.::A levy by definition is a summary non-judicial process which provides the IRS with prompt and convenient method for satisfying delinquent tax claims. . . .  The IRS has the option under 6502 to collect its assessment by either a levy or a court proceeding . . . . ::Accordingly, the IRS agents were acting within the authority granted under 6331 and no court order was required for the attempted levy on Ralph Brians property. Concerning the constitutional violations alleged by the plaintiffs, this court cannot find that any constitutional rights were allegedly violated if the attempted seizure was lawful under 6331.::It is important to note that the plaintiff Ralph Brian is not without a course of action under the Internal Revenue Code. If the delinquent taxes claimed are not delinquent, the taxpayer may bring an action with the IRS for a refund.(Brian v. Gugin, 853 F. Supp. 358, 94-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,278 (D. Idaho 1994), affd, 95-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH)  paragr. 50,067 (9th Cir. 1995) (italics in original). See also Hughes v. Chevron Phillips Chemical Co., Memorandum Opinion and Order Granting Defendants Summary Judgment Motion, case no. 2:10-cv-00210, U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Texas, Amarillo Div. (July 12, 2011) (argument that an employer complying with an IRS administrative levy of a workers wages must have a court order, levy, or a warrant of distraint signed by a judge of a court of competent jurisdiction was ruled to be without merit).)In a variation on this argument, some tax protesters have argued that section 6331 of the Internal Revenue Code should allow the IRS to seize only the salary of an officer, employee, or elected official of the United States or the District of Columbia. This argument was rejected by the United States Supreme Court in Sims v. United States.(359 U.S. 108 (1959).) Tax protesters have presented variations of this argument, which the courts have ruled to be without legal merit. See, e.g., the decision of the United States Court of Appeals for the Tenth Circuit in James v. United States.(970 F.2d 750, 92-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,389, n. 9 (10th Cir. 1992).) See also Peth v. Breitzmann;(611 F. Supp. 50, 85-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 9321 (E.D. Wis. 1985).) Pawlowske v. Chrysler Corp.;(623 F. Supp. 569, 86-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) 9392 (N.D. Ill. 1985).) and Craig v. Lowe.(96-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,416 (N.D. Calif. 1996).) See also the decision of the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit in Maisano v. Welcher.(940 F.2d 499, 91-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,478 (9th Cir. 1991), cert. denied sub nom. Maisano v. IRS, 504 U.S. 916, 112 S. Ct. 1957 (1992) (Court ruled that no court order is required for a valid IRS seizure under section 6331, and that the power of IRS seizure under section 6331 is not limited to salaries of federal government personnel, etc).)Since at least 1867, the Federal tax collector has also held the power to sell property of a delinquent taxpayer to satisfy a Federal income tax liability, even before physically ejecting the taxpayer from the property. See the United States Supreme Court decision in the case of v. United States.(Springer v. United States, 102 U.S. 586 (1881) (sometimes cited as 1880; decision actually rendered January 1881).)Arguments that the IRS must follow the Fair Debt Collection ActAt least one tax protester has argued that the IRS must follow the Federal Debt Collection Practices Act, also known as the Fair Debt Collection Act. This argument was rejected in Smith v. United States, where the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit stated that the taxpayers: . . . . invocation of the Fair Debt Collection Act is entirely without merit, as the statute expressly excludes any officer or employee of the United States . . . to the extent that collecting or attempting to collect any debt is in the performance of his official duties from the definition of debt collector. 15 U.S.C. section 1692a(6)(C).(Smith v. United States, United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit, case no. 08-10288, Dec. 2, 2008 (per curiam).) In 1998, Congress amended the Internal Revenue Code by adding a new section 6304, Fair Tax Collection Practices, which refers to and includes certain rules that are similar to some provisions of the Fair Debt Collection Practices Act.(See generally , as enacted by section 3466(a) of the Internal Revenue Service Restructuring and Reform Act of 1998, Pub. L. No. 105-206 (July 22, 1998).)The Paperwork Reduction Act (OMB control number) argumentOne contention of tax protesters is that they are not liable to file returns or pay taxes because, they argue, Form 1040 or some other Federal tax form, or the related instructions, or a Treasury Regulation, does not contain an OMB control number (a number issued by the U.S. Office of Management and Budget under the Reduction Act.) The courts have rejected the OMB control number arguments, primarily on two grounds: (1) With respect to Form 1040 itself, Form 1040, U.S. Individual Income Tax Return, does contain the OMB control number, and has included the number for every tax year since 1981;(The OMB control number is in the upper right corner of page 1 of the form. The short forms, Form 1040A and Form 1040EZ, also bear OMB control numbers.) and (2) according to the court rulings (listed below), the absence of an OMB control number on a tax form (or instructions), or in tax regulations, would not eliminate the statutory legal obligation to file tax returns or pay taxes.The regulations for the OMB control number under the Paperwork Reduction Act specifically mention statutory tax obligations, providing (in part)::: 1320.6 Public protection.::(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person shall be subject to any penalty for failing to comply with a collection of information that is subject to the requirements of this part if:::::(1) The collection of information does not display, in accordance with 1320.3(f) and 1320.5(b)(1), a currently valid OMB control number assigned by the Director in accordance with the Act . . . ::(e) The protection provided by paragraph (a) of this section does not preclude the imposition of a penalty on a person for failing to comply with a collection of information that is imposed on the person by statutee.g., 26 U.S.C. 6011(a) (statutory requirement for person to file a tax return) . . . . (5 C.F.R. sec. 1320.6.)Additionally the Paperwork Reduction Act itself states (in part): . . .  this subchapter shall not apply to the collection of information . . .  during the conduct of . . .  a civil action to which the United States or any official or agency thereof is a party . . .  or . . .  an administrative action or investigation involving an agency against specific individuals or entities.(.)The courts have ruled that there is no legal requirement that an IRS tax form bear an OMB control number in order for a taxpayer to be legally obligated to file Federal income tax returns and pay the related taxes, and there is no requirement of an OMB number in order for the taxpayer to be properly convicted of tax crimesas these are tax obligations imposed by statute and therefore cannot be obviated by presence or lack of an OMB control number on a tax form.OMB control numbers and the Lawrence caseSome tax protesters have argued that criminal defendant Robert Lawrence(United States v. Lawrence, no. 06-10019, United States District Court for the Central District of Illinois (Peoria).) was successful with an OMB control number argument when his case was dismissed by a federal court in 2006. According to the court record, the IRS agents who had calculated Mr. Lawrences tax liability discovered errors they themselves had madebased on information obtained from Lawrences own tax returns, regarding the taxpayers tax basis in certain property Lawrence had sold. With respect to certain properties the taxpayer had sold, the IRS agents discovered that he had more tax basis than they had originally calculatedtherefore, lower gains or even losses, and thus lower taxes. The IRS agents brought their errors to the attention of the government lawyers, who then asked that the charges be dropped.(United States Response to Defendants Motion for Attorneys Fees and Costs, entry 31-1, June 23, 2006, United States v. Lawrence, no. 06-10019, United States District Court for the Central District of Illinois (Peoria).)Lawrence then asked the trial court to order the government to reimburse him for his legal fees. The court ruled against him on that.He then appealed to the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuitto try to obtain a reversal of the trial courts refusal to order the government to compensate him for the legal fees he had incurred. At the Court of Appeals, Lawrence contended that he should be reimbursed because the governments conduct against him had been vexatious, frivolous, or in bad faith. He raised his PRA/OMB control number argumentan argument he had also raised at the trial court level.In March 2007 the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit rejected the OMB argument. The Court also rejected his request for reimbursement for the legal fees he incurred. The following is an excerpt from the Courts decision:::According to Lawrence, the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1995 (PRA) required the Internal Revenue Service to display valid Office of Management and Budget (OMB) numbers on its Form 1040 . . . . Lawrence argues that the PRA by its terms prohibits the government from imposing a criminal penalty upon a citizen for the failure to complete a form where the information request at issue does not comply with the PRA. Lawrence never explains how this argument is even relevant to the three counts involving tax evasion, but even as to the other three counts, it must fail . . .  Lawrences brief represents an attempt to prove that the PRA could present a valid defense to the criminal charges. Yet Lawrence conceded at oral argument that no case from this circuit establishes such a proposition, and in fact Lawrence cites no caselaw from any jurisdiction that so holds. In contrast, the government referenced numerous cases supporting its position that the PRA does not present a defense to a criminal action for failure to file income taxes . . .  Lawrence provides no explanation of how government conduct can be vexatious, frivolous, or in bad faith when there is no law contrary to it.(Judgment, page 2, docket entry 39, March 26, 2007, United States v. Lawrence, United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit, No. 06-3205.)The Wunder caseIn the case of United States v. Wunder, the United States Court of Appeals for the Sixth Circuit stated:::Although the defendant constructs an elaborate argument as to why section 3512 title 44 of the United States Code, relating to the Paperwork Reduction Act (PRA) should apply to this case, . . .  we are unable to see how section 3512 is relevant. This section, by its terms, applies only to information requests made after December 31, 1981. The tax years in question here were 1979, 1980, and 1981. Clearly, tax returns for 1979 and 1980 would not be affected by the PRA. As for the 1981 return, it did display the appropriate control number, and the regulations do not need a number because the requirement to file a tax return is mandated by statute, not by regulation. Defendant was not convicted of violating a regulation but of violating a statute which required him to file an income tax return. . . .  The Paperwork Reduction Act, therefore, does not apply to the statutory requirement, but only to the forms themselves, which contained the appropriate numbers.(919 F.2d 34, 90-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,575 (6th Cir. 1990).)The Patridge caseIn the case of United States v. Patridge, the United States Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit affirmed a tax evasion conviction, and rejected the convicted taxpayers OMB control number argument, with these words:::Finally, we have no doubt that the IRS has complied with the Paperwork Reduction Act. Form 1040 bears a control number from OMB, as do the other forms the IRS commonly distributes to taxpayers. That this number has been constant since 1981 does not imply that OMB has shirked its duty. Section 3507 the Paperwork Reduction Act requires periodic review, not a periodic change in control numbers. Patridge taxpayer offers us no reason to think that the necessary review has not been conducted. The control number on Form 1040 appears on OMBs web site as a current, valid number; if this is wrong, it takes more than a lawyers say-so to establish the proposition. That OMB didnt re-review Form 1040 between the 1995 and 1996 tax year is irrelevant; nothing in the 1995 amendments the Paperwork Reduction Act says that all existing approvals become invalid or that all forms must be resubmitted.(United States v. Patridge, 507 F.3d 1092, 2007-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,806 (7th Cir. 2007), cert. denied, 552 U.S. ___, 128 S. Ct. 1721 (2008).)In the same case, the Court of Appeals rejected the taxpayers argument that the Paperwork Reduction Act could block a tax evasion conviction:::How any of this could block a conviction for tax evasion is a mystery. Patridge evaded taxes by shuffling his income among trusts in an attempt to conceal it from the IRS. That crime does not depend on the contents of any form. Evading ones taxes is illegal independent of the information one does or does not supply. Consider another example: the Clean Air Act requires businesses to curtail certain emissions using the best available technology, and to report on those emissions to the EPA. An error in the EPAs forms might spare the business any penalties for bad information but would not license it to emit pollution without limit. The Paperwork Reduction Act does not change any substantive obligation.(Other cases involving OMB control numbersDespite the presence of the OMB control number on Form 1040 and despite the language of regulation 1320.6(e) above, tax protesters have repeatedly litigated several variations of the OMB control number argument without success. See McDougall v. Commissioner (taxpayers argumentthat the 1987 Form 1040 fails to display an OMB control numberwas rejected by the Court, with the Court stating that the 1987 Form 1040 does contain the OMB control number, in upper right corner of form; taxpayers argumentthat Form 1040 lacks the Privacy Act and Paperwork Reduction Act noticewas rejected by the Court, with the Court noting that the statement appears in the instructions for the form and further noting that a failure to comply with the Paperwork Reduction Act would not invalidate an IRS form, as the mandate for collecting Federal income tax information comes from Congress);(64 T.C.M. (CCH) 1405, T.C. Memo 1992-683 (1992), affd per curiam without opinion, 15 F.3d 1987 (9th Cir. 1993).) United States v. Barker (taxpayers argumentthat IRS forms must carry valid control numbers from the Office of Management and Budget to be validwas rejected);(90-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,490 (N.D. Calif. 1990) (citing, inter alia, )) Salberg v. United States (taxpayers argumentthat although the 1981 Form 1040 contains an OMB control number, the form is invalid because it does not contain an expiration datewas rejected; Court rules that even if the law required an expiration date, the 1981 date on the form would so qualify as an expiration date);(969 F.2d 379, 92-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,490 (7th Cir. 1992).) United States v. Cavins (taxpayer convicted of tax evasion argued that his indictment should have been thrown out because Form 1040 did not comply with the Paperwork Reduction Act; argument was rejected by the United States Court of Appeals for the Eighth Circuit. The Court stated: An OMB control number is clearly displayed at the top of each form. If the Form 1040 displays the control number required by  3512, nothing more is required.);(2008-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,565 (8th Cir. 2008).) United States v. Dawes (taxpayers argumentthat the tax regulations and IRS instruction books must contain an OMB control numberwas rejected);(951 F.2d 1189, 92-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,493 (10th Cir. 1991).) Lonsdale v. United States (taxpayers argumentthat relevant IRS forms in connection with summonses, liens or levies must contain OMB control numbers for the summonses, liens or levies to be validwas rejected);(919 F.2d 1440, 90-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,581 (10th Cir. 1990). In Lonsdale, the taxpayers argument -- that the U.S. Treasury Department delegation orders that give the authority to the Internal Revenue Service to administer the tax laws were required to be published in the Federal Register -- was also ruled to be without legal merit. Id.) Karkabe v. Commissioner (taxpayers argumentsthat Form 1040 did not display a valid OMB control number, and that the Form 1040 was bootleg and illegal -- were rejected by the court).(T.C. Memo 2007-115, CCH Dec. 56,927(M) (2007).) Pate v. Commissioner (taxpayers OMB control number argumentthat the Paperwork Reduction Act may in some manner negate statutory penalties for failure to file tax returns and pay taxes -- was ruled to be without merit, with the U.S. Tax Court stating that the requirement to file tax returns and the imposition of penalties for failing to do so represents a legislative command, not an administrative request, and that the Paperwork Reduction Act provides no escape hatch from penalties for failing to file tax returns; taxpayers argumentthat under Pond v. Commissioner,(211 Fed. Appx. 749, 2007-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,129 (10th Cir. 2007).) the 1995 amendments to the Paperwork Reduction Act call into question certain well-established judicial precedentswas rejected).(93 T.C.M. (CCH) 1271, T.C. Memo 2007-132, CCH Dec. 56,946(M) (2007), affd per curiam, 2008-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,168 (5th Cir. 2008).) Lindsey K. Springer, a proponent of the Paperwork Reduction Act/OMB control number argument, raised the issue in his own federal criminal tax case.(Docket entry 53, May 15, 2009, Second Motion to Dismiss Indictment/Information/Complaint for Violations of Paperwork Reduction Act of 1995, Lindsey K. Springer v. United States, case no. 4:09-cr-00043-SPF, U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Oklahoma (Tulsa Div.).) His argument was rejected by the court,(Docket entry 100, July 2, 2009 (ruling denying motion at docket entry 53, etc.), Lindsey K. Springer v. United States, case no. 4:09-cr-00043-SPF, U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Oklahoma (Tulsa Div.).) and the jury found him guilty of one count of conspiracy to defraud the IRS, three counts of tax evasion, and two counts of willful failure to file federal income tax returns.(Okla. preacher, Ark. lawyer convicted in tax case, Associated Press, Nov. 16, 2009, reprinted by Today, at http://content.usatoday.net/dist/custom/gci/InsidePage.aspx?cIdindystar&sParam32068647.story. See also Indictment, March 10, 2009, at docket entry 2, Lindsey K. Springer v. United States, case no. 4:09-cr-00043-SPF, U.S. District Court for the Northern District of Oklahoma (Tulsa Div.).)(David Harper, Nov. 17, 2009, Two men convicted in income-tax scheme, Tulsa World, at http://www.tulsaworld.com/news/article.aspx?subjectid14&articleid20091117_14_A11_Twotax132387.)The OMB control number argument and variations of this argument have been officially identified as legally frivolous Federal tax return positions for purposes of the $5,000 frivolous tax return penalty imposed under Internal Revenue Code section 6702(a).(, as amended by section 407 of the Tax Relief and Health Care Act of 2006, Pub. L. No. 109-432, 120 Stat. 2922 (Dec. 20, 2006). See Notice 2008-14, I.R.B. 2008-4 (Jan. 14, 2008), Internal Revenue Service, U.S. Department of the Treasury (superseding Notice 2007-30); see also Notice 2010-33, I.R.B. 2010-17 (April 26, 2010).) In Cargill v. Commissioner, an $8,000 penalty was imposed on taxpayer Judy Cargill under  in connection with her appeal in which she persisted in making the OMB control number argument after having been notified that the argument was frivolous.(2008-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,269 (11th Cir. 2008) (per curiam).)Arguments about the status of the IRSSome tax protesters argue that the IRS is not a government agency, or that the IRS is not mentioned in the statutes.Arguments that the IRS is not a government agencyMany tax protesters claim that because the Internal Revenue Service itself was not created by statute and because the IRS has no legal capacity to sue or be sued, the IRS is not a federal government agency. Some claim it is a Puerto Rican trust.() Others claim that the IRS does not lawfully exist.(Tax Freedom - The IRS Does Not Even Lawfully Exist) The courts have uniformly rejected such arguments. As explained below, the Internal Revenue Service is referred to in statutes and regulations as both an agency and a bureau.Although the IRS, as a bureau within the Treasury Department, was not created by statute (and no law requires that the IRS, as a bureau within an executive department, be created by statute),(Other important government agencies that were not created by an Act of Congress include the Intelligence Agencyhttp://www.intelligence.gov/1-members_dia.shtml and the National Reconnaissance Office (NRO). The very existence of the NRO was classified for the first 31 years of its existence, from its creation in 1961 until 1992.http://www.nro.gov/nro_factsheet.doc.) the United States Supreme Court, in Chrysler Corp. v. Brown,(441 U.S. 281 (1979).) specifically referred to the Act of 1862, the Act of July 1, 1862, ch. 119, 12 Stat. 432, the statute to which the present Internal Revenue Service can be traced. (The 1862 Act created the office of of Internal Revenue.)Due to the doctrine of immunity, the IRS itself (along with many other Federal agencies) does not, as a general rule, have the capacity to sue and be sued -- a concept separate from that of whether the IRS is a U.S. government agency. See, for example, Thompson v. Department of Treasury, Internal Revenue Service and United States of America,(2006-2 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,392 (W.D. Pa. 2006) (hereinafter Thompson).) where the court stated that the Department of the Treasury and Internal Revenue Service are federal agencies within the United States Government. Federal agencies may not be sued in their own name except to the extent Congress may specifically allow such suits. Also, Congress has made no provisions for suits against either the IRS or the Treasury Department, so these agencies are not proper entities for suit. Where taxpayers are authorized to sue on matters arising out of IRS actions, the United States is the proper party defendant (from Devries v. Internal Revenue Service.(359 F. Supp. 2d 988 (E.D. Calif. 2005), as quoted in Thompson.))Similarly in Collins v. Internal Revenue Serv., the court stated:::The United States argues that the two named defendants, the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) and Revenue Officer P. Blackard are not proper parties to this action. The United States contends and has provided authority to show that the IRS, as a division of the Treasury Department, is an agency of the United States. Although plaintiff denies that the IRS is an agency of the United States, applicable authority does not support his argument. The IRS is therefore protected by sovereign immunity and cannot be sued absent Congressional authorization, which has not occurred. Accordingly, the IRS is not a proper party to this suit. Similarly, defendant Blackard is protected by sovereign immunity and is not a proper party to this suit. The Court therefore dismisses without prejudice plaintiffs claims against the IRS and P. Blackard. Moreover, the United States is the only proper party to this action. Therefore, the United States is substituted as the defendant.(Collins v. Internal Revenue Serv., 2007-1 U.S. Tax Cas. (CCH) paragr. 50,493 (W.D. Wash 2007) (paragraph break omitted).)Arguments that the Internal Revenue Service is not mentioned in the statutesSome tax protesters claim that the Internal Revenue Service is not mentioned in the statutes. Imprisoned tax protester Irwin Schiff has contended that the Internal Revenue Service is not mentioned in Subtitle A (the subtitle dealing specifically with income tax) of the Internal Revenue Code.(See Schiffs Amended Response Opposing the United States Motion in Limine, page 9, United States v. Schiff,U.S. District Court for the District of Nevada, case no. CR-S-04-0119-KJD-LRL, at http://paynoincometax.com/pdf/201_amended_response_to_govt_motion_in_limine.pdf, retrieved 30 November 2007.) The Internal Revenue Service is, however, mentioned in Subtitle A (see, e.g., ; ; ; and ). Overall, the Internal Revenue Code contains at least 200 specific references to Internal Revenue Service (including references in headings of sections, subsections, etc.). Many Internal Revenue Code sections contain multiple references to Internal Revenue Service (for example, thirteen mentions in , ten mentions in , eighteen mentions in , and thirty-three separate mentions in ).At least nineteen references to Internal Revenue Service are found in titles 2, 5, 12, 23, 31, and 42 of the States Code. For example,  refers to the Internal Revenue Service as an agency(See  for the definition of agency.) of the Treasury Department. According to the official web site of the U.S. Department of the Treasury, the Internal Revenue Service is a bureau located within the Department.()The official U.S. Treasury regulations provide (in part)::::The Internal Revenue Service is a bureau of the Department of the Treasury under the immediate direction of the Commissioner of Internal Revenue. The Commissioner has general superintendence of the assessment and collection of all taxes imposed by any law providing internal revenue. The Internal Revenue Service is the agency by which these functions are performed.(26 C.F.R. section 601.101(a). By statute, the Secretary of the Treasury, as the head of an Executive department . . .  may prescribe regulations for the government of his department, the conduct of its employees, and the distribution and performance of its business . . . .  .)The Internal Revenue Service is also listed as a component and agency of the U.S. Department of the Treasury in the official government regulations for Supplemental Standards of Ethical Conduct for Employees of the Department of the Treasury.(5 C.F.R. section 3101.102(f).) The House Committee Report accompanying the Revenue Service Restructuring and Reform Act of 1998,(Pub. L. No. 105-206, 112 Stat. 685 (July 22, 1998).) specifically refers to the IRS as being one of the agencies within the Treasury.(H.R. Rep. No. 105-364, pt. 1.)The argument that the Internal Revenue Service is not an agency of the United States government, the argument that the IRS is a private-sector corporation, the argument that the IRS is an agency of some state or territory without authority to administer the internal revenue laws, and variations of these arguments, have been officially identified as legally frivolous Federal tax return positions for purposes of the $5,000 frivolous tax return penalty imposed under Internal Revenue Code section 6702(a).(Arguments about the lack of internal revenue districtsSome tax protesters have argued that because internal revenue districts or IRS district directors were abolished pursuant to the Revenue Service Restructuring and Reform Act of 1998, the taxpayer should no longer be liable for federal income tax or should not be prosecuted for federal tax crimes. These arguments have been ruled frivolous in the civil tax context, in Barry v. Commissioner(T.C. Memo. 2011-127 (June 7, 2011).) and in the federal criminal tax context, in United States v. Barry.(No. 09-13457, United States Court of Appeals for the Eleventh Circuit (March 24, 2010) (per curiam).)NotesExternal linksSites presenting tax protester arguments:*31 Questions & Answers about the IRS revision 3.3  Presents the arguments of Paul Andrew Mitchell, regarding the IRS, the income tax, the 14th and 16th Amendments, and other topics, in the form of 31 questions presented and answered by Mitchell.*Streaming Theft by Deception and The 861 Evidence, by Larken Rose  The arguments of tax protester Rose, presented in the form of streaming videos.*BATF/IRS -- Criminal Fraud  Text document by William Cooper describing various alleged conspiracies concerning the Internal Revenue Service and of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives. One claim is that the reference in  to the Puerto Rico special fund (Internal Revenue) proves the IRS is a Puerto Rican pure trust.*WhatisTaxed.com - - Data-mining the tax code and regulations for eliminated income, excluded income, deductions, etc.
28627379
New_Mexico_Bootheel
thumb|The Bootheel of New Mexico in HIdalgo countyNew Mexicos Bootheel comprises the southwestern corner of Mexico.  As part of the Purchase it is bounded on the east by the Mexican state of Chihuahua along a line at  extending south to latitude 31200N at .  The bootheels southern border is shared between the Mexican States of Chihuahua and Sonora along latitude 31200N, while the western border with Arizona is along meridian 109030W  at , bounding an area of 50 by  and comprising .It is characterized by and range topography with three north south trending mountain ranges, the Peloncillo Mountains, the Mountains, and the Hatchet Mountains, separated by four valleys, the San Simon, Animas, Playas, and Valleys.  A single road traverses just north of the bootheel, Mexico State Road 9, while Mexico State Road 80 skirts the western edge running south through the San Simon Valley.  The other two roads in the bootheel are State Road 338 running down Animas Valley and State Road 81 running from Hachita to Wells, a border crossing.The bootheel is known primarily as a cattle ranching area with the best known ranch being the  Diamond A Ranch in the Animas Valley.()  Although mining also played a part in the development of the bootheel with the abandoned mining town of old Hachita.()  Land ownership is divided between publicly owned state and federal lands covering much of the mountain ranges and private lands in the valleys.()  The Bootheels only settlement is Wells, while the towns of Rodeo, Animas, and Hachita lie just to the northwest, north, and northeast respectively.  The former Dodge mining town of Playas is now a training facility for the States Department of Homeland Security.References
28647631
Chile_mining_accident
Chile mining accident may refer to:* El Teniente mining accident, the biggest metallic mining accident in history;* Copiap mining accident;* Copiap mining accident;
28673526
MEEO
Meteorological and Environmental Earth Observation is an Italian company operating in the research field, mainly devoted to the implementation and development of products and services based on Remote Sensing of the Earth/Atmosphere system.HistoryMEEO was founded in Ferrara in 2004, when 3 physicists (Marco Folegani, Stefano Natali, Simone Mantovani) decided to found a privately-held company in the field of monitoring.The use of multispectral/hyperspectral satellite data for the most different purposes (air quality monitoring, land use classification, rainfall rate estimation, urbanization monitoring, crop-yield estimation inside) is the current core business of the company.MEEO won, in November 2009, the Special Award Young Entrepreneur from the Chamber of Commerce of Ferrara, for the innovative features of its solution. In September 2010, The Globe Tricolore 2010 award for Innovation (Italian Women World-IWW) went to Marco Folegani, one of the three founders of MEEO S.r.l. The IWW awards for Italian excellence in the world, was sponsored by Italian Government and the Italian Chamber of Commerce.The excellence awards are for the innovative meteorological and environmental monitoring applications, succeeding in a few years to credit prestigiously their scientific and entrepreneurial activities in the international arena.MEEO was funded by Aster consortium through many different funding programs during years 2004-2005.In 2004 MEEO was granted funding from the regional innovative development program SPINNER, supported by the Fondo Sociale Europeo, Ministero del Lavoro e delle Politiche Sociali and Regione Emilia Romagna.In 2005, MEEO granted access to all services offered by the Information TECHnology spin-OFF (I TECH-OFF), a business incubator in the field of information technology and multimedia operating in the Emilia-Romagna Region.MEEO is a Value Added Partner of the Space Agency (ESA) since 2006.In 2009 another company was founded: SISTEMA GmbH, which represents an extension of MEEO commercial, research and development activities.SISTEMA GmbH works as a foreign branch of MEEO and it is based in Vienna, Austria, a strategic position for commercial initiatives toward central Europe and Eastern European Countries (Czech Republic, Hungary, Romania as first countries).SISTEMA GmbH is the official distributor of MEEO products and aims also at improving the products realizing specific research and development activities in direct contact with customers and end-users.ProductsMEEO has developed specific software products based on Earth Observation satellite data: SOIL MAPPER, PM MAPPER and MEA.SOIL MAPPER is a fully automatic spectral classification system of multispectral and multi-sensor remotely sensed images. It supports most common satellite optical sensors, from medium to high and very high resolution. It automatically generates three preliminary classification maps, with different classification level sets up to 56 classes.This product allows the automatic identification of many cover classes such us water, urban areas, several kinds of vegetation, snow, ice, clouds. It is mainly addressed to public entities for the territory management, Forest Service, Environmental Service Agencies.The content of fine and ultra-fine Particulate Matter (PM) in the air is becoming more and more important as a field of study in the health sciences, so during the last years MEEO has developed an innovative software system - PM MAPPER - for monitoring Air Pollution or better Particulate Matter concentration and air quality making use of specific satellite-borne sensors. This approach allows extending the monitoring of environmental parameters, currently measured at a local scale by means of monitoring ground station, to a regional/national scale.It processes MODIS images and it generates, as output: near surface PM10 concentration maps in g/m3 with a resolution 1kmx1km, near surface PM2.5 concentration maps in g/m3 with a resolution 1kmx1km, thematic maps representing the air quality index, based on the States Environmental Protection Agency (EPA 2006) classification criteria with a resolution 1kmx1km.The heart of the system is a robust inversion algorithm inspired by the method used by University of Wisconsin in co-operation with NASA http://idea.ssec.wisc.edu.MEA - Multi-Sensor Evolution Analysis - is another MEEO product and it aims to define and use Evolution Models, which describe how to detect a specific feature from related land cover changes over time. Dynamic phenomena may have relevant effects on environment and therefore on mankind and can leave traces on land cover changes, detectable from Earth Observation data.In order to boost automation in the identification of features with dynamic behaviour, Space Agency has just implemented a prototype of a multi-temporal analysis solution, called MEA. Its aim is to permit the definition and use of Evolution Models, which describe how to detect a specific feature from related land cover changes over time. In order to reach this objective, it is necessary to create a common classification system and an Earth Fixed geospatial reference, also applicable across different missions.MEA was studied to help the user to: Define time Evolution Models of features Apply Evolution Models across 13 years of AATSR data Obtain in a few seconds the results of related spatio-temporal and semantic queries.MEA was developed by MEEO during the research project Support by Pre-classification to Specific Applications of the SPA Project committed by Space Agency.MEEO is working on a project named SENSORER co-funded by Emilia-Romagna (mainly from European fund for regional development), innovative for this Italian region because it will provide a new tool on Lepida network for the Air Pollution monitoring.This project is highly innovative because it integrates Particulate Matter maps with Emilia-Romagna ARPA (Agenzia Regionale Prevenzione Ambiente) ground station data.ReferencesHere a list of the main scientific papers.T.N. Thanh Nguyen, S. Mantovani, M. Bottoni (March 2010) PM MAPPER: AN AIR QUALITY MONITORING SYSTEM WITH FINE SPATIAL RESOLUTION PRODUCT AND INTEGRATED SURFACE INFORMATION.Presented at Hyperspectral Workshop 2010 (Roma, March 2010).Publication of Proceedings: end June 2010T.N. Thanh Nguyen, S. Mantovani, M. Bottoni (July 2010) ESTIMATION OF AEROSOL AND AIR QUALITY FIELDS WITH PM MAPPER  AN OPTICAL MULTISPECTRAL DATA PROCESSING PACKAGE.Presented on the proceedings of ISPRS International Archives of The Photogrammetry, Remote Sensing and Spatial Information Sciences (Vienna, July 2010).Publication by October 2010.S. Mantovani, A. Baraldi, S. Natali (July 2009) SOIL MAPPER MULTI-SENSOR AND MULTITEMPORALAPPLICATIONS FOR SEMANTIC-BASED IMAGE INFORMATION MINING.Published on the book chapter of the GeoSpatial Visual Analytics book.S. Natali, A. Baraldi, S. Mantovani, M. Cavicchi (sept 2008) SOIL MAPPER (A)ATSR Version: (A)ATSR preliminary spectral categorization system.Published as ESA abstract of the ESA 2nd MERIS/(A)ATSR User Workshop.M. Cavicchi, A. Beccati, S. DElia, A. Della Vecchia, A. Baraldi, S. Natali (sept 2008) A TWELVE YEARS ATSR-2/AATSR PRELIMINARY CLASSIFICATION MAPS DATABASE.Published as paper at ESA 2nd MERIS/(A)ATSR User WorkshopL. Pellegrini, S. Natali, A. Baraldi (sept 2008) SOMAFID: A SECOND LEVEL STRATIFIED IMAGE PROCESSING SYSTEM FOR THERMAL ANOMALIES IDENTIFICATION IN (A)ATSR IMAGERYPublished as paper at ESA 2nd MERIS/(A)ATSR User Workshop.External linksMEEO Services are available on Space Agency Service Support Environment (SSE) portal*http://services.eoportal.org/portal/user/GetCompanyInfo.do?companyId0F806B80Further information about SENSORER project on Emilia-Romagna website*http://fesr.regione.emilia-romagna.it/progetti/imprese/progetti-di-ricerca-collaborativa-attivita-i.1.2Further details information on MEEO products and solutions is available at MEEO website*http://www.meeo.itPress release of IWW award for Italian excellence in the world*http://www.italianwomenworld.com/home.asp?linguaen*http://rassegna.governo.it/locale/testo.asp?d13616*http://www.fe.camcom.it/urp/manifestazioni/notizie/premio-internazionale-all2019eccellenza-italiana-nel-mondo.-fra-i-premiati-provenienti-da-4-continenti-anche-i-ferraresi-marco-folegani-e-tonino-lamborghini*http://ricerca.repubblica.it/repubblica/archivio/repubblica/2010/09/18/premio-globo-tricolore-eccellenza-lamborghini-ai-magnifici.html*http://www.estense.com/leccellenza-italiana-nel-mondo-parla-anche-ferrarese-085462.html
28690746
Missouri_French
mapMissouri French is a nearly extinct variety of the French language formerly spoken in the upper River Valley in the United States, particularly in southeastern Missouri. Once spoken widely across the region known as the Country or Louisiana, the dialect is now highly endangered, with only a few elderly local residents able to speak it.() It is one of the three major forms of French that originated in the United States, together with French and England French (Acadian).(HistorySpeakers of Missouri French, who call themselves Croles, are descendants of the early French settlers of the upper River Valley, the region then known as Country () or Louisiana (). French colonization of the region began in the late 17th century by Acadian de bois from what is now Canada. By 1760, they had settled six towns  Cahokia, Kaskaskia, St. Philippe, Chartres, and Prairie du Rocher in present-day Illinois, and Ste. Genevieve in Missouri  and claimed the region for the colony of French Louisiana.(Carrire 1939, p. 109.)(Carrire 1941a, p. 410.)As the British moved into the Territory (the region to the east of the Mississippi), which they finally annexed in 1765 following the and Indian War, many of these French colonists relocated across the river into what is now Missouri, establishing St. Louis and other settlements and outposts. From that time through the early 19th century Creoles began settling in the Ozark highlands above the river, particularly after all of French Louisiana was sold to the United States in 1803.( French speakers flocked to the mountains following Austins establishment of serious mining operations at Potosi in 1797, and founded settlements such as Mines (), which became a center of Missouri French language and culture.(Linguists began studying Missouris French enclave in the 20th century, as the dialect was dying out. At this time much of the population was centered in the Old Mines area in the Ozarks. J.-M. Carrire noted that there were around 600 French-speaking families around Old Mines in the 1930s and 1940s.( Carrire undertook a study of the dialect, recording 73 tales from local conteurs. Among other distinguishing features, he noted that Missouri French had been heavily influenced by English, with many English words and even entire idiomatic phrases borrowed or translated into the dialect.(Carrire 1939, pp. 113119.) This contact led to a substantial decline in use of French over the next decades; by the end of the century, only a handful of elderly speakers of Missouri French remained.(NotesReferences****du Missouri
28704387
Catholicism_in_the_Second_Spanish_Republic
Image:Flag of Spain 1931 1939.svg|thumb|right|of the Second Spanish RepublicImage:Cathedral palma mallorca spain 2007 08 15.jpg|thumb|225px|left|La Seu of Palma.Catholicism in the Second Spanish Republic was an important area of dispute, and tensions between the Catholic hierarchy and the Republic were apparent from the beginning - the establishment of the Republic began the most dramatic phase in the contemporary history of both Spain and the Church.(Payne,Stanley G., Spanish Catholicism: An Historical Overview, p. 149, Univ of Wisconsin Press, 1984) The dispute over the role of  the Church and the rights of Catholics were one of the major issues which worked against the securing of a broad democratic majority and left the body politic divided almost from the start.(Payne, Stanley G.  A History of Spain and Portugal, Vol. 2, Ch. 25, p. 632 (Print Edition: University of Wisconsin Press, 1973) (LIBRARY OF IBERIAN RESOURCES ONLINE Accessed May 30, 2007)) The historian Mary Vincent has argued that the Catholic Church was an active element in the polarising politics of the years preceding the Spanish Civil War.  Similarly, Lannon asserts that, Catholic identity has usually been virtually synonymous with conservative politics in some form or other, ranged from extreme authoritarianism through gentler oligarchic tendencies to democratic reformism. The municipal elections of 1931 that triggered the establishment of the Spanish Republic and the Constitution of 1931 brought to power an anticlerical government.(Anticlericalism Britannica Online Encyclopedia)  Prime Minister Azaa asserted that the Catholic Church was responsible in part for what many perceived as Spains backwardness and advocated the elimination of special privileges for the Church. An admirer of the pre-1914 French Republic, he wanted the Second Spanish Republic to emulate it, make secular schooling free and compulsory, and construct a non-religious basis for national culture and citizenship, part of the necessary updating and Europeanising of Spain.(F. Lannon, the Spanish Civil War, 1936-39 p.18) Following elections in June 1931, the new parliament approved an amended constitutional draft on 9 December 1931. The constitution introduced female suffrage, civil marriage and divorce.(Vincent, p.121)  It also established free, obligatory, secular education for all.  However, anti-clerical laws nationalized Church properties and required the Church to pay rent for the use of properties which it had previously owned.  In addition, the government forbade public manifestations of Catholicism such as processions on religious feast days,  banished the crucifix from schools; the Jesuits were expelled. Catholic schools continued, but outside the state system, and in 1933 further legislation banned all monks and nuns from teaching.(In May 1931, after monarchist provocations, an outburst of mob violence against the Republics perceived enemies had led to the burning of churches, convents and religious schools in Madrid and other cities.(Mary Vincent, Catholicism in the Second Spanish Republic, p.158) Anticlerical sentiment and anticlerical legislation, particularly that of 1931, meant that moderate Catholicism quickly became embattled and it was ultimately displaced.In the election of November 1933, the right-wing CEDA emerged as the largest single party in the new Cortes. President Alcal-Zamora however asked the Radical leader Lerroux to become Spains Prime Minister.A general strike and armed rising of workers in October 1934 was forcefully put down by the government. This in turn energized political movements across the spectrum in Spain, including a revived anarchist movement and new reactionary and fascist groups, including the Falange and a revived Carlist movement. On the outbreak of Civil War in 1936, thirteen bishops and some 7,000 clergy, monks and nuns were killed by Republican forces, and thousands of churches were destroyed.(Franzen 397) After that, Catholics largely supported Francos rebel Nationalist forces against the Popular Front government.(, and Frances Lannon, The Churchs crusade against the Republic, Revolution and War in Spain. p.37) By the end of the war 20% percent of the nations clergy had been killed.(Bowen, Wayne H., Spain During World War II, p. 222, University of Missouri Press 2006)  Individual clergymen and entire religious communities  were executed with a death toll of 13 bishops, 4,172 diocesan priests and seminarists, 2,364 monks and friars and 283 nuns, for a total of 6,832 victims, as part of what is referred to as Spains Red Terror.(de la Cueva, Religious Persecution, Anticlerical Tradition and Revolution: On Atrocities against the Clergy during the Spanish Civil War Journal of Contemporary History 33.3 (July 1998): 355.)BackgroundSpain entered the twentieth century a predominantly agrarian nation  a nation which, moreover, had lost its colonies. It was marked by uneven social and cultural development between town and country, between regions, within classes.  Spain was not one country but a number of countries and regions marked by their uneven historical development.(Ronald Fraser, quoted in Blood of Spain, p.38) From the turn of the century, however, there had been a significant advance in industrial development. Between 1910 and 1930 the industrial working class more than doubled to over 2,500,000. Those engaged in agriculture fell from 66 per cent to 45 per cent in the same period.  The coalition hoped to concentrate its major reforms on three sectors : the latifundist aristocracy, the church and the army  though the attempt would come at a moment of world economic crisis.  In the south less than 2 per cent of all landowners had over two thirds of the land, while 750,000 labourers eked out a living on near starvation wages.  The country was prone to centrifugal tendencies, for example there was a tension between Catalan and Basque nationalist sentiment away from an agrarian and centralist ruling class in Madrid.(The Blood of Spain Ronald Fraser p.35, 37) Moreover, whilst all Spain was Catholic by formal definition , in practice Catholic identity varied, affected by factors that ranged from region, to social strata, to the ownership of property, to age, and sex. General patterns were ones of higher levels of Catholic practice throughout much of the north and low levels in the south - (the very regions of the final expulsion of the Moors and Catholic reconquest in the fifteenth century seems never to have been truly conquered for the Church.),(Lannon, Privilege, Persecution and prophecy, p.14) and higher levels of Catholic practice amongst peasant smallholders than landless peasant labourers. Further, the urban proletariat of Madrid, or Barcelona, or Bilbao, or Valencia, or Seville or the mining centres of the Asturias rarely entered a church ..the Church and its affairs were simply alien to urban working-class culture. As Canon Arboleya put it in his famous analysis in 1933, the dimensions of the problem were those of mass apostasy, especially among the urban working classes.(M.Arboleya Martinez, La apostasia de las masas, Barcelona 1934)Spanish Catholics participated in an enormous number of religious rites quite separate from the minimal obligations of orthodoxy - (church on Sundays, the sacraments) - processions and cults connected with statues and shrines, for example. Like the rosary and novenas, these were lay rather than sacerdotal forms of worship. In some public religious rituals the question of whether the ritual was primarily religious or political became an issue. The Jesuit campaign to spread the cult of the Heart was  inextricably linked in the early 20th century with the integrist values of the extreme Right of the Catholic political spectrum.(Lannon, p.29) Its publication the Messenger of the Sacred Heart was anti-liberal, anti-Semitic, and enthusiastic to see the social reign of Jesus Christ in Spain. It campaigned for the enthronement of the Sacred Heart in offices, schools, banks, town halls, and city streets. Statues were erected in hundreds of towns and villages. Seen as symbols of Catholic conservative intolerance the statues were executed by some anarchists and socialists in the early months of the Spanish Civil War in 1936.The Second Republicimage:Cardenal Segura en Sevilla.jpg|thumb|right|180px| Cardinal Segura - the most integrist of all prelates(Lannon, p.47 Privilege, Persecution and Prophecy)The Spanish Republic was established on 14 April 1931, after the abdication of King XIII.(p.1 Mary Vincent, Catholicism in the Second spanish republicISBN 0-19-820613-5)   The government, led by President Alcal-Zamora, instituted a reformist program, including agrarian reform,(Beevor, Antony. The Battle for Spain; The Spanish Civil War 1936-1939. Penguin Books. 2006. London. p.22 and 25) right to divorce,(Preston, Paul. The Spanish Civil War. Reaction, revolution & revenge. Harper Perennial. 2006. London. p.54) vote for women (November 1933),(Graham, Helen. The Spanish Civil War. A Very Short Introduction. Oxford University Press. 2005. p.11) reform of the Army,(Preston, Paul. The Spanish Civil War. Reaction, revolution & revenge. Harper Perennial. 2006. London. p.47) autonomy for Catalonia(Beevor, Antony. The Battle for Spain; The Spanish Civil War 1936-1939. Penguin Books. 2006. London. p.22) and the Basque country (October 1936).(Beevor, Antony.The Battle for Spain; The Spanish Civil War 1936-1939. Penguin Books. 2006. London. p.223) The proposed reform was blocked by the right and rejected by the far-left Nacional del Trabajo. One of the most controversial changes however, was the so-called separation of the church and state.(Graham, Helen. The Spanish Civil War. A Very Short Introduction. Oxford University Press. 2005. p.7) Article 26 of the 1931 republican constitution, and subsequent legislation, halted state funding for the Catholic Church, banned the Jesuits and other religious orders, banned clerics from all teaching in schools, appropriated the properties of the Catholic Church and banned processions, statues and other manifestations of Catholicism.(Stanley G Payne, Spains first democracy: the Second Republic, 1931-1936  Univ of Wisconsin Press, 1993, ISBN 0-299-13674-4, pp. 81-84) These strictures helped to alienate a large mass of the Catholic population.(Graham , Helen, The Spanish Republic at War, Cambridge University Press, 2002, pp. 28-30) Republicanism represented a confrontation with all that had gone before and could be combative :  In August 1931 in Mlaga, for example, the usual celebrations in honour of Lady of Victory under whose patronage  the Spanish Crown had driven out the Moors in 1497 were replaced by a beauty pageant to find the citys Miss Republic. It would have been hard to devise a celebration more calculated to offend the Catholic right. To convinced Monarchists, the Republic was not merely distasteful, it was an anathema. The Carlist militias, long confined to their Navarrese heartlands, were training in the mountains as early as 1931. (Mary vincent, p.120  Spain  1833-2002) The rights defeat in 1931 left some prepared to give the new regime a chance, but many more , particularly those in the circles around Herrera Oria and Gil Robles  accepted the rules of the democratic game only as a means to destroy the 1931 Republic.(Vincent, Spain 1833-2002) The Republic suffered attacks from the right (the failed coup of Sanjurjo in 1932), and the left (the uprising of Asturias in 1934), also it suffered the impact of the Depression.(Beevor, Antony. The Battle for Spain; The Spanish Civil War 1936-1939. Penguin Books. 2006. London. p.21)While the coalition held political power, economic power escaped it. In historian Thomass words, Like so many others before and since it frightened the middle class without satisfying the workers. It adopted the measures of separation of church and state, genuine universal suffrage, a cabinet responsible to a single chamber parliament, a secular educational system. The new republican nation was partly to be created through a system of state education, which would be secular, obligatory, free of charge, and available to all. This last measure antagonised the Church. XIs 1929encyclical Divini illius magistri had said that the Church directly and perpetually possessed the whole truth in the moral sphere. Education was, therefore, first and super-eminently the function of the Church. de Riveras dictatorship had offered the Church the protection it felt was its due. Now however, the Second Republic excluded the Church from education by prohibiting teaching by religious orders, even in private schools), restricted Church property rights and investments, provided for confiscation of and prohibitions on ownership of Church property, and banned the of Jesus.(Torres Gutirrez, Alejandro ,Religious minorities in Spain: A new model of relationships? Center for Study on New Religions 2002)(Burleigh, Michael, Sacred Causes: The Clash of Religion and Politics, From the Great War to the War on Terror, pp. 128-129 HarperCollins, 2007. Burleigh says the constitution went much further than a legal separation of Church and state.) (The Catholic revival heralded by the restoration of the monarchy in the person of Isabellas son XII of Spain saw the number of religious in the religious Congregations soar. Catholic Spain was dominated by the schools ,colleges, missions, publications, clinics and hospitals of the religious orders. The Spanish landed aristocracy and upper middle classes gave buildings and income to the religious congregations to found schools, hospitals and orphanages - conspicuous examples included Tibidabo hill in Barcelona to Don Bosco, and the Jesuit University in Deusto, from which young men would leave, fully armed against all modern errors.(Lannon, p.69 ch3) Deemed illiberal they attracted particular attention in the years 1931-33. In the crucial 1933 election no fewer than 20 Deusto men were elected to the republican Cortes for various parties of the Right and Centre. Herrera Oria director of Debate, inspirer of the Confederation of the Autonomous Right was a Deusto man. The most sustained intellectual onslaught against religious was probably that of de Unamuno and his denunciation of the degenerate sons of of Loyola, the Jesuits. He accused their educational endeavours of being corrupted by materialistic and apologetical aims , that they were subservient to an anti-intellectual plutocracy, and that they choked modernity, reform, creativity and even true spirituality with their philistinism and intolerance.)(Lannon, ch 3, Privilege, Persecution and Prophecy,) During the democratic republic of 1931-36 many Catholic politicians favoured female suffrage because of its likely benefit to the Right, but simultaneously ridiculed campaigns for womens rights or women in parliament. Women constituted the majority of practising Catholics, but in church always listened to men preach and celebrate the sacraments. Male priests told them to obey their husbands, at every turn the message was clear; men were born for authority and social responsibility; women were born for domesticity, motherhood, or sexual renunciation.(Lannon, p.55) Political militancy  did not fit easily with these stereotypes, there was no Catholic equivalent of the anarchist Montseny, though the Falanges Seccin feminina was aggressive in its propagation of an authoritarian, anti-feminist and ever more conservative ideology.( When some Catholic Basque nationalist women turned  their attention in the 1930s  to organising meetings and making public speechess, they shocked Catholic contemporaries..after conquering the Basque country during the first year of civil war, soldiers of the Catholic Crusade expressed their loathing for both Basque nationalism and politically active women by subjecting these Emakumes to the humiliation of being dosed with oil in public and having their heads shaved.(Lannon, p.56)Since the Republican left considered moderation of the anticlericalist aspects of the constitution as totally unacceptable, the historian Payne has written that the Republic as a democratic constitutional regime was doomed from the outset.()  Commentators have posited that the hostile approach to the issues of church and state was a substantial cause of the breakdown of democracy and the onset of civil war.(Stepan, Alfred,Arguing Comparative Politics, p. 221, Oxford University Press)(Martinez-Torron, Javier Freedom of religion in the case law of the Spanish Constitutional court Brigham Young University Law Review 2001) Victor Perez Diaz, in a recent book, characterised  the Catholic reaction to the anticlerical offensive as one that mobilized the mass of peasants and the middle classes and channeling them into professional and political right wing organisations, prepared for by decades of careful organizational work. The extreme right soon took upon itself the task of conspiring to overthrow the regime. The moderate right refused to state its unambiguous loyaly to the new institutions and openly flirted with authoritarianism.(Victor Prez Diaz, The Return of Civil Society, Harvard, 1993, p.128)Initial reaction of CatholicsDespite the anticlerical aspects of the constitution, the Republican coalitions electoral policy stated: Catholics: the maximum program of the coalition is freedom of religion.... The Republic... will not persecute any religion.(Payne,Stanley G., Spanish Catholicism: An Historical Overview, p. 152, Univ of Wisconsin Press, 1984) According to historian Payne , though a deliberate deception,.. this propaganda was obviously accepted by many Catholics.( Although at the outset tensions were apparent between the Church hierarchy and the republic, the hierarchy likewise formally accepted the statement, hoping for a continuation of the existing Concordat.(  Official or organized opposition did not exist at the beginning.( The first formal dissent was in May 1931 when the archconservative Cardinal of the Archdiocese of Toledo, Pedro Segura, published a writing in defense of the former king.(Burning of the conventsFollowing a monarchist provocation on the previous day when the royal march was played to the crowds coming away from their Sunday paseo in Madrids  Retiro Park, mobs led by anarchists and some Radical Socialists sacked monarchist headquarters in Madrid on May 11, 1931 and then proceeded to set fire or otherwise wreck more than a dozen churches in the capital. Similar acts of arson and vandalism were perperated in a score of other cities in southern and eastern Spain.  These attacks came to be referred to as the quema de conventos (the burning of the convents).It was alleged that this anticlerical violence was carried, for the most part with the acquiescence and in some cases the active assistance of the official Republican authorities.  Despite the protests of Maura - who as minister of the Interior was ultimately responsible for public order - the government refused to intervene and the fever of anticlerical incendiarism spread rapidly around the country - Murcia, Malaga (the most extensive damage occurred in this city), Cadiz, Almeria. When criticized by the Catholic Church for not doing more to stop the burning of religious buildings in May 1931  Prime Minister Azaa famously retorted that the burning of all the convents in Spain was not worth the life of a single Republican.The burning of the convents set the tone for relations between the Republican left and the Catholic right.  The events of 11 May came to be seen as a turning point in the history of the Second Republic. For example, Mara Gil Robles claimed to regard the convent burnings as decisive. He claimed that the fires of 11 May destroyed the precarious coexistence which had been established between Church and State.  (Indeed Gil Robles persisted in seeing the burnings as the result of planned and co-ordinated action by the republican government. The liberal catholic Ossorio y Gallardo also believed in the likelihood of conspiracy - but as the work of monarchist agents provocateurs.)From now on, wrote Ossorio,  the right was utterly opposed to Maura as if he, a sincere Catholic, had been responsible for burning churches.  The political fate of the moderate Catholic Maura exemplified the predicament of the centre in periods of intense political polarization - though he demonstrated his defence of Church property in May 1931 he was still dubbed by the Catholic right as one  who consented to Spain being lit by burning churches.Gil Robles was one of the prime beneficiaries of Mauras discomfiture and one of the first to capitalise on it. Following the passage of the 1931 Constitution with its anticlerical clauses Maura (on 14 October 1931) and Alcal-Zamora resigned - though their resignations did nothing to reconcile them to the agrarian Catholic right. The position of the Catholic republicans was an isolated one.(Frances Lannon, Privilege, Persecution, and Prophecy, 195-197)1931 ConstitutionIn the fall of 1931, a new constitution was passed that prohibited public religious processions and outlawed much of the work of Catholic orders.  No fewer than six constitutional articles were used to define the new, subordinate place of the Catholic Church, many modelled on the Constitution of 1911. The conservative Catholic Republicans Alcal-Zamora and Maura resigned from the government(Frances Lannon, p.20 The Spanish Civil War, 2002) when the controversial articles 26 and 27 of the constitution, which committed the Spanish government to phasing out state funding of clergy stipends,(Lannon, p.14 Privilege, Persecution and Prophecy) and strictly controlled Church property and prohibited religious orders from engaging in education were passed.(Smith, Angel, Historical Dictionary of Spain, p. 195, Rowan & Littlefield 2008) Not only advocates of a state but also certain advocates of church/state separation saw the constitution as hostile; one such advocate of separation, Ortega y Gasset, stated the article in which the Constitution legislates the actions of the Church seems highly improper to me.(Paz, Jose Antonio Souto Perspectives on religious freedom in Spain Brigham Young University Law Review Jan. 1, 2001) Article 26 -  one of the most divisive articles in the constitution..debarred religious from teaching though not from welfare work.(Lannon, p.78) (This attempt to close the religious schools altogether and to keep religious out of the state system was unsuccessful - the necessary legislation was only completed in June 1933 to take effect for 1 October 1933. The victory of the Right in elections at the end of 1933 immediately rendered it dead.)In October 1931 Jos Mara Gil-Robles the leading spokesman of the parliamentary right declared that the constitution was stillborn - a dictatorial Constitution in the name of democracy. Robles  wanted to use mass meetings to give supporters of the right a sense of their own strength and, ominously, to accustom them to fight, when necessary, for the possession of the street.(Gil-Robles, No fue posible la paz, quoted in Mary Vincent Catholicism in the Second Spanish Republic, p.182)  Lannon characterizes the constitution as creating a secular democratic system based on equal rights for all, with provision for regional autonomy, but also calls the constitution divisive in that the articles on property and religion had a disregard for civil rights and ruined the prospect of conservative Catholics Republicans.(Frances Lannon, p.20  the Spanish Civil War, 1936-1939 ISBN 978-1-84176-369-9) Likewise, Payne agrees that the constitution generally accorded a wide range of civil liberties and representation with the notable exception of the rights of Catholics, a circumstance which prevented the formation of an expansive democratic majority.( Frances Lannon, addressing the fears of the Left that Church influence in the schools was a danger to the republic has observed that, it was demonstrably the case the ideological ambience and spirit of the congregations was anti-socialist, illiberal, and pervaded with the values of the political Right. She gives as one example, to convey the wider reality, a journal kept by a womens community with a prestigious convent school in Seville. It laments, in April 1931, the departure of the King, its wariness of the Republic ante-dating any moves against the Church, in November 1933 they go to vote, a sacred duty, in grave circumstances, the Rights victory greeted as better than we could have hoped. The Asturian rising brings forth the declaration that the conduct of the army was magnificent and the rebellion crushed step by step. In February 1936 there is despair until, Relation of the heroic patriotic days of Seville, July 1936, the account of the rising against the Republic is euphoric. In 1937 the convent school hears from Queipo de Llano himself, and there are delirious accounts of military parades and speeches by Quiepo, and Franco in August, until 18 April 1939 official recognition of the school and a letter from Francos secretary in Burgos thanking the community for its good wishes. The journal is not exceptional Lannon concludes, The politically reactionary sympathies of the teaching religious were formed and sustained by the sociological context and limitations of the schools.(Lannon, p.84)Religious communities - education/welfareDisease, poverty, and illiteracy were urgent problems, but in a country with a fiscal system that left most real wealth untaxed, and a large army budget, little public money was directed towards meeting them. Education and welfare needs were met only patchily and religious communities filled the spaces between the patches. Frances Lannon (writing in Privilege, Persecution and Prophecy) observes that even institutions funded by the state or provincial or municipal authorities, were dependent upon religious personnel. The Brothers of St John of God for example specialised in childrens hospitals and mental homes. Where welfare was concerned central and local government relied absolutely on the religious congregations to staff as well as supplement their institutions. This was made explicit in the debates on the religious congregations in the constituent Cortes on 814 October 1931, and was a major reason then, why the congregations were not entirely disbanded. Yet the religious sometimes found themselves excoriated. Sometimes this was because of the different cultural worlds inhabited on the one hand by religious , almost always from devout and traditional milieux, and on the other by the urban poor. To the former it seemed axiomatic that religious practice should order the daily lives of their various charges, be they children, workmen or reformed prostitutes. There is overwhelming evidence however to show that this typical imposition of religious observance as a condition of eligibility for aid was widely resented.  Working class areas of the large cities were notorious for the virtual absence of formal religious practice. Nelken, in the 1920s, said that the poor residents of the most rundown areas of Madrid had terrible things to say about the charity given by women lay associations  and not a single word of thanks. Frances Lannon has further speculated that perhaps the resentment, generated by making charity dependent upon religious tests, and by the sale of goods and services from religious houses, (undercutting those struggling to make a living on the margins of urban society ) goes some way to explain why so many brothers, and even some nuns, whose laudable work might have been expected to save them from popular hatred, were nevertheless massacred in 1936 in the first months of the civil war.(Lannon, p.77)The most bitter controversies about the congregations in the pre-war years, however, had always centred on their schools and colleges to which about half of all male communities and one third of the female were dedicated.Formation of CEDAThe Spanish Confederation of the Autonomous Right (Espaola de Derechas Autnomas or CEDA) was founded in February 1933 and was led from its inception by Jos Mara Gil-Robles. Despite dismissing the idea of a party as a rigid fiction, the CEDA leaders created a stable party organisation which would lead the Spanish right into the age of mass politics.(Vincent, Catholicism in the Spanish Second Republic, Oxrford,p.202) The campaign against the constitution began in CEDAs Castilian heartlands.(Mary Vincent, Spain 1833-2002 p.127 ISBN  978-0-19-873159-7)Dilectissima NobisOn 3 June 1933, in the encyclical Nobis (On Oppression Of The Church Of Spain), Pius XI condemned the Spanish Governments deprivation of the liberties on which the Republic was supposedly based, noting in particular the expropriation of Church property and schools and the persecution of religious communities and orders.(Dilectissima Nobis, 1933)  He demanded restitution of the expropriated properties which were now, by law, property of the Spanish State, to which the Church had to pay rent and taxes in order to continue using these properties. Thus the Catholic Church is compelled to pay taxes on what was violently taken from her(Dilectissima Nobis, 9-10) Religious vestments, liturgical instruments, statues, pictures, vases, gems and similar objects necessary for worship were expropriated as well.(Dilectissima Nobis, 12)  The encyclical urged Catholics in Spain to fight with all legal means against these injustices.1933 electionThe announcement of a general election in November 1933 brought about an unprecedented mobilization of the Spanish right. El Debate instructed its readers to make the coming elections into an obsession, the  sublime culmination of citizenly duties, so that victory in the polls would bring an end to the nightmare of the republican bienio rojo. Great emphasis was placed on the techniques of electoral propaganda. Gil-Robles visited Germany to study modern methods, including the rally.  A national electoral committee was established, comprising CEDA, Alfonsist, Traditionalist, and Agrarian representatives - but excluding Mauras Conservative Republicans. The CEDA swamped entire localities with electoral publicity. The party produced ten million leaflets, together with some two hundred thousand coloured posters and hundreds of cars were used to distribute this material through the provinces. In all of the major cities propaganda films were shown around the streets on screens mounted on large lorries.(Gil Robles, No fue posible la paz p.100)The need for unity was the constant theme of the campaign fought by the CEDA and the election was presented as a confrontaion of ideas, not of personalities. The electors choice was simple: they voted for redemption or revolution and they voted for Christianity or Communism.  The fortunes of Republican Spain, according to one of its posters had been decided by immorality and anarchy.  Catholics who continued to proclaim their republicanism were moved into the revolutionary camp and many speeches argued that the Catholic republican option had become totally illegitimate. A good Catholic may not vote for the Conservative Republican party declared a Gaceta Regional editorial and the impression was given that Conservative Republicans, far from being Catholics, were in fact anti-religious.In this all-round attack on the political centre, the mobilization of women also became a major electoral tactic of the Catholic right.  The Asociacin Feminina de Educacin had been formed in October 1931. As the 1933 general election approached women were warned that unless they voted correctly communism would come  which will tear your children from your arms, your parish church will be detroyed, the husband you love will flee from your side authorized by the divorce law, anarchy will come to the countryside, hunger and misery to your home.(Gaceta Regional, 5 and 8 November 1933)  AFEC orators and organisers urged women to vote For God and for Spain! Mirroring the female qualities emphasized by AFEC  the CEDAs self-styled seccon de defensa brought young male activists to the fore.  This new CEDA squad was very much in evidence on election day itself, when its members patrolled the streets and polling stations in the provincial capital, supposedly to prevent the left from tampering with the boxes.(Vincent p.212.)Lerroux governmentIn the 1933 elections, the CEDA won a plurality of seats; however, these were not enough to form a majority. Despite the CEDAs plurality of seats, President Alcal-Zamora declined to invite its leader, Jos Maria Gil-Robles, to form a government, and instead assigned the task to Lerroux of the Republican Party.  CEDA supported the Lerroux government and subsequently received three ministerial positions.Hostility between the left and the right increased after the 1933 formation of the Government. Spain experienced strikes and street conflicts. Noted among the strikes was the miners revolt in northern Spain and riots in Madrid. Nearly all rebellions were crushed by the Government and political arrests followed.Radicals became more aggressive, and conservatives turned to paramilitary and vigilante actions. According to official sources, 330 people were assassinated and 1,511 were wounded in political violence; records show 213 failed assassination attempts, 113 general strikes, and the destruction (typically by arson) of 160 religious buildings.(The statistics on assassinations, destruction of religious buildings, etc. immediately before the start of the war come from The Last Crusade: Spain: 1936 by Warren Carroll (Christendom Press, 1998). He collected the numbers from Historia de la Persecucin Religiosa en Espaa (19361939) by Antonio Montero Moreno (Biblioteca de Autores Cristianos, 3rd edition, 1999).)The Lerroux government suspended most of the reforms of the previous Azaa government, provoking an armed miners rebellion in Asturias on October 6, and an autonomist rebellion in Catalonia.  Both rebellions were suppressed (Asturias rebellion by young General Franco and colonial troops), being followed by mass political arrests and trials.Anti-leftist rhetoricThe Asturias revolt was another defeat  for the European left - in Germany Hitler had destroyed organized labour, liquidating Europes strongest communist party, in Austria, the Catholic corporatist Dolfuss, admired by the CEDA, had used paramilitary forces to crush Viennese Marxists of all varieties. To the right, Asturias was evidence of the revolutionary lefts plans for Spain.  The rebels had killed  thirty-four priests and seminarians - the most clerical blood spilt in Spain for over a hundred years.In Catholic Salamanca, for example, good sons and daughters of the Church were exhorted to mark the victory in Asturias by prayer and penance and make reparation to the majestic and victorious figure of the King.  The figure of Christ clothed in majesty was also used by the Catholic right as a symbol of the triumph of their cause. In Spain, as in Belgium or Mexico, Christ the King had become the symbol of militant Catholicism.(Vincent, p.231)  For example, the Catholic Gaceta Nacional celebrated the suppression of the rebellions and its editor that the uprisings had been followed not by repression but by justice.  The CEDA paper, El Debate spoke of the passions of the beast.  Against the dehumanized forces of the international revolution - believed to be manipulated by the shadowy figures of Soviet Communists, freemasons and Jews - the army had stood firm.(p.134 Mary Vincent, Spain 1833-2002)As a prelude to the CEDAs 1933 election campaign, GIl Robles had announced the need to purge the fatherland of Judaizing Freemasons and the stock figures of the grasping Jew and Machiavellian Mason accurred again and again in the partys electoral propaganda. The Dominican journal La Ciencia Tomista issued from Esteban in Salamanca proclaimed the continuing relevance  of the of the Elders of Sion. Jewish Marxists, expelled from ghettos across the world, took refuge in Spain where they settle down and sprawl about, as in conquered territories. This conspiratorial rhetoric came to the fore during the election campaigns of November 1933 and February 1936, in both cases allowing the Catholic right to present the fight  at the ballot box as an apocalyptic battle between good and evil. Extremist rhetoric and anti-semitic theory - prevalent among both supporters and orators of the CEDA - provided immediate common ground between Catholic parliamentarians and the extreme right.(Mary Vincent p.219-220 Catholicism in the second Spanish Republic)In 1934, a Spanish cleric named de Castro Albarrn gained notoriety as the author of El derecho a la rebeldia, a theological defence of armed rebellion that was serialised in the Carlist press, published under the usual ecclesiastical licences.Juventudes de Accin PopularThe de Accin Popular, the youth wing within the CEDA, soon developed its own identity differentiating itself from the main body of the CEDA.  The JAP emphasized sporting and political activity. It had its own fortnightly paper, the first issue of which proclaimed: We want a new state.  The JAPs distaste for the principles of universal suffrage was such that internal decisions were never voted upon. As the thirteenth point of the JAP put it: Anti-parliamentarianism. Anti-dictatorship. The people participating in Government in an organic manner, not by degenerate democracy. The line between Christian corporatism and fascist statism became very thin indeed.(M.Vincent, Catholicism in the Second Spanish Republic) The fascist tendencies of the JAP were vividly demonstrated in the series of rallies held by the CEDA youth movement during the course of 1934.  Using the title jefe, the JAP created an intense and often disturbing cult around the figure of Gil-Robles. Gil-Robles himself had returned from the 1933 rally and praised its  youthful enthusiasm, steeped in optimism, so different to the desolate and enervating scepticism of our defeatists and intellectuals.Shift of the CEDA to the rightBetween November 1934 and March 1935, the CEDA minister for agriculture, Gimnez Fernndez, introduced into parliament a series of agrarian reform measures designed to better conditions in the Spanish countryside.  These moderate proposals met with a hostile response from reactionary elements within the Cortes, including the conservative wing of the CEDA and the proposed reform was defeated. A change of personnel in the ministry also followed. The agrarian reform bill proved to be a catalyst for a series of increasingly bitter divisions within the Catholic right, rifts that indicated that the broad based CEDA alliance was disintegrating. Partly as a result of the impetus of the JAP, the Catholic party had been moving further to the right, forcing the resignation of moderate government figures, including Villalobos.(Preston, Coming of the Spanish Civil war, 153-54 (2nd edn , 184)) Gil Robles was not prepared to return the agriculture portfolio to Gimenez Fernandez. Mary Vincent writes that, despite the CEDAs rhetoric supporting Catholic social teaching, the extreme right ultimately prevailed.(For all the social Catholic rhetoric, the extreme right had won the day.  Vincent, p.235)Failure of parliamentary CatholicismIn the 1936 Elections a new coalition of Socialists (Socialist Workers Party, PSOE), liberals (Republican Left and the Republican Union Party), Communists, and various regional nationalist groups won the extremely tight election. The results gave 34 percent of the popular vote to the Popular Front and 33 percent to the incumbent government of the CEDA. This result, when coupled with the Socialists refusal to participate in the new government, led to a general fear of revolution.In elections on February 16, 1936, CEDA lost power to the left-wing Popular Front. Support for Gil-Robles and his party evaporated almost overnight as the CEDA haemorrhaged members to the Falange.(Mary Vincent, Catholicism in the Second Spanish Republic, p.239) Mary Vincent writes that, (the) rapid radicalization of the CEDA youth movement effectively meant that all attempts to save parliamentary Catholicism were doomed to failure.(Mary Vincent, Catholicism in the Second Spanish Republic ISBN 0-19-820613-5 p.240, andsee Chapters 10 and 11 in general)Catholic support for the rebellionMany CEDA supporters welcomed the military rebellion in the summer of 1936 which led to the Civil War, and many of them joined Francos National Movement. However, General Franco was determined not to have competing right-wing parties in Spain and, in April 1937, CEDA was dissolved.According to Mary Vincent, The tragedy of the Spanish Republic was that it abetted its own destruction; the tragedy of the Church was that it became so closely allied with its self-styled defenders that its own sphere of action was severely compromised. The Church, grateful for the championship offered first by Mara Gil-Robles y Quiones and then by Franco, entered into a political alliance which would prevent it carrying out the pastoral task it had itself identified.(Vincent, p.258)According to Mary Vincent, The Church was to become the most important source of legitimation for the rebellious generals, justifying the rising as a crusade against godlessness, anarchy and communism. Although such a close identification with the Nationalist cause was not to be fully elaborated until the Spanish hierarchys joint pastoral letter of July 1937, there was no doubt that the Church would line up with the rebels against the Republic. Nor , at local level, was there any hesitancy. The only sizeable group of Catholics to remain loyal to the republic were the Basques. (Vincent, Catholicism in the Second Spanish Republic, p.248, Frances Lannon, Privilege, Persecution, and Prophecy, ch 8)  Similarly, Victor M Perez-Diaz wrote, The church reacted to all this by mobilizing  the mass of peasants and the middle classes and channeling them into professional and political right wing organisations prepared for by decades of careful organisation. The extreme right took upon itself the task of conspiring to overthrow the regime. The moderate right refused to state its unambiguous loyalty to the new institutions and openly flirted with authoritarianism.(The return of civil society: the emergence of Democratic Spain, Victor M Perez-Diaz, Harvard University Press, p.128 1993)Frances Lannon has propounded a view which suggests the existence of an exiguous Catholic minority which saw in the Churchs crusade against the Republic not a defensive holy war that began in 1936 and deserved their support, but a long series of class commitments on political and socio-economic policies which themselves powerfully helped to create the ruthless and desperate anti-clericalism unleashed by the war. Republican Catholics like Manuel Gallegos Rocafull,  Ossorio y Gallardo, and Bergamn, all wrote scathing criticisms of the Churchs role in covering with a religious cloak the political, military and class aims of the anti-Republicans. The ex-Jesuit Vilar i Costa refuted the 1937 collective pastoral letter , the Catalan democratic Catholic politician Carrasco Formiguera was executed on Francos orders in April 1938 because he also failed to agree with official Catholic views. These men emphasised that the Churchs anti-Republican alignment did not originate in, although it was certainly strengthened by, the slaughter of priests by uncontrolled groups on Republican territory, and Lannon  concludes:  The crusade had been waged for a long time by the Church for its own institutional interests, for survival. The cost of its survival was the destruction of the Republic.(Frances Lannon, The Churchs crusade against the Republic  essay in  Revolution and War in Spain ISBN  0-416-34970-6)The Red TerrorAn estimated 55,000 civilians died in Republican-held territories. The Republican government was anticlerical and supporters attacked and murdered Roman Catholic clergy in reaction to news of the military revolt. In Republican held territories, Roman Catholic churches, convents, monasteries, and cemeteries were desecrated. Through the war, nearly all segments of the Republicans, Basques being a notable exception took part in semi-organized anti-Roman Catholic, anticlerical killing of 6,832 members of the Catholic clergy and religious orders.(Religious Persecution, Anticlerical Tradition and Revolution: On Atrocities against the Clergy during the Spanish Civil War Journal of Contemporary History 33.3 (July 1998): 355.)(Payne, Stanley G., A History of Spain and Portugal, Vol. 2, Ch. 26, (Print Edition: University of Wisconsin Press, 1973) (LIBRARY OF IBERIAN RESOURCES ONLINE p. 649.)Although to a much lesser extent, there were also incidents in which Nationalists murdered Catholic clerics. In one particular incident, following the capture of Bilbao, hundreds of people, including 16 priests who had served as chaplains for the Republican forces, were taken to the countryside or to graveyards to be murdered.()}Pius XI referred to Mexico, Spain and Soviet Union as a Triangle and deemed the failure to protest in Europe and the United States as a Conspiracy of Silence.13 bishops were killed from the dioceses of Sigenza, Lleida, Cuenca, Barbastro Segorbe, Jan, Real, Almera, Guadix, Barcelona, Teruel and the auxiliary of Tarragona.( Aware of the dangers, they all decided to remain in their cities. I cannot go, only here is my responsibility, whatever may happen, said the Bishop of Cuenca( In addition 4,172 diocesan priests, 2,364 monks and friars, among them 259  Clarentians, 226 Franciscans, 204 Piarists, 176 Brothers of Mary, 165 Christian Brothers, 155 Augustinians, 132 Dominicans, and 114 Jesuits were killed.( In some dioceses, a number of secular priests were killed:* In Barbastro 123 of 140 priests were killed.( about 88 percent of the secular clergy were murdered, 66 percent* In Lleida, 270 of 410 priests were killed.( about 62 percent* In Tortosa, 44 percent of the secular priests were killed.()* In Toledo 286 of 600 priests priests were killed.(* In the dioceses of Mlaga, Minorca and Segorbe, about half of the priests were killed((* In Madrid 4,000 priests priests were murdered.One source records that 283 nuns were killed, some of whom were badly tortured.(Jedin 617) There are accounts of Catholic faithful being forced to swallow rosary beads, thrown down mine shafts and priests being forced to dig their own graves before being buried alive.(Beevor, Antony The Battle for Spain (Penguin 2006).) The Catholic Church has canonized several of the Spanish Civil War and beatified hundreds more.Foreign involvementThe Catholic Church portrayed the war in Spain as a holy one against godless communists and called for Catholics in other countries to support the Nationalists against the Republicans.  Approximately 183,000 foreign troops fought for Francos Nationalists. Not all of them were volunteers and not all who volunteered did so for religious reasons.  Hitler sent the Condor Legion - 15,000 German pilots, gunners and tank crews. Mussolini sent 80,000 Italian troops, a move which improved his popularity with Italian Catholics.  Portugals Salazar sent 20,000 troops.  Approximately 3000 volunteers from around the world joined the Nationalists from countries such as the United Kingdom, Australiz, France, Ireland, Poland, Argentina, Belgium and Norway.LegacyWithin Spain, the Civil War still raises high emotions.BeatificationsJohn Paul II beatified a total of about 500 martyrs in the years 1987, 1989, 1990, 1992, 1993, 1995,  1997 and March 11, 2001. Some  233 executed clergy were beatified by Pope Paul II on the 11th of March 2001.(New Evangelization with the Saints, Romano 28 November 2001, page 3 (Weekly English Edition)) Regarding the  selection of Candidates, Archbishop Edward Novack from theCongregation of Saints explained  in an interview with Romano : Ideologies such as Nazism or Communism serve as a context of martyrdom, but in the foreground the person stands out with his conduct, and, case by case, it is important that the people among whom the person lived should affirm and recognize his fame as a martyr and then pray to him, obtaining graces. It is not so much ideologies that concern us, as the sense of faith of the People of God, who judge  the persons behaviour(martyr.http://www.ewtn.com/library/MARY/NWEVNGST.HTM)XVI beatified 498 more Spanish martyrs in October 2007,(Tucson priests one step away from sainthood Star 06.12.2007) in what has become the largest beatification ceremony in the history of the Catholic Church.(500 Spanish martyrs to be beatifiedCatholic News 10 October 2007)  In a speech to 30,000 pilgrims in St Peters Square, Pope Benedict XVI paid tribute to the martyrs of the Civil War and put them on the path to sainthood. Their forgiveness towards their persecutors should enable us to work towards reconciliation and peaceful coexistence, he said.The Popes mass beatification of clergy allied with Francos side during the Civil War caused outrage on the Left in Spain. Some have criticized the beatifications as dishonoring non-clergy who were also killed in the war, and as being an attempt to draw attention away from the churchs support of Franco (some quarters of the Church called the Nationalist cause a crusade).(Vaticans Plan to Beatify Spanish Clergy Divisive by Socolovsky.  Morning Edition, National Public Radio, 13 July 2007.)  Critics have pointed out that only priests aligned with Francos troops were honoured. In this group of people,  the Vatican has not included all Spanish  martyrs, nor any of the 16 priests who were executed by the nationalist side in the first years of the war. This decision has caused numerous criticisms from surviving family members and several political organisations in Spain.(Familiares de los curas vascos fusilados por Franco claman contra el olvidohttp://www.elpais.com/articulo/sociedad/somos/nadie/elpepusoc/20071027elpepisoc_13/Tes On-line edition of Pas27/10/2007(in Spanish))  Priests killed in Catalonia or the Basque Country loyal to the republic are not being beatified, Alejandro Quiroga, Professor of Spanish History at the University of Newcastle,characterized the beatifications as ...a very selective, political reading of the whole thing.The act of beatification has also coincided in time with the debate on the of Historical Memory (about the treatment of the victims of the war and its aftermath) promoted by the Spanish Government.Responding to the criticism, the Vatican has described the October 2007 beatifications as relating to personal virtues and holiness, not ideology. They are not about resentment but... reconciliation.  The Vatican said it was not taking sides, but merely wished to honour those who had died for their religious beliefs.The Spanish government has supported the beatifications, sending Foreign Minister ngel Moratinos to attend the ceremony.(Reijers-Martin, Laura Vatican honours Spanish war dead BBC October 28, 2007)The October 2007 beatifications have brought the number of martyred persons beatified by the Church to 977, eleven of whom have already been canonized as Saints.( Because of the extent of the persecution, many more cases could be proposed; as many as 10,000 according to Catholic Church sources. The process for beatification has already been initiated for about 2,000 people.(ApologyFor the most part, the Catholic Church has always highlighted its role as a victim in the 1936-39 war. The most famous happening of the joint assembly of bishops and priests in September 1971 however, saw the passage by a majority, but not the requisite two-thirds majority for formal acceptance, of the statement that; We humbly recognise and ask pardon that we did not know how, when it was necessary, to be true ministers of reconciliation in the midst of our people torn by a fratricidal war.(Lannon, p.114 Privilege, Persecution and Prophecy Oxford, Clarendon  Press, 1987) In November 2007, Bishop Ricardo Blzquez, head of Spains Episcopal Conference, said that the Church must also seek forgiveness for concrete acts during the strife-torn period. On many occasions we have reasons to thank God for what was done and for the people who acted, but probably in other moments. . . we should ask for forgiveness and change direction,()ReferencesSee also* terrorism* Civil War* Terror (Spain)* Triangle
28729019
Kevin_Moreton
Kevin Moreton (born 19 January 1959) is an English actor, best known for his portrayal of Kevin Marsh in Street, the British prime-time soap opera set in the fictional town of Weatherfield, made by Television (now Studios).  He was a popular British child actor during the 1970s and appeared in many roles.Early lifeMoreton was born 1959 in Hemsworth, a small town on the edge of West Yorkshire, England.He was brought up and lived in a small village named Carleton, in Pontefract Yorkshire and attended his local school, at the time known as Pontefract Boys school, now known as Carleton Community High School. He was put forward and selected for his first TV role by his school Drama Teacher, Trevor Lunn, who had past contacts in the industry.  One of the adult actors and one of the child actors from  Flaxton Boys also came from the same school in Carleton.His first TV appearance was in ITV Granadas children TV series (TV series) that ran from 1973 to 1975. In the TV series he played a young boy called Sam Wilson who lived in a fictional Yorkshire mining village, Skellerton, in England, set in 1934.  Moreton played the young Sam for two series, from 1973 (aired June 12, 1973) to 1974 (aired 8 August 1974).  He was replaced in 1975 for the third and final series by McManus who later went on the star in Taggart, who played the much older Sam, after the storylines jumped from the 1930s to 1950s.The opening scene to Sam, which shows a young Sam (Kevin Moreton) running up the pit fields was filmed in Featherstone nr Pontefract, West Yorkshire.Moreton obtained permission from his school to work in the series, and during filming his education was continued by a private tutor.  He was paid 900 for playing Sam. He also started as William Dalby in the British film Shouldnt Happen to a Vet (film) in 1975, directed by Till.Coronation StreetHis most memorable acting role to many was as the character Kevin Marsh in Street. His character will be remembered for wrecking Ken Barlows house and subsequently burning down Mark Brittains Warehouse situated on Coronation Street in 1975.Event extracts for the plotline are:-In Episode 1532 (22 September 1975) Coronation StreetKevin Marsh, Chris Ashton and Bernie Marsh, who live in the Gossamer Street flats, run amok in the Street. Later Kevin, Chris and Bernie steal magazines from Kabin, but are caught by Barlow (Coronation Street).  As they were former pupils of Kens during his teaching days he felt some responsibility towards them and stops Fairclough, the shop owner from reporting the matter to the police.  Ken later catches the lads playing truant and takes the magazines from them. He tells them to go back to school. The lads smash a window at the Community Centre, just missing Tatlock. Ken tells Len hell pay for the windows so long as the police arent bought in, however Albert contacts the police. Kevin Marsh tells his father that Ken is trying to frame them and that he hit them when he came round. In Episode 1533 (24 September 1975) Coronation StreetKevin Marsh, Chris Ashton and Bernie Marsh tip rubbish over Kens back yard.  Ken gives Kevin Marsh a telling off and advises him to stop the vandalism and stealing before he ends up in Borstal. Kevin & Bernie then decide to let the tyres down on Kens taxi so he cant work.  Later Douglas Marsh, the boys father, threatens to have Ken charged with assault for hitting his boys.  Kevin & Bernie later set about wrecking Kens home, No.11 Coronation Street.  (Ken rented the house off Tanner, after she moved out to live in Newcastle with her then Husband Alan Howard).In Episode 1534 (29 September 1975) Coronation StreetKen is horrified at the state of his house and later shows Douglas Marsh the damage, who the offers Ken money (30) not to tell the police. The boys decide to runaway after Mr Marsh laid into them for causing damage to Kens home.  Later the boys hide in the Mark Brittain Warehouse storeroom but a discarded cigarette left by Kevin is left smouldering.In Episode 1535 (1 October 1975) Coronation StreetThe discarded cigerette subsequently starts a fire which gutted the warehouse and killed Gee who was celebrating her forty-fifth birthday. Ken played the hero by saving Tricia Hopkins who was trapped in a toilet. In 1976 the remains of the site was bought by the fictional character Mike Baldwin who later renovated it into the second factory of the Baldwins Casuals empire.Open All Hours - TV SeriesHe always played a main character apart from his cameo appearance on All Hours in a (1976) episode titled Beware of the Dog as a cocky young boy showing whose boss to Arkwright the tight fisted shop owner.Striker - TV Series 1975Moreton starred in the BBC Childrens TV series Striker.  The show ran for three series on the BBC from 1975 to 1976 and was written by actor Cope, famous as the ghost in and Hopkirk (Deceased). Moreton played the title role in Striker which was about a young boy named Ben Dyker (Moreton), the star forward of the Brenton youth team. His popularity was ensured by both goal-scoring prowess and an ability to make chip-butties.  Other notable cast members included, Gladwin, as Harry, Sam Williams, as Nicky White (actor), as Mr Robson. He lived in a caravan with his limping dad (played by future Coronation Street actor Hinsliff - aka Don Brennan) who insisted his son wasnt to play football. But, for Ben, nothing could beat pulling on Brentons blue strip - complete with a red and white sash - and guiding his team to the local cup final.But days before Ben could grab cup glory, his dad discovered his antics and banned him from playing. The reason? Dad Dyker had once been an ace footballer nicknamed Striker Dyker whose career was cruelly cut short by a horrific injury - hence the limp - and he didnt want his kid Ben to follow in his footsteps. After much cajoling, of course Ben is allowed to play in the final where, amazingly hero Ben banged a last-minute winner.  Bens best mate in the series was Soggy Sollis (played by Simon Manley).The first 3 part series was aired on 31 December 1975 by BBC1 (Wednesday) at 17.10 to 17.35.The characters, cast and appearances for the series Striker were.Nobodys House - TV Series 1976Moreton played an orphan child Ghost called Nobody in this made for children Tyne Tees Television series that aired for seven, 25 minute episodes in 1976.The plot revolved around a 1970s contemporary family, the Sinclairs, that move into an old Victorian house Cornerstones, that was built in 1885.  This house was built on the site of what was previously an old Victorian workhouse Burnsey Workhouse in which a young orphan boy had died of the plague many years before while working in the workhouse.  The boy had not crossed over, and remained as a ghost in the house and over the years he continued to haunt the old Victorian house.The house had been empty for years until the Sinclairs view the property.  Having been made aware of a ghost occupying the property by the estate agent, Mr Jacobs, they decide to buy the property after their offer to buy it at half the asking price was accepted. Strange things begin to happen when the family move into the house.  The two Sinclair children first meet the ghost in Gillys upstairs bedroom, after the ghost manifests himself to them and warns them that there is a fire in the cellar.  Later the children meet the ghost and they ask him his name. The child ghost could not remember his name, so the children who now decide to befriend him (Moreton) call him Nobody, thus, Nobodys house.No one except the two children could see the ghost Nobody.  The ghost wore grey Victorian workhouse or street urchin clothes and when he wanted to ghost in or out of sight he would tug on his neck-scarf. The characters, cast and appearances for the series Nobodys HouseOther RolesIn late 1975? Moreton played the lead role in a play at the Royal Court theatre called Runaway with a strong cast including Bill Owen (famous for playing Compo in of the summer wine and Dean who starred in Brookside, No, Its Selwyn Froggitt! and (film) amongst his many credits.In 1977 Moreton played the character of Raymond in the Granada Television childrens TV series Ghosts of Motley Hall, the episode was called Ghost of a chance (series 2, episode 5).Later that year he went on to star in the lead role in a play at a small theatre in Shepherds Bush by Paul Copley.Also in 1977 he starred in an 3 part episode of Court (TV series) called Street Gang, playing a character called Ian Parker and subsequently as a character called Gerald in Centre Play (TV Series), entitled Auntie Kathleens old clothes).VoiceoverIn 1979/80 Moreton did a TV advert voice over for Tea manufacturer and distributor Tetley. His character was known as The Apprentice, one of many animated characters that were used to advertise Tetley Tea from 1973 to 2001. Collectively these characters were known as the Tea Folk, a series of adverts that combined animation inter-linked with live action. The characters voices have been supplied by some distinguished actors throughout the campaign, including Gaffers Glover, and Sydney Layton.Personal lifeMoreton is married to Lesley, whom he met in 1987, they have two children (2 boys) and lives in West Yorkshire.He continues to receive small royalties for his acting roles in the 1970s References     External links* 
28736745
Rosenergomash
Rosenergomash one of the leading Russian electro-mechanical concerns( http://www.kommersant.ru/doc.aspx?DocsID1306068 Kommersant daily), consists of several plants in Ukraine and Russia. headquarters are in Moscow. President -- Vladimir PalikhataOverview* Large-Size Electric Machine Plant CJSC (ZKEM CJSC(ZKEM)) the history of which includes over 40 years on the market of electric engineering products, was founded on the basis of a structural department of Yuzhelektromash OJSC. The plant is one of the leading Ukrainian enterprises in electrical engineering. Since 2000 and up to date over 20 new types of electric motors have been produced, which includes over 100 modifications.Novaya Kakhovka, Oblast, Ukraine* LLC Novokakhovsky Electromechanic Plant (formerly known as South Electric Machine Engineering Plant and afterwards  as OJSC Yuzhelektromash(Novokahovskiy)) was founded in 1955 in the newly built city Novaya Kakhovka and is one of the major manufacturers of asynchronous motors in the CIS countries.Novaya Kakhovka, Oblast, Ukraine* Elektromachina OJSC(Elektromashina) is one of the oldest Ukrainian mechanical engineering companies. For over 50 years the main products of the company have been direct current electric machines of 0.37 to 315 kW of any design and climatic modification, equipment for electric mine locomotives, traction locomotives, trolley and battery-driven locomotives, mine equipment, constant-voltage adjustable converters, complicated household appliances. The plant has an up-to-date experimental and research base and test production facilities. New product specimens are developed using automated design systems. The ISO 9001 complex system of product quality control is being successfully implemented. Today Elektromashina OJSC is a Ukrainian modern enterprise, the only one in this industry in terms of types and purpose of manufactured products.Kharkiv, Ukraine* ETAL Science and Production Association(ETAL) was established in Alexandria city (Kirovograd region). Currently ETAL is one of the largest manufacturers of electrical products in CIS countries. At the beginning it produced different electrical products, control panels, magnetic amplifiers. Production shops occupied 34 hectares.Alexandria, Oblast, Ukraine* Kolomna heavy machine tool construction factory (KZHM (Kolomna)) -- by 1990s has become one of the biggest companies in the heavy machine construction industry of the USSR. Over the years the plant has produced dozens of modifications vertical- turning, special, rotary-grinding, hardening and woodworking machines and forging presses and other equipment. Products with brand ZTC are well known in 48 countries.Kolomna, RussiaProductionLarge-size electric machines*Asynchronous electric motors *Synchronous electric motorsAsynchronous electric motors conventional sizes 56-355*Three-phase asynchronous electric motors with squirrel-cage rotor *Explosion-proof electric motors *Electric Motors of special Purpose *GeneratorsDirect-current electric machines*Direct-current electric machines of general industrial and special use *Marine design electric machines *Electric machines for railroad transport *Crane-metallurgy electric motors *Mining direct current traction electric motors Industrial electric equipment *Mining electric equipment *Normal resistorsSocial activity and charityRosenergomash often sponsors various sporting activities, in particular, as a sponsor of the Olympic Committee, participates in programs to support young gymnasts and childrens ice-hockey.Links(ru:
28751781
Patent_visualisation
Patent visualisation is an application of visualisation. Patents number has been increasing (http://www.wipo.int/export/sites/www/ipstats/en/statistics/patents/pdf/941e_2010.pdf), thus forcing companies to consider intellectual property as a part of their strategy.(Kevin G. Rivette, David Kline Discovering new value in intellectual property Harvard Business Review ( JanuaryFebruary 2000)). So patent visualisation like patent mapping is used to quickly view patents portfolio.Patent visualisation dedicated software began to appear in 2000 like Aureka from Aurigin now owned by Reuters.(http://thomsonreuters.com/products_services/legal/legal_products/intellectual_property/Aureka) Taking advantage of the innate visual language, software have been developed to convert patents in clear infographics or maps, to allow the analyst to get insight into the data and draw conclusions.(Daniel A Keim et IEEE Computer Society, Information visualization and visual data mining, IEEE TRANSACTIONS ON VISUALIZATION AND COMPUTER GRAPHICS 8 (2002): 1--8.) Also referred as patinformatics,(Anthony J. Trippe, Patinformatics: Tasks to tools, World Patent Information 25, n. 3 (September 2003): 211-221.) it is the science of analysing patent information to discover relationsips and trends that would be difficult to see when working with patent documents on a one-and-one basis.Patents contain two types of information: Structured data like publication number which are processed by data-mining and unstructured text like title, abstract and claims which are used with mining.(Laura Ruotsalainen, Data mining tools for technology and competitive intelligence VTT Research Notes 2451(October 2008))DataminingThe main step in processing structured information lies on data-mining. mining(http://www.data-mining-software.com/data_mining_history.htm) has emerged in the late 1980s. Used in computer science and genetic algorithms, data mining is the union of statistics, artificial intelligence and machine learning to assist in the analysis of patents.(http://www.exforsys.com/tutorials/data-mining/how-data-mining-is-evolving.html) Patent data mining extracts information from the structured data of the patent document.(Sungjoo Lee, Byungun Yoon, et Yongtae Park, An approach to discovering new technology opportunities: Keyword-based patent map approach, Technovation 29, n. 6 (Juin): 481-497.) These structured data are bibliographic fields like location or date or status :Structured fieldsAdvantagesData mining offers a statistical analysis tool to study filing patterns of competitors, locate the main patent flers within a specific area of technology. This type of approach can be very helpful to monitor competitors environment, moves and innovation trends and gives a macro-view of a technology status in order to evaluates its maturity and complexity.Text-Mining Principle Text-mining is used to search through unstructured full-text patents.(http://comminfo.rutgers.edu/~msharp/text_mining.htm) This technique is very well known due to the Internet development, its success in bioinformatics and now in the intellectual property environment.(Sholom Weiss and al, Text Mining : Predictive Methods for Analyzing Unstructured Information, 1er ed. (Springer 2004).)Text mining is based on a statistical approach of words recurrence or occurrence in the patents corpus.(Antoine Blanchard La cartographie des brevets La Recherche  n.398 (2006) : 82-83) An algorithm decomposes the corpus into a text sea, extracts words and expressions from title, summary and claims and gather them by declension. The conjunctions such as and or if are labeled as non-information bearing words and are stored in the stopword list. These stoplists can be personalized, in order to create an accurate analysis. Next, the algorithm will rank the words by weight, according to their frequency in the patents corpus and the documents frequency containing this word. It literally fishes the whole Text Sea for words or expressions and counts their occurrence. The score for each word is calculated using this formula (Gerard Salton et Christopher Buckley, Term-weighting approaches in automatic text retrieval, Information Processing & Management 24, n. 5 (1988): 513-523.)(Y Kim, J Suh, et S Park, Visualization of patent analysis for emerging technology, Expert Systems with Applications 34, no. 3 (4, 2008): 1804-1812.) :Weight\frac{Term\ Frequency}{Document\ Frequency}\frac{Frequency\ of\ the word\ or\ expression\ in\ the\ Text\ Sea}{Number\ of\ documents\ containing\ the\ expression\ or\ word}According to this, a frequently used word in several documents will have less weight or score than a frequently used word in a few patents. Words under a minimum weight are eliminated, only to have left a list of n pertinent words or descriptors. Then each patent is associated to the descriptors found in the selected document. Further, in the process of clusterization, these descriptors are used as subsets, in which the patent are regrouped or they can be used as tags to place the patents in predetermined categories for example keywords from International Patent Classifications.There are four different full-text parts that can be processed with text-mining :*Title*Abstract*Claim*Patent Full-TextSoftware offer different combinations but using title, abstract and claim is generally the most used, having a good balance between interferences and relevancy.AdvantagesText-mining approache has numerous advantages. First, it is useful to narrow down a search or quickly evaluate a patent corpus. For instance, if a query has taken irrelevant documents, a multi level clustering hierarchy will identify them in order to delete them and refine the search. Moreover, this approach offers the possibility to create internal taxonomies specific to a corpus, thus preparing possible mapping.VisualisationsThis art of allying patent analysis and informatic tools offers an overview of the environment through value-added visualisations. As patent contain two types of information, structured and unstructured one, visualisations can be distinguished in two categories. Structured data can be rendered with data mining in macrothematic maps and statistical analysis. Whereas unstructured information extracted by text-mining are represented in a more intuitive way like clouds, cluster maps, 2D keyword map.Data mining visualisationText mining visualisationVisualisation for both data-mining and text-miningMapping visualisations can be used for both text-mining and data-mining results.UsesWhat can patent visualisation highlights(Miyake, M., Mune, Y. and Himeno, K. Strategic Intellectual Property Portfolio Management: Technology Appraisal by Using the Technology Heat Map, Nomura Research Institute (NRI) Papers, n. 83, (December 2004).)(Charles Boulakia Patent mapping, http://sciencecareers.sciencemag.org/career_development/previous_issues/articles/1190/patent_mapping):* Competitors* Partners* New innovations* Technologic environment description(Richard Seymour, Platinum Group Metals Patent Analysis and Mapping, Platinum Metals Review 52, n. 4 (10, 2008): 231-240.)* NetworksField application(Susan E Cullen, Introduction, From acorns to oak trees : how patent audits help innovations reach their full potential  IP Value 2010 - An International Guide for the Boardroom : 26--30)(Charles Boulakia Patent mapping, http://sciencecareers.sciencemag.org/career_development/previous_issues/articles/1190/patent_mapping):* R&D strategy management* intelligence* Licensing* StrategySee also*Wiki Patent Information User Group : Review of Patent Analysis Tools Referencesth:
28761038
Adolph_von_Hansemann
Adolph von Hansemann (27 July 1826  9 December 1903) was an Imperial German businessman and banker. Life Born in Aachen in 1826 to German banker and railroad entrepreneur Hansemann, Adolph Hansemann developed an early interest in business administration. He left home for Hamburg in 1841. He was a partner in his brother Gustavs textile factory in Eupen, Belgium, until leaving to help manage his fathers Society (Disconto-Gesellschaft) in 1857.After his fathers death in 1864, Adolph Hansemann continued to develop it by himself, expanding it into the largest private bank in the Empire and one of the most famous in Europe. Along with von Bleichroeder, he arranged the financing for the Prussian Army during the 1870 War; for his services, he was elevated to the peerage by Wilhelm I and appended the von to his name.As a board member at Krupp and chairman of the Mining Company (Gelsenkirchener Bergwerks-AG), he participated in the growth of coal and steel industries in the Ruhr valley. Like his father, he was also involved with the German railroads, including the Lehrte line, as well as lines in Venezuela and Romania. Taking advantage of Bethel Strousbergs exposure there, Hansemanns greatest coup was working with Bleichroeder to purchase Strousbergs railways throughout Germany at a fraction of their real value.(Roth, Ralf & al. The city and the railway in Europe. Ashgate Publishing, 2003. Accessed 9 Sept 2010.)He was an advocate of Germanys imperial expansion. He funded Cesar VI. Godeffroys Trade Society (Seehandels-Gesellschaft) plantations and with Solf worked towards the establishment of Samoa. His New Guinea Consortium (Neuguinea-Konsortium, later Neuguinea-Kompanie) and Company (Astrolabe-Compagnie) led to the establishment of Kaiser-Wilhelmsland and New Guinea in the South Pacific. His Disconto Society funded the Central Line in East Africa and the Railroad in the German concession of Kiaochau, China. Construction of his Otavi Railroad in South-West Africa coincided with the Herero genocide there.By this time Adolph von Hansemann was one of the richest men in the German Empire. Between 1887 and 1896, he modernized the Rgen resort of Sassnitz, the site of his castle Dwasieden, at his own expense. He also maintained a villa in Berlin and another at Lissa and purchased extensive tracts of land for his heirs.thumb|Von Hansemann family mausoleumHe married von Kusserow, daughter of the Prussian Lt. Gen. von Kusserow, early advocate of womens rights, and sister of von Kusserow, who became the first head of colonial affairs for the German Foreign Office. Adolphs children were Ferdinand and Davide Eveline von Hansemann. In October 1903, he died at work at his desk; according to his secretary, his last words were, Well, tomorrow we work on. Sources * Dbritz, Walther: David Hansemann und Adolph von Hansemann. Scherpe, Krefeld 1954. German.* Kleeberg, John M. The Disconto-Gesellschaft and German Industrialization: a critical examiniation of the career of a German Universal Bank, 18511914. 1988. Accessed 9 Sept 2010.* Lindemann, Ralf: Das weie Schloss am Meer  Dwasieden in Sassnitz auf der Insel Rgen. Reprint Verlag Rgen, 2. Auflage, Bergen 2007. German.* Mckillop, Bob & al. End of the Line: a History of Railways in Papua New Guinea. University of Papua New Guinea Press, 1997. Accessed 9 Sept 2010.* Overlach, Theodore Wm. Foreign Financial Control in China. Ayer Publishing, 1976. Accessed 9 Sept 2010.( External links * Biography by the Historical Association of Bank (in German)* Schloss Dwasieden in in the book The White Castle by the Sea (in German)von Hansemann
28785704
Jordan_River_Diversion_Tunnel
The Jordan River Diversion Tunnel - a relic of the gold rush -  is on the Jordan River near the locality of Jericho, about 7 km south of Woods Point in Gippsland, Victoria, Australia.  The tunnel is about 30 m long x 4 m high x 3 m wide, cut through rock.  The river still runs through it. ((No record has been found of the tunnels construction and use. It has been alternatively attributed to either river-bed sluicers during the earliest mining period at Jericho (1861-5) or to an attempt in 1872 to hasten floodwaters away from the township.The site is listed in the Heritage Inventory.(References(()()
28804111
Jordan_Creek_(Owyhee_River)
 accessdate  September 8, 2010)| mouth_name                   Owyhee River| mouth_location               near Rome| mouth_district  Malheur County| mouth_region  | mouth_state  Oregon| mouth_country  | mouth_note  | mouth_lat_d                  42| mouth_lat_m                  51| mouth_lat_s                  45| mouth_lat_NS                 N| mouth_long_d                 117| mouth_long_m                 38| mouth_long_s                 29| mouth_long_EW                W| mouth_coordinates_note       (| mouth_elevation_imperial     3363| mouth_elevation_note         (| length_imperial              99| length_round                 0| length_note                  ()| watershed_imperial           1305| watershed_round              0| watershed_note               (NRCS, p. 2)| discharge_location           near Oregon&ndash;Idaho border| discharge_round              0| discharge_imperial           183| discharge_note               (| discharge_min_imperial       1.2| discharge_max_imperial       7530| discharge1_location          | discharge1_imperial          | discharge1_note               | map                          | map_size                     | map_caption                  |map_alt   | map1  Oregon Locator Map.PNG| map1_size                    300| map1_caption  Location of the mouth of Jordan Creek in Oregon| map1_alt  | map1_locator  Oregon| commons  }}Jordan Creek is a  tributary of the River in the northwestern United States.( It flows generally west from near City, Idaho, in the Mountains to near Rome in the High Desert.()() Major tributaries are Big Boulder, Soda, Louse, Spring, Rock, Meadow, Combination, and Louisa creeks in Idaho and Cow Creek in Oregon.(NRCS, p. 10) The creek is named for Michael M. Jordan, who led a party that discovered gold along the creek in 1863.(McArthur, pp. 518&ndash;19)WatershedJordan Creeks watershed of  is almost evenly divided between the two states, 46 percent in Idaho and 54 percent in Oregon.( Although the upper parts of the basin in the Silver City Mountain Range supported mining camps and towns in the late 19th century through the early 20th century, they were generally abandoned when the gold and silver played out.(Idaho DEQ, pp. 31&ndash;32) Much of the population in the 21st century lives on small homesteads, ranches, and farms scattered throughout the watershed.( Valley, Oregon, is the basins only population center that has permanent, year-round residents, while Silver City has mostly part-time or weekend residents.(Idaho DEQ, p. xviii) Land use in the watershed is divided among irrigated agriculture, range land, forests, mining, and zones.( The primary uses are cow-calf grazing in the uplands and hay production in the irrigated lowlands.(  Average precipitation varies from about  a year in the mountains of Idaho to about  in the plateaus of eastern Oregon.(Idaho DEQ, p. 1) To control water flow for irrigation, most of the watersheds hydrology has been modified to some degree by large reservoirs in Oregon and in-stream diversions in Idaho.(DischargeBased on 28 years of record-keeping from 1946 to 1971 and from 2003 to 2004, the average discharge of Jordan Creek, measured about  upstream of the Oregon&ndash;Idaho border, is .( The lowest recorded discharge was  in September 1962, and the highest was  on December 31, 1965.( This flow came from slightly less than 46 percent of the total watershed.(See also*of rivers of Oregon*of longest streams of Oregon*of rivers of IdahoReferencesWorks cited*Idaho Department of Environmental Quality (DEQ). (2009). Jordan Creek Subbasin Assessment and Total Maximum Daily Load (PDF). Retrieved September 12, 2010.*McArthur, Lewis A., and McArthur, Lewis L. (2003) 1928. Oregon Geographic Names, 7th ed. Portland: Oregon Historical Society Press. ISBN 0-87595-277-1.*National Resources Conservation Service (NRCS) (2010). Jordan &ndash; 17050108, 8 Digit Hydrologic Unit Profile (PDF). Retrieved September 10, 2010.
28830252
Siege_of_the_International_Legations
 campaignbox The Siege of the International Legations occurred during the Rebellion in the Chinese city of Beijing. Nine hundred military personnel and civilians, largely from Europe, Japan, and the United States, and about 2,800 Chinese Christians took refuge in the Legation Quarter and survived a siege by certain parts of the Chinese Imperial Army. The siege was called by the New York Sun the most exciting episode ever known to civilization.(Thompson, Larry Clinton. William Scott Ament and the Boxer Rebellion: Heroism, Hubris, and the Ideal Missionary. Jefferson, NC: McFarland, 2009, pp. 1, 835)Legation QuarterThe Legation Quarter was approximately  long and  wide. It was located in the area of the city designated by the Qing government for foreign legations. In 1900, there were 11 legations located in the quarter as well as a number of foreign businesses and banks. Ethnic Chinese-occupied houses and businesses were also scattered about the quarter. The 12 or so Christian missionary organizations in Beijing were not located in the Legation Quarter, but rather dispersed around the city. In total, there were about 500 citizens of Western countries and Japan residing in the city. The northern end of the Legation quarter was the location of the Imperial City where the Dowager Cixi resided. At the southern end was the massive Tartar Wall which ringed the city.(Thompson, 2939.) The eastern and western ends were major streets.Rising tensionsIn 1900, the great powers had been chipping away at Chinese sovereignty for 60 years. They had forced China to allow the import of opium which caused widespread addiction, defeated China in several wars, asserted a right to promote Christianity, and imposed unequal treaties under which foreigners and foreign companies in China were accorded special privileges and immunities from Chinese law. Thus, by 1900, the Qing or Manchu dynasty that had ruled China for more than two centuries was crumbling, and Chinese culture was under religious and secular assault by a powerful alien culture.(Thompson, pp. 78.)Boxer movementAuthorities differ as to the origin of the Boxers but they became prominent in Shangdong in 1898 and spread northward toward Beijing. They were an indigenous peasant movement, related to the secret societies that had flourished in China for centuries  and which, on occasion, had threatened Chinese central governments. The Boxers were named  probably by American missionary, H. Smith  for their acrobatic rituals which included martial arts, twirling swords, prayers, and incantations.(OConnor, Richard. The Spirit Soldiers: A Historical Narrative of the Boxer Rebellion. New York: Putnams, 1973, p. 20.) Similar to other anti-Western millenarian movements around the world, such as the Dance in the US, the Boxers believed that with the proper ritual they would become invulnerable to Western bullets. The religious and magical practices of the Boxers had as a paramount goal the affording of protection and emotional security in the face of a future... that was fraught with danger and risk.(.) The Boxers had no central organization but appear to have been organized on the village level. They were anti-foreign and anti-missionary. Their slogan was Support the Qing! Destroy the Foreigner!.(Cohen, Paul A. History in Three Keys: The Boxers as Event, Experience, and Myth. New York: Columbia U Press, 1997.)  Initially feared as a possible threat by the Chinese government, they slowly gained the support of influential politicians in Beijing, who saw the Boxers as a movement that could be used to eliminate foreign influence in China.Boxers attack legationsIn Spring 1900, the Boxers movement spread rapidly north from Shandong into the countryside near Beijing. Boxers burned Christian churches, killed Chinese Christians, and intimidated Chinese officials who stood in their way. Two missionaries, the Protestant Scott Ament and Catholic Bishop Favier reported to the diplomatic Ministers (Ambassadors) about the growing threat.(Porter, Henry D. William Scott Ament: Missionary of the American Board to China. New York: Fleming H. Revell, 1911, pp. 1759.)(Foreign Relations of the United States, 1900, p. 130) American Minister H. Conger cabled Washington, the whole country is swarming with hungry, discontented, hopeless idlers. Requesting a warship to be stationed offshore from Tianjin, the nearest port to Beijing, he reported, Situation becoming serious.(Foreign Relations of the United States, 1900, Washington: GPO, pp. 122, 130.)  On May 30, 1900, the diplomats, led by British Minister Maxwell MacDonald, requested that foreign soldiers come to Beijing to defend the legations and the citizens of their countries. The Chinese government reluctantly acquiesced, and the next day more than 400 soldiers from eight countries disembarked from warships and traveled by train to Beijing from Tianjin. They set up defensive perimeters around their respective missions.(Morrison, Dr. George E. The Siege of the Peking Legations The Living Age, Nov 17, 24 and Dec 1, 8, and 15, 1900, p.475.)(Thompson, 42.)On June 5, the railroad line to Tianjin was cut by Boxers in the countryside and Beijing was isolated. On June 13, a Japanese diplomat was murdered by the soldiers of General Fuxiang and that same day the first Boxer, dressed in his finery, was seen in the Legation Quarter. The German Minister, von Ketteler, and German soldiers captured a Boxer boy and inexplicably executed him.(Weale, B. L. (Lenox Simpson), Indiscreet Letters from Peking. New York: Dodd, Mead, 1907, pp. 501.) In response, that afternoon, thousands of Boxers burst into the walled city of Beijing and burned many of the Christian churches and cathedrals in the city. American and British missionaries had taken refuge in the Methodist Mission and an attack there was repulsed by American marines. The soldiers at the British Embassy and German Legations shot and killed several Boxers.(Morrison, p. 270)The Muslim Kansu braves and Boxers, along with other Chinese then attacked and killed Chinese Christians around the legations. Accusing the Chinese Christians of collaborating with the foreigners, the Muslims and Boxers roasted some of them alive.() Sometimes, the Kansu braves used swords to kill Christians, setting their homes on fire, calling them spies and agents for the foreigners in the legations.()Assassination of Sugiyama AkiraSugiyama Akira, the Japanese chancellor at the legations, left to go to the railway to meet the Allied forces of the Expedition. The Kansu Muslim troops seized him from his cart, hacked him into multiple pieces, decapitating him, leaving his mutilated body and severed genitals and head.()() They also carved his heart out and sent it to Dong Fuxiang.()Dilemma of the Chinese GovernmentIn mid-June 1900 the Chinese government was still indecisive about the Boxers. Some officials, Ronglu, for example, counseled the Empress Dowager that the Boxer were rabble who would be easily defeated by foreign soldiers.(Der Ling, Princess. Two Years in the Forbidden City. New York: Moffat, Yard, 1911, p.. 161) On the other side of the question were anti-foreign officials who advised cooperation with the Boxers. The Court appears to be in a dilemma, said Robert Hart. If the Boxers are not suppressed, the Legations threaten to take action  if the attempt to suppress them is made, this intensely patriotic organization will be converted into an anti-dynastic movement.(Seagrave, Sterling. Dragon Lady: the Life and Legend of the Last Empress of China. New York: Vantage, 1992, p. 318) The event that irrevocably pushed the Chinese Government to the side of the Boxers was the attack by foreign warships on the Dagu forts on June 17. The attack was made to try to maintain communications with Tianjin and aid an army under the command of Admiral Seymour in its attempt to march to Beijing and reinforce the Legations.(Fleming, Peter. The Siege at Peking. New York: Harper, 1959, pp. 8083)The allied attack on Dagu was the last straw for the Chinese government. On June 19, the Empress Dowager sent a diplomatic note to each of the Legations in Beijing informing them of the attack on Dagu and ordering all foreigners to depart Beijing for Tianjin within 24 hours. Otherwise, said the note, China will find it a difficult matter to give complete protection.(Davids, Jules, ed. American Diplomatic and State Papers: The United States and China: Boxer Uprising. Series 3, Vol. 5, Wilmington, DE: Scholarly Resources, 1981, p. 83) Upon receipt of the note, the diplomats convened and agreed that to leave the Legation Quarter and travel to the coast in an unfriendly countryside would be suicidal. The next morning, June 20, Baron von Ketteler, the German Minister, proposed to take up the matter with the Yamen, the Chinese Foreign Ministry, but he was murdered by a Manchu officer, Captain En Hai of the Hushenying en route to the meeting.() With this, the Ministers informed all their citizens in Beijing to take refuge in the Legation Quarter.(Smith, Arthur H. China in Convulsion. 2 Vols. New York: Fleming H. Revell, 1901, pp. 243255) Thus, began the 55-day siege.(http://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Imperial_Decree_on_Day_Nineteen_of_May%28lunar_calendar%29#Decree_3Imperial Imperial Decree on Day Nineteen of May(lunar calander) (1901))The besiegedThe British, American, French, German, Japanese, and Russian military guards each took responsibility for the defense of their respective legations. The Austrians and Italians abandoned their isolated Legations. The Austrians joined the French and the Italians collaborated with the Japanese. The Japanese and Italian force established defense lines in the Fu  a large palace and park where most of the estimated 2,800 Chinese Christians taking refuge were housed. The American and German marines held positions on the Tartar Wall behind their legations. The 409 guards had the job of defending a line that snaked through  of urban terrain.(Ingram, James H., M.D. The Defense of the Legations in Peking. The Independent. Dec 3 and 10, 1900, p. 3030) The great majority of the civilians took refuge in the British Embassy, the largest and most defensible of the diplomatic legations. A census of civilians counted 473 people: 245 men, 149 women, and 79 children. About 150 of the men volunteered to participate, to a greater or lesser extent, in the defense. The civilians included at least 19 nationalities of which British and Americans were the most numerous. Large numbers of Chinese Christians were conscripted for labor, especially for building barricades.(Thompson, 8385, 8889)The British Minister MacDonald was selected as the commander of the defense and G. Squiers, an American diplomat, became his chief of staff. The guards of the different countries, however, operated semi-independently and MacDonald could only suggest, not order, coordinated action.(Fleming, p. 118) The guards were not well armed. Only the American marines had sufficient ammunition. The defenders had three machine guns. The Italians had a small cannon. Fortunately, an old cannon barrel and ammunition was found in the Legation Quarter and from it a serviceable artillery piece was constructed that the Americans called Betsy and others called the International.(Allen, Rev. Roland The Siege of the Peking Legations. London: Smith, Elder, 1901, 187)The foreigners ransacked the Legation Quarter for food and other supplies. Food and water were adequate, although the foreigners without private food stocks subsisted on a steady diet of horsemeat and musty rice. However, the Chinese Christians, especially the Catholics, had a much harder time of it and by the end of the siege were starving. The Protestant missionaries took care of their converts, but the Chinese Catholics sadly were mostly neglected.(Allen, 256; Fenn, Rev. Courtnay Hughes, The American Marines in the Siege of Peking. The Independent. Dec 6, 2000. pp. 29192920) Medical supplies were scarce but a sizeable number of doctors and nurses, mostly missionaries, were present.(Ransome, Jessie. The Story of the Siege Hospital. London: SPCK, 1901.)American missionaries took over management of most necessities for life in the Legation Quarter, including food, water, sanitation, and health. MacDonalds most important appointment was Methodist Missionary Frank Gamewell as chief of the Fortifications Committee. Gamewell and his crew of fighting parsons were universally acclaimed for their defensive works surrounding the British Legation.(Weale, 142143; Smith, 743747)Chinese attacks and resolveFor several days after June 20, the official beginning of the siege, neither the foreigners inside the Legation Quarter nor the Chinese soldiers had any coherent plan for defense or attack. The number of Chinese soldiers ringing the legations is uncertain, but certainly numbered in the thousands. On the west were the Gansu Muslim soldiers of Dong Fuxiang and on the east were units of the Peking Field Army. The overall commander of the Chinese forces was Ronglu  who was anti-Boxer and disapproved of the siege.(Fleming, pp. 127, 2268.)  Chinese policy equivocated between belligerence and conciliation during the 55 day siege. Several attempts by Ronglu to effect a ceasefire failed because of suspicions and misunderstandings on both sides.(Fleming, pp. 2289)The foreigners were united in declaring the miraculous nature of their survival. I seek in vain some military reason for the failure of the Chinese to exterminate the foreigners, said an American military officer.(Annual Reports of the War Department, 1901, p. 456.) However, the equivocation on the part of the Chinese to use their military assets decisively against the Legation Quarter does not deny the fact that soldiers on both sides fought and died in large numbers.The Chinese first attempted to extinguish the foreigners in the Legation Quarter by fire. For several days at the beginning of the siege they set fires in the buildings around the British Legation. On June 23, most of the buildings of the Academy, the national library of China, and its books, many irreplaceable, burned. Both sides blamed the other for its destruction.(.) The Chinese Army then turned its attention to the Fu, the refuge for most of the Chinese Christians, and the domain of Lt. Col. Goro Shiba, the most admired military officer in the siege. Shiba, with his small group of Japanese soldiers, mounted a skillful defense against the Chinese who advanced one brick at a time, gradually surrounding him in a vise like grip. British soldiers were often detailed to reinforce the Japanese during attacks and all admired of his work.(Weale, 126) The most desperate fighting took place near the French Legation, where 78 French and Austrians and 17 volunteers were under assault in convoluted urban terrain, in which the front lines were only  from each other. The French also feared that Chinese sappers were digging tunnels for mines beneath their positions.(Weale, 130) The French, along with the Japanese, would suffer the highest rate of casualties in the siege.(Myers, Capt. John T. Military Operations and Defenses of the Siege of Peking. Proceedings of the U.S. Naval Institute September, 1902, p. 552)The Germans and the Americans occupied perhaps the most crucial of all defensive positions: the Tartar Wall. Holding the top of the  tall and  wide Wall was vital. If it fell to the Chinese, they would have an unobstructed field of fire on the Legation Quarter. The German barricades faced east on top of the wall and  west were the west facing American positions. The Chinese advanced toward both positions by building barricades ever closer. It was a claustrophobic existence for the soldiers on the wall.  The men all feel they are in a trap, said the American commander, Capt. John T. Myers, and simply await the hour of execution.(Myers, pp. 54250.) Added to the daily advances of the Chinese were the nightly serenades of rifle and artillery fire and firecrackers designed to keep the foreigners awake and alert.  From June 20 to July 17 we had nightly attacks, said a missionary woman. American Minister Conger said that some of them, for furious firing, exceeded anything he experienced in the Civil War.(Mateer, Ada Haven.  Siege Days: Personal Experiences of American Women and Children during the Peking Siege. Chicago: Fleming H. Revell, 1903, p. 216) The hard-pressed Legation guards saw their numbers diminish daily with casualties.Intense Chinese sniper fire roared around the French legation and Su Wang Fu. The Chinese Imperial Army and the Boxers kept up the sniper barrage. The foreigners were steadily and rapidly losing men killed by Chinese snipers. Chinese artillery wrecked the Allied Defences and crushed the French settlements into dust. The foreign casualty rate was beyond 200 men.()()() A Frenchman, Englishman, two Americans, and George Peters were killed by Chinese snipers in the settlements area.()Accurate Chinese snipers and artillery constantly pounded the legations, forcing defenders to abandon multiple positions. The Chinese forces occupied Su Wang Fu and the French Legation, being nearly successful in defeating American and Russians in the city wall. However, the Dowager Empress Cixi declared a truce on June 25, because she had an altercation with the anti foreign Duan, who wanted all the foreigners exterminated. But when news came of the Chinese victory over Seymours forces in the Expedition, fighting resumed. It was Chinese collaboraters in the legations who led the foreigners to a cannon after digging, which they managed to deploy to defend themselves. On July 13, the French legation was demolish by Chinese mining explosives. However, the pro foreign factions and anti foreign factions were squabbling against each other at the Chinese court. The pro foreigner Qing Princes even offered the foreigners safety in the Zongli Yamen. They declared a ceasefire during July 14  August 4, and Dowager Empress Cixi even sent food and supplies to the foreigners.()Qing declined to join the boxers and the rest of the imperial army to attack the legations, and even ordered his own Manchu Bannermen to attack the Boxers and the Muslim Kansu braves, who besieged the foreigners.() It was reported that Prince Qings pro foreign bannermen fought against Prince Duans anti foreign troops.()Overtures by ChineseThe Dowager Empress did not order the Chinese Imperial troops to conduct a siege; on the contrary, she ordered them to protect the foreigners in the legations. It was Prince Duan who led the Boxers in, for them to loot his enemies within the Imperial court and the foreigners. When the Boxers originally were let into the city and went on a looting rampage, against both the foreign and the Chinese Imperial forces, the Imperial authority kicked them out: old Boxers were sent outside Beijing to halt the invading foreign armies, while young Boxers were absorbed into the Muslim Kansu army.()The Chinese Army used firecrackers multiple times at the legations to make it seem as though they were pressing a siege, while they were not. The commander of all the Forces, Ronglu, tried to negotiate for a ceasefire, but the foreigners opened fire on Dong Fuxiangs army. The foreigners in the legations opened fire on Chinese officials, forces, and other people without provocation, killing numerous people; the Muslim army was forced to defend itself by returning fire. When the Chinese forces built a notice and sent messengers notifying the foreigners that the Imperial Chinese forces were going to protect them, and open up communications, and to cease fire, the foreigners in the legations responded by shooting and killing the messengers. It was the British minister who orderd Chinese Christians to stay in the Su Wang Fu palace after removing Su Wang Fu from the palace.()The only soldiers who the legation had any thing to fear from, were Dong Fuxiangs Muslim and ex-Boxer warriors, who were allied to the anti foreign Prince Duan, who had originally allowed the Boxers to come into the city. Ronglu directed his own forces to instead protect the foreigners in the legations, per the Dowager Empresss decree, and only fired purposely misdirected shots and firecrackers to make it seem as though they were fighting.()Fight on the WallThe most critical threat to the survival of the foreigners came in early July. On June 30, the Chinese forced the Germans off the Tartar Wall, leaving the American Marines alone in its defense. At the same time a Chinese barricade was advanced to within a few feet of the American positions and it became clear that the Americans had to abandon the wall or force the Chinese to retreat. At 2 am on July 3, the foreigners launched an assault against the Chinese barricade on the wall with 26 British, 15 Russian, and 15 Americans under the command of American Captain John T. Myers. As hoped, the attack caught the Chinese sleeping, killed about 20 of them, and expelled the rest of them from the barricades. Two American marines were killed and Captain Myers was wounded and spent the rest of the siege in the hospital.(Oliphant, Nigel, A Diary of the Siege of the Legations in Peking. London: Longman, Greens, 1901, pp 7880) The capture of Chinese positions on the Wall was hailed as the pivot of our destiny by one of the besieged. The Chinese did not attempt to regain or advance their positions on the Tartar Wall for the remainder of the siege.(Martin, W.A.P. The Siege in Peking. New York:Fleming H. Revell, 1900, p. 83)Darkest days and a truceSir Claude MacDonald said July 13 was the most harassing day of the siege.(Fleming, 157) The Japanese and Italians in the Fu were driven back to their last defense line. While the Fu was under heavy attack the Chinese detonated a mine beneath the French Legation, destroying most of it, killing two soldiers, and pushing the French and Austrians out of most of the French Legation. Frank Gamewell began digging bomb proof shelters as a last refuge for the besieged. The end seemed near.(Allen, 204; The Fortification of Peking during the Siege. The Gospel in all Lands. Feb 1902, 83)The next day, however, a conciliatory message was received from the Chinese, which raised hopesdashed again on July 16 when the most capable British officer was killed and journalist Ernest Morrison was wounded.(Thompson, Peter and Macklin, Robert The Man who Died Twice: The Life and Adventures of Morrison of Peking. Crows Nest, Australia: Allen & Unwin, 2005, pp 190191) But American Minister Conger carried on a communication with the Chinese government and on July 17 firing died down on both sides and an armistice began.(Conger, Sarah Pike, Letters from China. Chicago: A.C McClurg, 1910, p. 135) It was just in time; more than  of the legation guards were dead or wounded. The motivation on the Chinese side was probably the realization that an allied force of 20,000 men had landed in China and retribution for the Boxers and the siege was at hand.Relief of the LegationsOn July 28, the foreigners in the Legation Quarter received their first message from the outside world in more than a month. A Chinese boy  a student of the missionary William Scott Ament  snuck into the Legation Quarter with the news that a rescue army of the Alliance was in Tianjin  way and would advance shortly to Beijing. The news was hardly reassuring as the besieged had been expecting an earlier rescue.(Morrison, p. 645) The Chinese government also passed along inquiries about the welfare of the besieged from their governments. A British soldier suggested that an appropriate reply would be, Not massacred yet.(Miner, Luella, A Prison in Peking: The Diary of an American Woman during the Siege. The Outlook, Nov. 10, 17, 24, 1900, p. 735)After many relatively quiet days, the night of August 13, with the rescue army only  outside the gates of Beijing, may have been the most difficult of the siege.(Lynch, George. Vae Victis! The Allies in Peking after the Siege. The Independent. Nov 8, 1900, pp. 1303.) The Chinese broke the truce with an artillery barrage of the British Legation and heavy fire in the Fu. But the Chinese confined themselves to firing from a distance rather than mounting an assault until, at 2 am on August 14, the defenders heard from the east the sound of a machine gun, a sign that the rescue army was on the way. At 5 am came the sound of artillery outside the walls of Beijing.(Allen, 276)On August 7, new Chinese Imperial troops from Shanxi arrived, their commanding General promised to seize the legations in five days, reportedly that they would be leaving neither fowl nor dog. The fighting and Chinese offensives became so severe from August 913 that the legations would have fallen if the relief force had not arrived.()()Five national contingents advanced on the walls of Beijing on August 14: British, American, Japanese, Russian, and French. Each had a gate in the Wall for its objective. The Japanese and Russians were delayed at their gates by Chinese resistance. The small French contingent got lost. The Americans scaled the walls rather than attempting to forcing their way through a fortified gate. American soldiers climbing the City Wall is the iconic image of the Boxer Rebellion. However, it was the British who won the race to relieve the siege of the legations. They entered the city through an unguarded gate. At Zhengyang Gate, the British forces faced off in battle against Chinese Muslim Braves.() The commanding Muslim general, Fulu, and four cousins of his were killed in action against the foreign forces. After the battle was over, the Chinese Muslim forces guarded the Dowager Cixi when she fled to Xian with the entire Imperial Court; the Muslim general Fuxiang assisted in guarding Cixi.() At 3:00 pm the British passed through a drainage ditch  the water gate  under the Tartar Wall. Sikh and Rajput soldiers from India and their British officers had the honor of being the first to enter the Legation Quarter.(Thompson, 174182) Chinese opposition ceased at about the same time, and the Chinese armies melted away. A short time later, the British commander, General Gaselee, entered and was greeted by a Sir Claude MacDonald dressed in immaculate tennis flannels and a crowd of cheering ladies in party dresses.(Fleming, 203) The American troops, under General Chaffee arrived at 5 pm(Conger, 161)The Chinese failed to mount determined and decisive attacks on the Legation Quarter. Missionary Arthur Smith summed up the Chinese military performance. Upon unnumbered occasions, had they been ready to make a sacrifice of a few hundred lives, they could have extinguished the defense the Legation Quarter in an hour. Chinese ineffectiveness aside, the foreigners defending the Legation Quarter suffered heavy casualties. Of the 409 soldiers, 55 were killed and 135 wounded, a casualty rate of 46.5%. In addition, 13 civilians were killed and 24 wounded, mostly men who participated in the defense.(Myers, 552, with minor corrections) Chinese military casualties are not known, nor were deaths among the Chinese Christians in the Legation Quarter recorded.AftermathThe Empress Dowager and her court fled Beijing on August 15. She remained in exile in Shanxi province until 1902, when she was permitted by the foreign armies occupying Beijing to return to reoccupy the throne.(Preston, Diana. The Boxer Rebellion. New York: Berkley Books, 1999) For China, the Boxer Rebellion was a disaster but  ironically  turned out about as well as could be expected. China remained together as a single country. Prior to the Boxer Rebellion it seemed likely to be divided by the colonial powers. The Chinese government supported the Boxers, who otherwise might have turned anti-Qing and hastened the extinction of the dynasty, but was unsuccessful in killing the foreigners in the Legations. Had the Chinese succeeded, the retribution the Western countries and Japan took might have been more severe. Ronglu later took credit for saving the besieged: I was able to avert the crowning misfortune which would have resulted from the killing of the Foreign Ministers.  Ronglu was somewhat disingenious, as his forces came very close to breaking the ability of the besieged to resist.(The military occupation of Beijing and much of northern China became an orgy of looting and violence in which foreign soldiers, diplomats, missionaries, and journalists were all guilty.  Reports of the behavior of the foreigners in Beijing caused widespread criticism in Western countries, including from Twain. While the rescue of the besieged foreigners in the Legation Quarter was seen as a proof of the superiority of Western civilization, the sordid aftermath of the siege forced many people in the United States and Europe to reevaluate the morality of forcing Christianity and Western culture upon the Chinese.(Thompson, 194204.)See also*Dynasty Royal Decree on events leading to the signing of Boxer ProtocolNotesReferences*Allen, Rev. Roland The Siege of the Peking Legations. London: Smith, Elder, 1901*Annual Reports of the War Department, 1901 Washington: Government Printing Office, 1901*Bickers, Robert and Tiedemann, R.G., The Boxers, China, and the World. Lanham, MD; Rowman and Littlefield, 2007***Cohen, Paul A. History in Three Keys: The Boxers as Event, Experience, and Myth. New York: Columbia U Press, 1997*Conger, Sarah Pike, Letters from China. Chicago: A.C McClurg, 1910*Davids, Jules, ed. American Diplomatic and State Papers: The United States and China: Boxer Uprising. Series 3, Vol. 5, Wilmington, DE: Scholarly Resources, 1981*Der Ling, Princess. Two Years in the Forbidden City. New York: Moffat, Yard, 1911*Fenn, Rev. Courtnay Hughes, The American Marines in the Siege of Peking. The Independent. Dec 6, 2000*Fleming, Peter. The Siege at Peking. New York: Harper, 1959*Foreign Relations of the United States, Washington: Government Printing Office, 1900*Ingram, James H., M.D. The Defense of the Legations in Peking. The Independent. Dec 3 and 10, 1900*Lynch, George. Vae Victis! The Allies in Peking after the Siege. The Independent. Nov 8, 1900*Martin, W.A.P. The Siege in Peking. New York:Fleming H. Revell, 1900*Mateer, Ada Haven. Siege Days: Personal Experiences of American Women and Children during the Peking Siege. Chicago: Fleming H. Revell, 1903*Miner, Luella, A Prison in Peking: The Diary of an American Woman during the Siege. The Outlook, Nov. 10, 17, 24, 1900*Morrison, Dr. George E. The Siege of the Peking Legations The Living Age, Nov 17, 24 and Dec 1, 8, and 15, 1900**Myers, Capt. John T. Military Operations and Defenses of the Siege of Peking. Proceedings of the U.S. Naval Institute September, 1902*OConnor, Richard. The Spirit Soldiers: A Historical Narrative of the Boxer Rebellion. New York: Putnams, 1973*Oliphant, Nigel, A Diary of the Siege of the Legations in Peking. London: Longman, Greens, 1901*Porter, Henry D. William Scott Ament: Missionary of the American Board to China. New York: Fleming H. Revell, 1911*Preston, Diana. The Boxer Rebellion. New York: Berkley Books, 1999*Ransome, Jessie. The Story of the Siege Hospital. London: SPCK, 1901*Seagrave, Sterling. Dragon Lady: the Life and Legend of the Last Empress of China. New York: Vantage, 1992*Smith, Arthur H. China in Convulsion. 2 Vols. New York: Fleming H. Revell, 1901*The Fortification of Peking during the Siege. The Gospel in all Lands. Feb 1902*Thompson, Larry Clinton. William Scott Ament and the Boxer Rebellion: Heroism, Hubris, and the Ideal Missionary. Jefferson, NC: McFarland, 2009*Thompson, Peter and Macklin, Robert The Man who Died Twice: The Life and Adventures of Morrison of Peking. Crows Nest, Australia: Allen & Unwin, 2005*Weale, B. L. (Lenox Simpson), Indiscreet Letters from Peking. New York: Dodd, Mead, 1907   zh:
28848909
The_Owyhee_Avalanche
The Owyhee Avalanche is a weekly newspaper in Idaho, States, which is published Wednesday mornings and serves the County area of Southwestern Idaho.The Owyhee Avalanche has a weekly circulation of nearly 8,000. The Owyhee Avalanches publisher is Joe Aman. Its managing editor is Jon Brown.HistoryThe Owyhee Avalanche originated in the mining community of Silver City.Cities* Bruneau* Grand View* Homedale* Marsing* Murphy* Riddle* Silver City* Jordan ValleyOwyhee Cam* Owyhee CamExternal links* The Owyhee Avalanche
28866376
Paul_Sidney_Martin
Paul Sidney Martin (born November 22, 1898(Nash 2010, p. 105. Nash 2003, p. 165 and thee site of the Field Museum of Natural History provide a different date: Martin was born in Chicago on November 20, 1899 (The Paul S. Martin collection. Biographical statement. Field Museum of Natural History, Chicago. Retrieved 2010-09-18).) in Chicago - died January 20, 1974() was an American anthropologist and archaeologist. A lifelong associate of the Museum of Natural History in Chicago, Martin studied pre-Columbian cultures of the United States. He excavated more than a hundred sites,(Nash 2010, p. 104. The site of the Field Museum of Natural History presents a different number: Paul Martin was involved in single-season and multi-season excavations at 69 sites (The Paul S. Martin collection. Introduction. Field Museum of Natural History, Chicago. Retrieved 2010-09-18).) starting with the groundbreaking seven-season expedition to the County, Colorado in 19301938.(The Paul S. Martin collection. Biographical statement. Field Museum of Natural History, Chicago. Retrieved 2010-09-18.) His research passed through three distinct stages: field archaeology of the Anasazi Pueblo cultures of Colorado in the 1930s, studies of the culture in 19391955 and the New Archaeology studies in 19561972.(Nash 2003, p. 165.) Martin collected more than 585 thousand archaeological artifacts( although his own methods of handling these relics were at times destructive and unacceptable even by the standards of his time.( Martin was elected President of the for American Archaeology and awarded the 1968 Alfred Vincent Kidder Award of the Anthropological Association.((Paul Sidney Martin (obituary). Anthropology News, 1974 vol. 15, no. 3 p. 3.) He trained over fifty professional archaeologists and published more than 200 academic and popular papers.( Martins field expeditions redefined the role of museum anthropologists from the search for exhibits to research-driven field studies.(Nash 2010, p. 104.)BiographyMartin was the fifth child of Ellsworth C. Martin and Adelaide May Martin (ne Sackett). The most recent biographical article by Stephen Nash states his date of birth as November 22, 1898; the site of the Field Museum of Natural History as November 20, 1899.( He attended the Trier High School in Illinois. He studied history and languages at the of Chicago from September 1918 to December 1923. Martin attained a modest B- average grade and found his true calling, anthropology, only in the end of his undergraduate studies.(Nash 2010, p. 105.) He began graduate studies at the Department of Sociology under Cole and became Coles first Ph.D. student( (he defended his Ph.D. thesis on Kiva culture in May 1929(Nash 2010, p. 107.)). In the summer of 1925 Martin departed for his first practical field excavations sponsored by the Public Museum.(In the summer of 1926 Martin examined 450 sites of the Mount Builders and 1,200 related artifacts in private collections.( His first article has set a standard for the rest of his life: Martin the scientist was later known for prompt publication of collected field data.( In the next three winters he assisted Morley in his Yucatn expeditions; in summers he attended excavations in Colorado.( Martin seriously dedicated himself to Mesoamerican studies, but in 1929 his long-term plans were cut short by an acute bout of tropical diseases.( The medics ruled out further field work in the jungle, and Martin had to limit his scientific career to continental United States.( By this time he was already well known to Midwestern historians and archaeologists. In 1928 Martin had already began his ten-year research in County, Colorado but in the summer of 1929 the Department of the Interior denied him permission to excavate Pueblo. The DOI argued that Martins employer, the Historical Society of Colorado, was financially unable to complete the excavation.( According to Nash, this setback motivated Martin to seek a stronger employer.( Indeed, on August 22, 1929 Laufer of the Museum of Natural History offered Martin a job at the Museums department of anthropology and Martin readily accepted the offer.( Nash wrote that the Museum almost certainly planned to use Martin in the upcoming modernization of the museum exhibits in its new building in Grant Park.(Nash 2010, p. 112.) Martin spent a remarkable amount of time in rearranging the exhibition and public outreach campaigns that preceded and accompanied the of Progress exhibition of 19331934( and wrote the 122-page guide to the Archaeology of North America collection.(Nash 2010, p. 113.) After Laufers suicide in 1934 Martin became the acting curator of the department( and temporarily assumed Laufers role in presenting the Oriental collections to the public.(Nash 2010, p. 115.) Martin chaired the department if from 1935 to 1964 and remained with the Museum until 1972.( According to Nash, no other Field Museum curator, in anthropology or any other department, was as visible on the exhibition floor, in Field Museum News, or in the Chicago newspapers during the pre-war period.( Martin was never married and had no children.(Nash 2010, p. 106.)  Towards the end of his life, in 1972, Martin moved to Arizona and for a short time worked at the of Arizona.( The University then employed another, and unrelated S. Martin. This other Paul S. Martin (who died in 2010 and had already established himself as an unorthodox thinker in the early 1970s) also studied prehistoric, pre-Columbian America.(Mari N. Jensen. Paul S. Martin, Pleistocene Extinctions Expert, Dies. University of Arizona. Retrieved 2010-09-17.) Paul Sidney Martin died in 1974 of heart failure and artery disease.(ResearchAnasazi excavationsMartins Montezuma County project, which spanned from 1928 to 1938, is enormous by modern standards.( In the first season his team of six diggers excavated thirty rooms, four kivas, eight towers and twelve waste heaps at Cutthroat Castle.( He developed a theory that the Pueblo ruins actually belong to two types: an earlier known type built on open mesas and a different, rim-rock type of settlement built on the ledges of canyons.( In 1929 he continued digging at the Pueblo and Dog Ruin,(See the complete list of Colorado pueblos at Site Data from Appendix of The Prehistoric Pueblo World, A.D. 1150-1350 ) focusing his research on the complex relationship between different buildings and passageways.( In the beginning of 1930 the Field Museum secured him a blanket excavation license from the Department of Interior. V. Kidder and Nusbaum spoke in support of Martin and pledged their responsibility for monitoring Martins work in the field.(Nash 2010, p. 108.)Work in Pueblo commenced in the summer of 1930. Martin practiced novel Chicago excavation methode and mining technologies learned from Cole and Morley, recorded everything on film,(Nash 2010, p. 110.) but did not take care to reinforce the exposed walls. They collapsed during the winter.(Nash 2010, p. 109.) The summer of 1931 brought many celebrated finds: sixty or seventy pieces of pottery, many sherds, bone tools, minor objects, and about one hundred excellent negatives... unlike anything in the area.( More finds in 1933 and 1934 led Martin to a conclusion that Lowry Pueblo has witnessed five distinct periods of human occupation, the earliest of which he dated 894 A. D. based on tree ring dating.( Martins writing of the period reflects a duality forced upon a scientist by his employer: Martin the Museum employee emphasized tangible loot and the process of finding it, Martin the scientist discussed ancient psychology and cultural patterns, and wondered about the root causes of Native American social evolution.(Nash, pp. 110, 111.) In the end of his life Martin himself wrote that Mostly, we dug out of curiosity, for fun, for specimens, and to write thehistorical details for these sites and for this time period ... I fear some of excavations were the result of my callow youth: the desire to make a name for myself by apingKidder ... and to obtain a goodly amount of loot for the Museum, for I was, at the time, very museum minded.(Nash 2010, p. 111, cites Paul S. Martin (1974). Early Development in Mogollon Research, published in Archaeological Researches in Retrospect. Gordon R. Willey, ed. Pp. 329. Cambridge:Winthrop.) The Lowry campaign was concluded in 19371938 with the studies of the settling patterns (Martin himself did not use the term).(Nash 2010, p. 111.) The 1938 season seemed uninspiring until August when excavations at Basketmareks Site brought a breakthrough.( The new finds pushed the timescale of Pueblo settlements from 1000 A. D. to 400 A. D.( Martins student Lloyd developed a new methode of surveying which enabled quick surveys of large stretches of land. Lloyd reported locating eighty sites over an area of  in one short season.( Another of Martins students, Beach Rinaldo, joined the team in 1939 and remained Martins assistant for a quarter of a century.(Nash 2003, pp. 167-168.) Martin himself sought a more promising field where he could leave a lasting scholarly mark on the profession.(Nash, p. 168.) He decided to move from pure field archaeology into greener intellectual pastures and concentrated on the culture of Arizona and New Mexico, which was discovered by Haury in 1936.( Early publicationsIn 1940 Martin and Willis published Anasazi Painted Pottery in the Field Museum of Natural History, a comprehensive catalogue of over 5,000 ancient Pueblo pottery artifacts.(Nash 2010, p. 116.) Martins own contribution to archaeology made before War II has been overshadowed by his post-war research in Arizona.( He was not actively engaged in academic teaching, and thus did not train a stream of graduate students like his contemporary Kidder.(Nash 2010, p. 117.) Most of his own pre-war works were published by the Museums own press, not peer-reviewed journals.( According to Nash, these papers must now be considered incomplete, failing modern research standards.( Martin did not screen the excavated earth for all present things, thus destroying potentially significant evidence (the practice of screening became a standard only in the 1970s).( Martin preserved and shipped to Chicago the artifacts that he himself deemed exhibition-worthy; other, less significant, finds were recorded and then abandoned in the field.( During the 1936 Lowry Pueblo excavation he described 1,377 objects but catalogued only 598 of them.( The balance was lost. A 1998 inventory of the aforementioned collection found only 520 exhibits in place.( The other 78 were lost through attrition, theft and deliberate culling by the Museum staff.( According to Nash, the 1937 and 1938 collections fared even worse.( Finally, Martin did not keep or deliberately destroyed the original excavation records - his own and other archaeologists (Carl Lloyds). This, according to Nash, was unacceptable even in the 1930s.(Mogollon studiesIn 1939 Martin began excavations at the Stevens-Underwood (SU) site, seven miles (11 km) from Reserve in County, New Mexico.(For a map of the SU site see Nash, 1999, p. 1.) His stated goals were to search for Abajo pottery, study the newly discovered Mogollon culture and the relationship between it and the Anasazi cultures.(Nash 2003, p. 169.) The first season was dedicated to discovering specific traits that could help draw the line between the Mogollons and other prehistoric people.( Nash recovered twelve thousand sherds from only eight excavated pit houses. The origin of these sherds was deemed critical to determining the location of the earliest pottery in the Southwest.( The 1941 season was similar, with an even larger number of sherds found.( War II interrupted Martins field research for four years. The hiatus changed the pattern of Martins life and ultimately his scientific interests. Increased interaction with his peers in Chicago area resulted in a turn to historical analysis of prehistoric society: how the former inhabitants of the village lived, how they grouped themselves socially, how they solved their subsistence problems, whether they had any religious concepts, and what their particular interests were.(Nash 2003, pp. 169-170.) According to Martin himself, the change was directly influenced by the work of Eggan and Murdock.( The new approach became the seed of what would become the New Archaeology.(In 1947 Martin excavated the Pine Lawn site in New Mexico.( Martin wanted to find the oldest prehistoric settlement in the Southwest. dating was not introduced yet, and he could only rely on tree ring dating. This approach required a site with a long continuous stock of suitable tree matter, and such a site, Tularosa Cave, was found in 1950 one mile (1.6 km) from New Mexico.(Nash 2003, p. 170.) Earlier known Mogollon sites were open to the elements; Tularosa Cave was buried under a thick layer of soil which preserved the organic remains of the Mogollon culture - maize cobs, shoes, baskets, netting and strings etc.(Nash 2003, p. 171.) These organic specimens preserved by Martin and Rinaldo enabled later researchers to perform analysis and activation analysis of the site excavated many decades ago.( In 1952 Martin and Rinaldo proposed a new, three-phase classification of pre-Columbian material culture, starting with the earliest one known to them - the Pine Lawn Phase that started around 150 B. C.( Martin reasoned that the changes from one phase to another were caused by the diffusion of people and the increase in their dependence on wild, rather than cultivated, plants that coincided with a decrease in hunting.(Nash 2003, p. 172.) Studies of food habits brought Martin in tighter contact with biologists; his associate Cutter coined the term ecology in 1956.( By 1956 Martin seemed to understand everything about the Mogollons except one thing - why did this culture disappeared in the 14th century?(Nash 2003, p. 173.)New ArchaeologyIn 1955 Martin became lecturer in anthropology at the University of Chicago and for the first time in his life began intensive work with students.(Nash 2003, p. 174.) He gradually stepped aside from field archaeology; his former authoritative management style became democratic and forgiving, and he even allowed women to archaeologists camps.( In 1957 and 1958 he managed excavation in Little Ortega, Laguna Salada and Table Rock Pueblo, but reports on this research were written primarily by Rinaldo.(Nash 2003, p. 174.)In 1960 Martin obtained a Science Foundation research grant that had, in retrospect, significantly changed the scope of archaeology Field Museum.( According to the terms of the grant, the museum became the first institution to practice pollen analysis in archaeology.( Martin admitted that he did not really know what to make of it; actual research was carried out by Schoenwetter who concluded that around 1000 A. D. the American Southwest witnessed a radical climate change.( Looking back into the past, Martin critically reassessed his own input; by 1962 dissatisfaction developed into a deep personal crisis. Martin wrote that I have dumped all my research prior to 1962 and that his lengthy field reports produced over thirty years were just boring repetitions of minute detail.(Nash 2003, p. 175.) He continued work at the university and still managed field expeditions, but practically quit writing. Only one of Martins last ten excavations was adequately published; the paper was released posthumously by his students.(Nash 2003, p. 176.)FootnotesReferences* William A. Longacre (1976). Paul Sidney Martin 1899-1974. American Anthropologist. Volume 78, Issue 1, pages 9092, March 1976. * Stephen E. Nash (1999). An assessment of Paul Martins arhaeological collection from the SU site. Chicago: Field Museum of Natural History. Retrieved 2010-09-19.)* Stephen E. Nash (2001). A Gentlemen Scholar. Magazine. Volume 54 issue 3 pp. 6063.* Stephen E. Nash (2010). A Conflicted Legacy: Paul Sidney Martin as Museum Archaeologist, 192538. Anthropologist. Volume 112, Issue 1,  pages 104121, March 2010.* Stephen E. Nash (2003). Paul Sidney Martin, in: Curators, Collections, and Contexts: Anthropology at the Field Museum, 18932002. Fieldiana (n.s.) 36. Chicago: Field Museum of Natural History. pp. 165-External links* * The Paul S. Martin collection at the Field Museum of Natural History, Chicago
28880868
Ingleton_Coalfield
The Ingleton Coalfield is a coalfield in Yorkshire, close to its border with Lancashire in north-west England. Isolated from other coal-producing areas, it is one of the smallest coalfields in Britain.(British Geological Survey 2007 Bedrock geology: UK South 1:625,000 scale geological map, BGS, Keyworth, Notts)Mining is known to have taken place here since the early 17th century though it was the middle of the 19th century before the coalfield was further developed.(http://www.northcravenheritage.org.uk/nchtjournal/Journals/1993/J93A14.html)References
28891686
Neopostega
Neopostega is a genus of moths of the Opostegidae family.Species*asymmetra D.R. Davis & J.R. Stonis, 2007*distola D.R. Davis & J.R. Stonis, 2007*falcata D.R. Davis & J.R. Stonis, 2007*longispina D.R. Davis & J.R. Stonis, 2007*petila D.R. Davis & J.R. Stonis, 2007External links*A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)*Contribution to the Opostegidae Fauna of Central America, with an Updated Checklist and Description of New Species from Costa Rica and Mexico (Insecta: Lepidoptera)vi:Neopostega
28900797
Neopostega_asymmetra
Neopostega asymmetra is a moth of the Opostegidae family. It is known only fromthe type locality, in the Atlantic coastal forest in southern Brazil.The length of the forewings is about 3 mm. Adults are almost entirely white. Adults are on wing in JanuaryEtymologyThe species name is derived from the Greek asymmetros (without symmetry) in referenceto the asymmetrical structure of the juxta in the male genitalia.External links*A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)asymmetra
28901813
Pseudopostega_ferruginea
Pseudopostega ferruginea is a moth of the Opostegidae family. It is endemic to the Indies, where it has been found in Rico and St. Thomas.The length of the forewings is 2.1-2.9 mm. Adults are mostly white. Adults have been collected in March and July.EtymologyThe specific name is derived from the Latin ferruginus (reddish brown, rust-colored), as suggested by the reddish brown, forewing apical band diagnostic for this species.External links*A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)ferruginea
28907394
The_Queens_Award_for_Enterprise:_International_Trade_(Export)_(1980)
The Queens Award for Enterprise: International Trade (Export) (1980) was awarded on 21 April 1980, by Queen II.RecipientsThe following organisations were awarded this year.()* Ltd, of Aylesbury, Buckinghamshire.* Plate Ltd, of Birmingham.* Colloids Ltd, of Bradford, West Yorkshire.* Crosta Babcock Ltd, of Heywood, Lancashire.* Roadstone Construction Ltd, of Abingdon, Oxfordshire.* S Atkins Group Ltd, of Epsom, Surrey.* Woodall-Duckham Ltd, of Crawley, West Sussex.* & Partners, of London, SW1.* Doors (UK) Ltd, of Stockport, Greater Manchester.* Dudley Ltd, of Tipton, West Midlands.* Packaging Machines Ltd, of Bristol.* Airways Engine Overhaul Ltd, of Cardiff.* Nuclear Fuels Ltd, of Warrington, Cheshire.* International Ltd, of Warrington, Cheshire.* H Clissold & Son Ltd, of Bradford, West Yorkshire.* International Fashions Ltd, of London, W1.* Ltd, of Hatfield, Hertfordshire.* McKee (Minerals & Metals) Ltd, of Stockton-on-Tees, Cleveland.* Machinery Ltd, of High Wycombe, Buckinghamshire.* Byron International Division of Dobson Park (Engineering) Ltd, of Nottingham.* Mining Equipment Ltd, of Gloucester.* Rotol Ltd, of Gloucester.* Telecommunications Ltd, of Bexhill-on-Sea, East Sussex.* Drum Engineering Company Ltd, of Bradford, West Yorkshire.* (London) Ltd, of London, SW19.* & S Ellis Ltd, of London, E3.* Financial Times Ltd, of London, EC4.* Microfilm Holdings Ltd, of Stanmore, Middlesex.* Turbine Generators Ltd, of Rugby.* Flexible Materials Ltd, of Bracknell, Berkshire.* Transformers Ltd, of Christchurch, Dorset.* and Dunsmore Ltd, of Preston, Lancashire.* Gentles and Son, of Edinburgh.* Spicer Ltd, of Birmingham.* Mouldings Ltd, of Warley, West Midlands.* Ltd, of Rochester, Kent.* Tool Company Ltd, of London, W1.* Electronics Ltd, of Reading, Berkshire.* Froster Ltd, of Grimsby, South Humberside.* & Trecker Marwin Ltd, of Brighton, East Sussex.* Papers Ltd, of Clitheroe, Lancashire.* Bagnall Ltd, of Basingstoke, Hampshire.* Howl & Co. Ltd, of Tipton, West Midlands.* Marine Ltd, of Havant, Hampshire.* Ltd, of Cheltenham, Gloucestershire.* A Lister & Company, Ltd, of Dursley, Gloucestershire.* Robertson Engineering Company Ltd, of Poole, Dorset.* International Ltd, of Scarborough, North Yorkshire.* Greenlees Ltd, of Edinburgh.* M MacDonald & Partners Ltd, of Cambridge.* Machines Ltd, of Liverpool.* Radar Systems Ltd, of Chelmsford, Essex.* Marr and Son Ltd, of Hull, Humberside.* Mars Money Systems Division of Mars Ltd, of Slough, Berkshire.* Mercantile and General Reinsurance Company Ltd, of London, EC.2.* Electrical Division of Newage Engineers Ltd, of Stamford, Lincolnshire.* Magnetics Ltd, of Farnborough, Hampshire.* Inspection Services Ltd, of Aberdeen.* Ltd, of Llangefni, Gwynedd.* Smokehouses Ltd, of Annan, Dumfriesshire.* Ltd, of Caterham, Surrey.* Ltd, of Salisbury, Wiltshire.* Ltd, of Tewkesbury, Gloucestershire.* Rank Taylor Hobson Division of Rank Precision Industries Ltd, of Leicester.* Xerox Ltd., London, NW.I.Raychem Ltd, of Swindon, Wiltshire.* Simulation Ltd, of Crawley, West Sussex.* Conveyors Ltd, of Stroud, Gloucestershire.* Medical Ltd, of Hertford.* Ross and Company Ltd, of Sandridge, St. Albans, Hertfordshire.* Oak Steel Works Ltd, of Brierley Hill, West Midlands.* Ryvita Company Ltd, of Poole, Dorset.* Aircraft Division of Short Brothers Ltd, of Belfast.* O Smith Harvestore Products Ltd, of Eye, Suffolk.* Ltd, of Peterborough, Cambridgeshire.* (UK) Ltd, of Bridgend, Mid-Glamorganshire.* Chartered Bank, of London, EC4.* Forte Ltd, of London, SW1.* G Turney & Son Ltd, of London, SW1.* Design and Projects Division of Vickers Ltd, of Eastleigh, Hampshire.* Howson-Algraphy Group of Vickers Ltd, of Leeds.* Walker and Sons Ltd, of London, SW1.* Ltd, of London, E1.* Wedgwood & Sons Ltd, of Stoke-on-Trent, Staffordshire.* Richardson Ltd, of Sheffield.* Biochemicals Ltd, of Maidstone, Kent.* Ltd, of Coventry, West Midlands.References
28932246
Index_of_recycling_articles
This is an index of recycling topics.A- Fleet Recycling AssociationB- recyclingC- recycling- technology for developing areas- legislation- reuseD- for Environment- gold- DowncyclingE- E-Cycling (recycling of electronic components)- Waste Recycling Fee- eDay- producer responsibilityF- Freecycling- of Store Recycling- Depth RecyclingG- Dot (symbol)- GiftingH* HumanureI- I-recycleL- miningM- recovery facilityP- as you throw- PullApart (grading packaging for the environment, consumers and local people).R- Recycling- bin- codes- cooperative- criticism- symbol- It, Dont Trash It!- Regiving- Retrocomputing- Reuse- logistics- vending machineS- recycling program- recyclingT- depolymerization- TrashwareU- lumberjacking- miningW- hierarchy- minimisation- directive
28948604
Pseudopostega_diskusi
Pseudopostega diskusi is a moth of the Opostegidae family. It is only known from the Cayo District of central Belize.The length of the forewings is 2.8-3.1 mm. Adults are mostly white. Adults have been collected in April.EtymologyThis species is named in honor of Arunas Dikus, Vilnius Pedagogical University, Vilnius, Lithuania, a specialist on the Nepticuloidea and Tischerioidea.External links*A Revision of the New World Plant-Mining Moths of the Family Opostegidae (Lepidoptera: Nepticuloidea)diskusi
28958579
Aurora_mine
The Aurora mine is the largest integrated phosphate mining and chemical plant in the world.() The mine is located in Aurora in Beaufort County, Carolina.() The mine which is owned since 1995 by PotashCorp, the worlds largest potash producer and the second and third largest producer of nitrogen and phosphate, has an annual production capacity of over six million tonnes of phoshpate ore.( In 2008 the mine produced 6.6 million tonnes of phosphate ore from which 1.3 million tonnes of acid was produced.(HistoryThe phosphates of the Aurora mine are the result of a recession experienced by the sea coast of Aurora. Phosphates were deposited into the sea about 15 million years ago. The result was a phosphate ore zone with  of low-grade phosphate sand blanketed by sand silt. The ore zone is estimated to be about  thick, consisting of phosphate sand, fine quartz, clay and silt.( PotashCorp bought the Aurora mine in 1995 from the Texasgulf company as its first phosphate operation, and purchased the agricultural products division of Occidental Chemicals six months later.As of 2005 the Aurora mine had estimated proven and probable reserves of approximately 356 million tonnes of phosphate rock at an average grade of 30.7% P2O5. PotashCorp has rights to exploit an area of  of phosphate-bearing reserves, sufficient to support the mines operations for around 75 years.( In 2009 the mine produced 4.2 million tonnes of phosphate rock and 0.93 million tonnes of acid and had a number of 1,093 employees.() In June 2009, PotashCorp received permission from the US Army Corps of Engineers to mine reserves within the extraterritorial jurisdiction boundaries for a period of 30 years.(The phosphate rock is transported by waterway to the deep water port of Morehead City and a  railroad links the mining complex to the Southern Railway and Transportation rail networks.( References External links*Official website
28963519
North_Fork_American_River
 map_background  The North Fork American River is the longest branch of the River in California. It is  long from its source at the crest of the Sierra Nevada, near Tahoe, to its mouth at Lake northeast of Sacramento.( Prior to the construction of Dam the river was about  longer making for a total length of .It rises at Meadow Lake near the  peak of Chief in the National Forest. Flowing initially northwest, the river soon swings west into a gorge, paralleling the Forest Hill Divide on the south. Big Granite Creek then the North Fork North Fork American River come in from the right. The canyon shallows as the river turns southwest, carving through the Sierra foothills, then turning abruptly south near Colfax. About  downstream, it receives Shirttail Creek from the left then is impounded in Clementine (or North Fork Lake) which is formed by the Fork Dam, built in 1939 to contain mining debris.()Below the dam, the river bends south, passing under the Bridge, the highest bridge in California, then receives the Fork American River, its largest tributary, from the left. The valley widens as the river flows south past Auburn, soon emptying into the north arm of Folsom Lake, a reservoir formed in 1955 by the Folsom Dam. Its waters mingle with that of the Fork American River to form the River, a tributary of the River.(See also*Dam*Gold Rush*of rivers of CaliforniaReferences 
28983252
Tonzi
footnotes                Tonzi is a village in Township, District, in the Region of northwestern Burma.()()Tonzi has a history of mining.(Sykes, Christopher, Orde Wingate (1959), Collins)ReferencesExternal links*Maplandia World Gazetteer
29004220
Ectoedemia_mesoloba
 Ectoedemia mesoloba is a moth of the Nepticulidae family. It is found in Florida.The length of the forewings is about 2.7 mm. Adults have been collected in November.External links*New Leaf-Mining Moths of the Family Nepticulidae from Floridamesoloba
29017518
Tin_mine
#REDIRECT mining in Britain
29050233
Cave_of_El_Soplao
El Soplao is a cave located in the municipalities of Rionansa, Valdliga and Herreras in Cantabria (Spain). It is considered a single cavity worldwide for the quality and quantity of geological formations (speleothems) that houses in its 17 miles in length, although only 6 are open to the public. In it are rare formations as helctitas (estatalactitas eccentric defying gravity) and draperies (sheets or translucent banners hanging from the ceiling). Its formation dates back to the Mesozoic, in particular the Cretaceous period 240 million years ago.Access to the cave in the Sierra Soplao Arnero at 540 meters.The cave was accidentally discovered during the drilling mining subsequently being exploited for the extraction of minerals (the tour is accessible only to two of the eight galleries). During its operation, many local families were supported with the income they got from the mining, collated with the livestock. After decades of neglect, the speleology, and in particular the Cantabria University Speleologing Club since 1975, he discovered his true geological value.On July 1, 2005 the of Cantabria opened to the public and broadcast internationally, after conditioning inside and around for tourism and prohibit any activity the club discoverer.The Soplao is part of the 6,500 underground caves of Cantabria, without doubt, are a paradise for caving.SituationThe cavity is located in the Sierra de Arnero, in turn framed by the del Escudo de Caburniga, between the towns of Rionansa, Herreras and Valdliga and around Vicente de la Barquera. The Sierra de Arnero runs parallel to the Sea, with a maximum altitude of 682 meters.To access the cave you can use the Cantabrian motorway.GalleriesThe Soplao is a very extensive network of caves and developed at several levels. Metric data of the cave (December 2003)(Juan Colina (entre otros), El Soplao, una cavidad nica, Cretica Ediciones (2003).) are:* Mapped natural development of the cavity (12,585 meters).* Development of mine connected and communicated with the cavity (3,240 meters).* Lacuerre Caves (2,927 meters).* Total System Development mapped (17,852 meters).Gallery of the GhostsIt is a natural room which had the amount of thick white and stalagmite formations rising from the ground pisolithic for her figure, gave rise to the name of the gallery. The gallery is 350 meters long and some areas reaching 35 meters wide. Its name comes from the great white stalagmites that resemble ghosts, in the end zones of the gallery. Had a great use to the early twentieth century as a place of extraction and storage by the mineral miners of La Florida.Gallery GordaIt is a room with a natural underground lake and one of the largest in terms of volume. This is the first gallery to be accessed Soplao. The name comes from the impression of smallness due to one of the cavers who investigated the caves. It has a lighting system that highlights the colors of the stalactite from the ceiling, covered with calcite helictitas.Gallery of the False FloorSmall chamber where impressive rock formations in the form of thin threads that are screwed everywhere.Gallery of the CampIs of moderate dimensions, with widths up to 10 meters. The name comes from the installation of a research camp during the first raids. Here it remained unbroken 208 hours Speleo Club members Cantabria(Juan Colina (between), El Soplao, una cavidad nica, Cretica Ediciones (2003).) highlight the cast, dyed red and white minerals in the area.Gallery of the CauliflowerStand, rather than stalactites, stalagmites huge, often eccentric, that they tend to join at the end with the roof. Can be seen traces of an earthquake that hit the spot.Gallery of the ForestHigh gallery which takes its name from its resemblance to a natural forest. The cast and the union of stalactites and stalagmites happen everywhere, creating large and varied columns. As in the Galera of the Cauliflower can be seen traces of an earthquake.Gallery GenesisLocated to the east. It is one of the highest, reaching 30 meters high. Its length exceeds 160 meters. Notable cast sheets, giant stalagmites pisolithic nests. Its name comes from the number of colors displayed on it, because of the variety of salts dissolved in water.Other galleries* Gallery of Bridge* Gallery of the Mermaid* Gallery Columns* Gallery Grey* Gallery of the Avalanche* Gallery of the Goat* Gallery the Wonders* Gallery WetMineral SpeciesThis is the list of minerals found in the cave, in alphabetical order:* Amber* amber* Aragonite* Calcite* Calcite crystal* Dolomite* Sphalerite* Galena* Marcasite* PyriteSee also* in Cantabria References Cantabrian Speleogical Club The Cave of El Soplao, an unique cave (1987)Bibliography* Francisco Fernndez Ortega and Maria del Carmen Urioste Valls, El Soplao fantasy in the darkness, Creatic Publishing (2007).* John Hill (between others), El Soplao, a unique cavity, Creatic Editions (2003).External links* Information on the Web Soplao* Website Speleological Group discoverer of complex Soplao* Information Soplao* Found next to the reef Soplao amber with insects trapped largest in Europe* Photos of the Soplaode El SoplaoSoplaode El SoplaoEl Soplao
29071035
Birthday_Bluffs
Birthday Bluffs () are rock bluffs that rise to  between Bluff and Bluff on the south side of Spur, Coast, Dependency. The feature comprises a series of cliffs (caused by thick lava flows) that step up the escarpment. The name was suggested by geologist C. Wright, Department of Geoscience, Mexico Institute of Mining and Technology, Socorro, who examined the bluffs on November 21, 1983, the birthday of her father, Peter Wright.References* 
29136534
Etruscan_Resources
#REDIRECT Mining
29161367
North_South_Railway_(Saudi_Arabia)
 map_state    collapsedNorth South Railway is a  long railway project in Arabia. Trial operation on  long freight part of the project connecting Al-Haditha and Jalamid with new port city Al-Khair was started in May 2011.(RailwayGazette: Phosphate trial marks completion of North-South line)IntroductionUnder Royal Decree No. 56 and the date of 04.13.1424, the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia through the Ministry of Finance of the Public Investment Fund (PIF) funded the establishment of railway lines new (draft of the Saudi Railways SAR) in the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia. The draft of the Saudi Railways Organization, formerly known as the railway line from north to south (NSR) project to create the largest railroads in the world today.The project consists of the Saudi Company for Railways of the two main lines, starting with the first of them from Riyadh and extends to the north-west to the modern near the Jordanian border, also extends to the second line of the mid-point almost of the line of Riyadh - the modern to the point of so-called Forum Zabirah N, passing through the areas of deposition of bauxite in Zabirah, leading to the processing and export facilities to be built in Ras Al-Zour on the coast of the Gulf. Will also be building many of the laterals as part of the project. Will be devoted to a branch of the main line that extends from Riyadh to service modern phosphate mines in the area of boulders in the north west of the country, will also be devoted to another branch of the service area of a simple farm in the north-east of the country. Will also be devoted to branch line starts from the main line that extends between the Zabirah to Ras Al-Zour to service the bauxite mines in the area of Zabirah, in addition to another branch line to serve the industrial city of Jubail overlooking the Persian Gulf. And ensures the overall project of the Saudi Railways create rail length of approximately 2400 km in addition to the side rail storage and maintenance yards and points, stations and administrative facilities. The project also includes purchase of locomotives and rolling stock and the other phones on the railway lines and other equipment maintenance and emergencies.The government plans to deliver the infrastructure and related facilities, locomotives, equipment, bike and other equipment to Saudi Company for Railways (Saar), a commercial enterprise has been newly created due to own the assets and be responsible for the maintenance of lines and equipment and the provision of rail services through the operator contract. Where the operator will establish contractual operational entity within the Kingdom of Saudi Arabia to maintain the infrastructure and equipment to provide the bike and cargo, heavy metals, general cargo and passenger services.It is expected that the railway operations will start operating in the sectors of the railway during 2010/2011.Where he signed, Dr. Ibrahim Bin Abdul Aziz Al-Assaf, Minister of Finance and Chairman of the Public Investment Fund three decades for the company belonging to the Saudi Railways (SAR) government-owned, with the French Alliance - a Saudi, and American and Chinese companies. Dr. Al-Assaf told reporters that the project is progressing according to plan it, so-called end of 2010 to coincide with the completion of facilities projects, mining, and the total cost amounted to more than 12 billion riyals. The value of the contract communications systems and control signals website with the Alliance of Thales French solidarity with the Bin Laden Group, Saudi Arabia (1.710.000.000) Real and the duration of its implementation five years and includes the establishment of a network signal, control and communications systems, control and security by using the control system of Europe.It also includes the establishment of a center operating and control systems and ticketing, passenger information and the Internet inside the train stations in addition to linking the network of optical fiber. The minister said that within the Public Investment Fund on the participation of national companies to transfer and resettlement of technical railway in the Kingdom has signed a Memorandum of Understanding between the companys execution of this contract and Advanced Electronics Company (which is a subsidiary of the Offset Program) includes the participation of engineers and technicians of Saudis in the implementation of this contract, including the operation and maintenance and manufacturing spare parts required. With regard to the contract locomotives signed with American company Electro-Motive Diesel priced at (337.794.487) SAR includes the design, manufacture and supply 25 locomotive power 4300 hp used to train the metal phosphate along three kilometers by 160 vehicles per train with a payload of up to 16000 tons of the train is the one also used Public transportation also includes a contract to provide technical support by the company for two years after delivery. The value of the contract the third site with a Chinese company south of the locomotives and trailers, Ltd. to manufacture and supply of cargo vehicles minerals and general cargo (342.299.074) SAR includes the design, manufacture and supply of 668 vehicles, including 524 vehicle for the transfer of metal phosphate tonnage of 100 tons per vehicle and 144 vehicle flat and tanks and containers for public transport and petroleum products and the contract includes the provision of technical support by the company for two years after delivery.infoRailway Project North-South of mega projects launched by the Custodian of the Two Holy Mosques King Abdullah bin Abdul Aziz, for the transfer of metals and goods, and include the transfer of passengers the most modern means available, of benefit to the general economy revival and development of regions and cities and villages through which line or Ihavea. And, when inspecting the railway project North-South, in the region yesterday, that the project will link the cities of the Kingdom industrial economies and between the ports of export and import, will open new markets for agricultural products, crops and goods, facilitating their access to consumers, as well as providing employment and means of transport Shipping and comfortable for the people of areas it passes through the line and the gate Kingdom to other countries. He stressed that the line will shift in transport and wealth, goods and passengers, by providing the best services, and create bridges of social, economic, and service between the cities of the Kingdom. He noted the project has reached a good stage, saying that the project in its final stages. He expressed his thanks to those concerned with this project and the efforts they make in order to be completed on time. And was received by Prince upon his arrival at the ceremony in the designated agent emirate Ahmed bin Abdullah Al Sheikh, and a number of officials and Executive Vice President, Saudi Railways Sar Dr. Rmeih bin Mohammed Rumaih, who was briefed on progress of work in the reality in the region. Dr. Rumaih that the Saudi Company for Railways Sart implement and operate the project railway lines of the modern and packaging boulders in the north to Riyadh, passing through the Al-Jouf, Hail, Qassim and Sudair, in addition to the branch line from the Zabirah and even Ras Al-Zour and Jubail in the east. And that the project consists of two main lines: the first line that starts from Riyadh and extends from the north-west to the modern near the Jordanian border, while extending the second line of the mid-point almost line Riyadh modern, to an area dubbed Forum Zabirah north, passing through deposition in areas of bauxite Zabirah, leading to the processing and export facilities at Ras Al Zour on the coast of the Persian Gulf. The total length of railway total about 2400 km, and will carry 15 thousand tonnes per flight, which is equivalent to load 600 trucks, and the train consists of 100 per vehicle. He added that he has been the implementation of the 800 kilometers of the route of the line of mining, which links Ras Al-Zour Bazubayrp and firmly boulders out of 1486 km was hired in April 2009 with EMD of America for the manufacture of locomotives of the project and contract in April 2009 with CSR China for the manufacture of transport vehicles phosphate, was hired in March 2010 with the Company Rights (RITES) for the operation of the Indian mining, where the contract is valued at 278 million rials. He predicted the arrival of Dr. Rumaih locomotives and wagons of the Kingdom in August and September next, to coincide with the run to start the line of mining at the end of the year. It is expected to run the line in 2013 at speeds up to 200 kilometers per hour. The Prince visited the symptoms cement factory, where he saw the method of work and production by professional staff. To hear an explanation about the project from Dr. Rumaih and those responsible for its implementation.http://img186.imageshack.us/img186/4656/sare.jpgnewsthe work around the clock .. And the use of trailers in the transfer of concrete molds Dream come true the first appearance of the train carriages North - SouthHail name registered first points that has emerged in which the first train carriages, which runs north and south for more than 1200 kilometers of northern Saudi Arabia to the center before overlooking the Persian Gulf. The form of the initial impressions of the vehicles, a surprise to the people of the region, although it was earmarked for the transport of cement and some stereotypes of heavy equipment between the parts of the project, and the site is expected to be one of the most important stations on the rail giant. I stood and economic on the ground on the site, which is located about 20 kilometers to the north east of Hail, where it is to work around the clock to complete the project, which has turned into a reality on the ground, and is likely to be completed in 2010 according to Saudi officials assuredAlthough the form of vehicles driving seemed to be the quality of the old trains, which has raised a question among the population, and workers at the plant indicated that the vehicles allocated to work, where it is being passed on to the railway construction and practical reasons only, as it used to put pressure on the tracks and installing concrete molds during the action phase. During the tour, shows that the work reached the advanced stages, especially in the railway intersection, which borders through rapid Aljouf Bakaa with me and the plan, which is expected to be completed within a few months. It seemed the Chinese workers at the site and very nice with the economic, and showed great determination to work under the sun, where temperatures reached yesterday near forty degrees. And Dr. Ibrahim Bin Abdul-Aziz al-Assaf and Minister of Finance, Board Chairman of the Public Investment Fund was signed last month, three decades of the Saudi Railways (SAR) the total value of $ (2.390.000.000) Real are held communication systems and control signals and a supply contract for the supply of locomotives and vehicles, trailers and for the railway project extending from the packages and modern boulders to the north north of Ras Al-Zour and Jubail via Paljov Hail, Qassim and Riyadh and the length of 2400 km. The value of contract communications systems and signals to control the site with the Alliance of French company Thales in solidarity with the Saudi Bin Laden Group (1.710.000.000) Real and the duration of a period of five years, and includes references to the establishment of a network, control and communications systems control and security control system using the Union. The contract included the establishment of operating and control systems and ticketing and passenger information and the Internet in the train stations, in addition to linking the network of fiber optics. In the framework of the Public Investment Funds participation at the national firms for the transfer and resettlement of railway technology in the UK has been the signing of a memorandum of understanding between the company executing this contract, the company developed the electronics (which is one of the economic balance) include the participation of Saudi engineers and technicians in the stages of the implementation of this contract, including the This operation, maintenance and spare parts required. Concerning the site of locomotives with the American company amounts to Iketromotv Diesel (337.794.487) SAR, which includes the design, manufacture and supply of the engine 25 hp 4300 force used to train the metal phosphate at a length of three kilometers to 160 vehicles per train and a payload of up to 16000 tons per train, as also used for public transport, the contract also includes provision of technical support by the company for two years after delivery.The value of the contract signed with the third company of China Southern Locomotive and trailers, Ltd. to manufacture and supply of wagons and freight General Minerals (342.299.074) SAR, which includes the design, manufacture and supply of 668 vehicles, including 524 vehicles for the transport of the metal phosphate load one hundred tons per vehicle and a flat and 144 tanks and containers for transport General and petroleum products and the contract includes the provision of technical support by the company for two years after delivery. Such a project comes within the strategic development program aims to strengthen the means of transportation and the exploitation of the mineral wealth in the Kingdom in accordance with the decision of the Council of Ministers on 3-4 / 1424, which mandated the establishment of the fund this project in order to transfer the phosphate ore and bauxite from the north and center of the country to the mining and processing facilities with Zor on the Persian Gulf. And Dr. Ibrahim Al-Assaf and Minister of Finance at the time that the value of contracts signed in the railway projects amounted to more than 12 billion rials, including the settlement of the land and the opening of roads in influence, as well as the railway itself.818km section from the Jordan border to Persian Gulf ports and Riyadh is being built by Laing ORourke-Mitsui-RTCC consortium including:(http://www.laingorourke.com.au/projects/rail/project:saudi-arabia-north-south-railway-project)* 9 bridges* 22 camel crossings* 884 culverts* 1,360,256 Sleepers* 2,720,513m3 Ballaststation6 stations were allocated to the passenger train project in the north are distributed along the track which is King Khaled International Airport and collected, Qassim, Hail, Jouf and modern, and Gamal Al-Burhan expect a specialist in rail projects to start the operation of the industrial part of the project in the last quarter of 2010, and noted that the recent the signing of three contracts are held communication systems and control signals and a supply contract for the supply of locomotives and vehicles (trailers). And will be held signs and control of a coalition of French company Thales in solidarity with the Saudi Bin Laden Group to hold a total value of 1.7 billion rials for a period of five years on the contract to be completed in mid-2013 will be diesel Mutv Electronics Co. under the second contract the design and manufacture of locomotives, vehicles, transport of phosphate, the value of the contract with the company 338 million riyals, and the supply of which 25 will be the engine force of 4300 horse, and is used to train the metal phosphate and 3 km in length will be the rate of 160 vehicles per train and a payload of up to 16 tons per train. The project aims to train the north transfer of minerals from the mine and mine packages boulders Az Zabirah to refineries in Ras Az-Zour north of the city of Jubail, and the project includes 9 cargo services stations distributed along the track which Sudair Riyadh, Qassim and Hail, and Al-Jawf and Albesitae and Ras Al-Zour and Jubail and modern, with a length of railway line Iron 2400 km north-south, and will transfer the phosphate ore and bauxite from the north and center of the kingdom to the mining and processing facilities with Zour on the Persian Gulf, the project will also provide services for the transport of passengers and goods between a number of cities, which now depends on the asphalt road. And that the railway will link the capital Riyadh, the status of new on the Jordanian border and all of Qassim and Hail, and Al-Jawf, which will contribute in the future growth of international trade and promote the development and economic growth.*North South line** Haditha (525m) - near Jordan border** Bosayata - junction??---- ** Jalamid (779m) - terminus** Al-Jawf - junction----** Hail (998m)** Buraydah (607m)** Zabirah (619m)** Al-Zour** Jubail (Gazette International August 2009, p47)----** Jalamid (779m) - near Jordan border - phosphate** Bosayato - junction** Nafud - desert** - junction ** Riyadh (624m) - national capital----** - junction ** Zabirah - bauxite** Al-Zour - port----* Riyadh* Qassim* Hail* Al-Jouf* Al-Haditha at the Jordanian border. See also * Mashaaer Al Mugaddassah Metro* High Speed Rail Project.* Railways Organization.* in Saudi Arabia References linkhttp://www.sar.com.sa/index.php?partid1&laenhttp://www.skyscrapercity.com/showthread.php?t735868 
29173338
Wrapper_(data_mining)
Wrapper in mining is a program that extracts content of a particular information source and translates it into a relational form.(Nicholas Kushmerick, Daniel S. Weld, Robert Doorenbos, Wrapper Induction for Information Extraction Proceedings of the International Joint Conference on Artificial Intelligence,  1997) Many web pages present structured data - telephone directories, product catalogs, etc. formatted for human browsing using HTML language. Structured data are typically descriptions of objects retrieved from underlying databases and displayed in Web pages following some fixed templates. Software systems using such resources must translate HTML content into a relational form. Wrappers are commonly used as such translators. Formally, a wrapper is a function from a page to the set of tuples it contains. Wrapper generation There are two main approaches to wrapper generation: wrapper induction and automated data extraction.Wrapper induction uses supervised learning to learn data extraction rules from manually labeled training examples. The disadvantages of wrapper induction are* the time-consuming manual labeling process and * the difficulty of wrapper maintenance. Due to the manual labeling effort, it is hard to extract data from a large number of sites as each site has its own templates and requires separate manual labeling for wrapper learning.Wrapper maintenance is also a major issue because whenever a site changes the wrappers built for the sitebecome obsolete. Due to these shortcomings, researchers have studied automated wrapper generation usingunsupervised pattern mining. Automated extraction is possible because most Web data objects follow fixedtemplates. Discovering such templates or patterns enables the system to perform extraction automatically.(Liu, B. Web Data Mining: Exploring Hyperlinks, Contents and Usage Data, Springer, 2007.)Wrapper generation on the Web is an important problem with a wide range of applications. Extraction of such data enables one to integrate data/information from multiple Web sites to provide value-added services, e.g., comparative shopping, object search, and information integration.See also*intelligence (section Semi-structured or unstructured data)*scrapingSources((Informationsextraktion)
29179600
Chilean_mine_disaster_2010
#REDIRECT Copiap mining accident
29189214
Taxation_in_Zambia
 Taxation in Zambia  Zambian Tax Policy (Tax Policy Revenue Authority) Income in Zambia is taxed on the source principle or deemed source basis in some instances. Residents are taxed on domestic source of income and certain types of foreign income, non-residents are normally taxed on Zambian source of income. Zambia has the following direct taxes: Company Income Tax, Personal Income Tax, Withholding Tax, Presumptive Tax and Property Transfer Tax.* Company Income TaxThe general rate is 35 for both resident and non-resident companies. For companies involved in agriculture, manufacture of chemical fertilizer and non-traditional exports, the rate is 15 percent while that for mining is 30  percent and 40 percent on bank profits above K250 million* Personal Income TaxAll individuals are liable to tax on personal income after deducting personal relief at a graduated rate from 0 percent for incomes of K6 million per Annam and below. The rest at rates of 25 percent, 30 percent and 35 percent.* Presumptive TaxThe rate of 3 percent is charged on business income for small scale businesses below a turnover threshold of K200 million per annum* Property Transfer TaxThis is charged at the rate of 3 percent of the open market value realised from the sale of any land and building and shares issued by a company incorporated in Zambia*Withholding TaxWithholding tax of 15 percent on rental charges, dividends, interest payments, royalties, commissions, management and consultancy fees and payments to subcontractors. Payments made to non-residents are also subject to withholding tax at 15 percent in all cases except where there is a double taxation agreement in effectZambia also charges Indirect taxes: Import Duty, Excise Duty and VAT (Value Added Tax). VAT rate is at 16%, with some items being exempted or zero-rated.References(
29189502
Emil_Diesen
Emil Diesen (1880  1942) was a Norwegian writer.His largest work was Norsk industri- og nringshaandbok, a registry of several branches of Norwegian industry and business. It was released in several volumes between 1917 and 1921.(Entry for Norsk industri- og nringshaandbok in BIBSYS) A volume was dedicated to mechanical workshops, others to the finishing industry, paper industry, mining and metallurgic industry, timber industry, textile industry, sports equipment manufacturing, construction and food and beverage industry. There were also handbooks for the banking and insurance industries, and one volume covered the press and journalists in Norway at the time.(List of volumes of Norsk industri- og nringshaandbok in BIBSYS) He later issued several yearbooks of rates of the world, and his last books were about the banks of specific counties.(List of publications in BIBSYS)He was a son of captain Ernst Georg Diesen (18411908), brother of Melchior Seip Diesen, first cousin of Diesen, uncle of Diesen and granduncle of Diesen.()References
29198571
SANY_Group_Company_Ltd.
SANY Group Company Ltd. () is a heavy construction equipment manufacturer located in Changsha, Hunan, Peoples Republic of China. Founded in 1989, it is one of the largest heavy equipment manufacturers in China(http://www.cnccncmachines.com/articles/7035/1/Sany-Group-order-3000-ton-press-brake-from-LVD-HD/Sany-Group-order-3000-ton-press-brake-from-LVD-HD.html), and employs over 40,000 people worldwide(Corporate Overview).During the Copiap mining accident, a crane manufactured by SANY was instrumental in rescuing the Chilean miners.(http://blogs.wsj.com/chinarealtime/2011/03/22/china-concrete-pumper-gets-into-japannuclear-effort/?modWSJBlog&modchinablog)With Electric Power Company expressed its demand for a SANY SY5502THB pump, SANY presented a 62m pump ($1,000,000) to Electric Power Company to deal with the I nuclear accidents(http://news.xinhuanet.com/world/2011-03/19/c_121207301.htm)ExpansionsSany is investing 100 million in Bedburg, North-Rhine-Westphalia, Germany for a R&D and manufacturing base.(Sany Press Releas)On July 2011, Sany Heavy Industry Co. will build $200 million investment in Cikarang, Java, Indonesia on a 10-hectare plot for ASEAN market production base. The construction was expected to be completed in 2012.(http://www.thejakartapost.com/news/2011/04/26/sany-build-200m-plant-cikarang.html)References(External links* SANY Groupde:Sanyfr:SANYpt:Sanyzh:
29214813
Emmanuel_Solomon
Emmanuel Solomon (18001873) was a business man and parliamentarian, who was active and died in Australia.Solomon was born in London. He was convicted and transported to Australia for larceny, arriving at Sydney port on 1 May 1818 aboard the Lady Castlereagh.He entered into businesses and ventures concerning mining and property. Solomon became a representative for West Adelaide, as a member of the Australian House of Assembly (186265) and the Legislative Council (186771).He died on 3 October 1873.()Solomon is commemorated for the generosity he provided to MacKillop.()References
29235087
Alcasa
C.V.G. Aluminio del Caron S.A., known as Alcasa, is a state-owned aluminium producer in Venezuela. Founded in 1960, it began operations in 1967.(Alcasa, History of CVG Alcasa) It is part of the Venezolana de Guayana mining company, and one of the worlds largest aluminium producers. In 1999 it had around 9000 employees.( In 2005 the BBC reported that Alcasa had instituted a co-management initiative, with workers electing managers and participating in the budgeting process, as well as being involved in decisions on technical issues related to production.()The Venezuelan government had sought to privatize Alcasa in 1998,(Times, 10 July 1998, COMPANIES & FINANCE: THE AMERICAS: Aluminium sale priced at low end, Caracas admits: NEWS DIGEST) but the investors pulled out citing world market conditions.(Raymond Colitt, Times, 2 November 1999, COMMODITIES & AGRICULTURE: Venezuela in fresh approach to aluminium privatisation : After many setbacks the government wants to sell the industry in several blocks with different strategies)ReferencesExternal links* Alcasa
29248585
Lac-John,_Quebec
 footnotes            Lac-John is a First Nations reserve on John Lake in the Cte-Nord region of Quebec, Canada, about  north-east from the centre of Schefferville. Together with the Matimekosh Reserve, it belongs to the Innu Nation of Matimekush-Lac John.() It is geographically within the Caniapiscau Regional County Municipality but administratively not part of it.The reserve is named after the adjacent John Lake. That name was assigned by the Labrador Mining and Smelting Company, which used it on one of its geological maps a little before 1947.()HistoryThe region was the northern limit of the hunting and trapping grounds of the Innu indigenous people, but they never had resided there permanently. Because of mining development in the early 1950s, the Naskapi from Fort Chimo and a dozen Innu families from Maliotenam arrived at Schefferville to serve as guides for geological exploration work, and help on the railway construction from Sept-Iles.(()In 1957, the Schefferville municipal authorities moved the Innu and Naskapi to a site on John Lake, where they lived in poverty without sanitation, electricity, schools, or a medical facility. A year later, the site was surveyed for the creation of a reserve. On June 7, 1960, the Government of Qubec transferred  to the Government of Canada that then formed the Lac-John Reserve. The Innu and Naskapi initially lived in tiny shacks, but by 1962 Indian and Northern Affairs had built 30 houses for them.((Natural Resources Canada - Legal Surveys Division, Historical Review - Lac John land title history)Following the creation of the Matimekosh Reserve close to the towns centre in 1968, the municipality of Schefferville tried to annex the Lac-John Reserve. In 1972, most of the families on the Lac-John Reserve moved to Matimekosh, but a group of them decided to stay and new residences were built for them in 1975.(DemographicsPopulation trend:(Statistics Canada: 1996, 2001, 2006 census)* Population in 2006: 16 (2001 to 2006 population change: -30.4 %)* Population in 2001: 23* Population in 1996: 38Private dwellings occupied by usual residents: 9 (total dwellings: 12)Referencesfr:Lac-John
29272443
BHP_Billiton_Ravensthorpe_Nickel_Project
The BHP Billiton Ravensthorpe Nickel Project was a project to develop a nickel mine and processing facility 35 km east of the town of Ravensthorpe, approximately 540 km south east of Perth in Australia in combination with an expansion to Billitons existing Yabulu refinery in Queensland. The Project The project was for an open pit mine covering three adjacent ore bodies together with a beneficiation facility, acid pressure leach and hydrometallurgical processing plant to treat both saprolite and limonite ores.(THE RAVENSTHORPE NICKEL PROJECT AND THE EXPANSION THE YABULU REFINERY BHP Billiton briefing paper, published: March 2004, accessed: 25 October 2010) Production estimates were for up to 50,000 tonnes of contained nickel and 1,400 tonnes of contained cobalt. The processed ore was to be transported 155 km east to the deep-water port of Esperance where it would be shipped to BHP Billitons Yabulu refinery on a contract. QNI would market the finished nickel and cobalt products arising from the venture. There are three ore bodies at the site with a total proven reserve of 263.3 Mt at 0.65% nickel and 0.029% cobalt, with an estimated project life of 25 years. History of the project Joint ventureIn November 1999 QNI Pty Ltd a wholly owned subsidiary of Billiton entered into a joint venture agreement with Comet Resources NL. The first stage involved a A$10 million investment by QNI into a four month evaluation program, which included acquiring 12 per cent of Comet at an entry price of A$0.925 per share.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/investorsMedia/news/2000/qniElectsToProceedWithDevelopmentOfTheRavensthorpeNickelProjectWithCometResources.jsp) In April 2000 QNI elected to proceed with development of the project and to purchase a 40% joint venture interest from Comet Resources for A$36 million at the conclusion of the joint venture agreement, based on an agreed project value of A$90 million.(March 2001 QNI agreed with Comet to purchase the latters remaining 50 percent interest in the project at a cost of A$28 million plus the cancellation of its 19.9% interest in Comet.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/investorsMedia/news/2001/qniAcquiresRemaining50PerCentOfRavensthorpeNickelProject.jsp) In March 2004 BHP announced approval for the further development of the Ravensthorpe project which included development of the mine, treatment plan and other infrastructure. In addition expansion to the related Yabulu Refinery in Queensland was announced.  At that stage the capital cost for the combined projects was estimated at $US1.4 billion.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/investorsMedia/news/2004/bhpBillitonApprovesRavensthorpeYabuluIntegratedNickelProject.jsp)  Despite announcing development plans in March, by August 2001 BHP Billition extended the completion date for the study to November or December 2001. President Nickel Operation - Western Australia Ken Hellsten said the merger of BHP and Billiton had opened new opportunities for the project, including an atmospheric pressure leach process, adding that nickel laterite refining was very complex.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/investorsMedia/news/2001/ravensthorpeFeasibilityStudyExtended.jsp) By October the Western Australian state government had confirmed that it would provide funding for multi-user community infrastructure in relation to the mining and processing project.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/investorsMedia/news/2001/ravensthorpeNickelProjectReceivesStateFundingCommitment.jsp) Development In March 2004 BHP Billiton announced approval for the development for the Ravensthorp project and the extension of the Yabulu nickel refinery and confirmed the previous estimated capital cost of US$1.4 billion.( However it was flagged in their 2006 annual report that project was experiencing continued cost and scheduling pressures resulting from the heated market in Western Australia. Further it was disclosed that cost pressures would likely result in a capital cost increase of at least 30 per cent and that the company was reviewing the cost and delivery schedule.(BHP Annual Report 2006 http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bbContentRepository/bhpbarinfooncompany06.pdf) Following on from the guidance in their annual report BHP Billiton announced in November 2006 an appraisal of the capital costs of the project and increased the total budget to US$2.2 billion. In addition due to lower than expected labour productivity and late delivery of some material and equipment the target date for the first metal produced at Yabulu from Revensthorpe ore would be pushed back to the first quarter of 2008.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/investorsMedia/news/2006/bhpBillitonApprovesRevisedCostsForRavensthorpeNickelProject.jsp) However at the same time President of Stainless Steel Materials Jimmy Wilson acknowledged that that while the project had experienced increased capital costs it was still well positioned to deliver positive results. By this stage construction at Ravensthorpe and the Yabulu refinery expansion was approximately 73 and 87 per cent complete respectively.The bad news in relation to the project continued with the 2008 annual report attributing costs associated with the start-up operations at the two sites to an adverse impact on earnings of US$313 million. In November 2008 BHP Billiton announced after a review of the project a pre-tax impairment charge of approximately US$2.1 billion (US$1.5 billion post-tax) would be reflected in the groups half year results to 31 December 2008. The impairment was attributed to the significant deterioration in the nickel market, with a dramatic fall in demand together with changes in the rate of production at Ravensthorpe and the project sustaining capital expenditure.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/investorsMedia/news/2008/impairmentOfRavensthorpeAndYabuluNickelOperations.jsp) Closure On 21 January 2009 BHP Billiton announced it would immediately commence the ramp down and indefinite suspension of the Ravensthorpe nickel operation, the decision was attributed to reduced profitability prospects, significant and continuing deterioration in the outlook for the nickel market and the projected level of capital expenditure required in order to achieve and sustain projected production volumes at Revensthorpe(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bb/investorsMedia/news/2009/changesToBhpBillitonsNickelBusiness.jsp). An additional $US1.6 billion in write-downs and an associated half-year loss of $US233 million was also announced at the same time.(http://www.theage.com.au/business/jobs-go-as-bhp-cuts-wa-qld-operations-20090121-7m2q.html)Closing of the mining operations resulting in the loss of 800 permanent and 1000 contractor jobs, of which 350 were in the associated Yabulu nickel refinery in Queensland.( BHP Billiton gave as the reason for closure the diminished prospects for profitability(http://www.abc.net.au/news/stories/2009/01/21/2470779.htm). This was at a time when nickel prices had fallen to under US$11,000 per tonne from a high of US$50,000 per tonnne in May 2007.(http://www.perthnow.com.au/news/western-australia/bhp-mine-on-brink-of-closure/story-e6frg13u-1111118603590) The Western Australian State Government expected the closure would result in lost royalties of approximately $20 million per annum. The 2009 annual report disclosed that the total costs related to the closing of the Revensthorpe mine and suspension of shipments to Yabulu of US$3.6 billion with an offsetting US$1.1 billion in tax benefits related to the loss. In addition the mining operations made loss of $173 million.(http://www.bhpbilliton.com/bbContentRepository/docs/090812BhpBillitonPreliminaryResultsNewsRelease.pdf) Sale In December 2009 Canadian mining company Quantum Minerals announced they would purchase the operations from BHP Billiton for $US340 million.(Ravensthorpe nickel mine sale, Jade Macmillan http://www.abc.net.au/news/stories/2009/12/10/2767529.htm) First Quantum Minerals anticipated production of 39,000 tonnes per year in the first five years, with the creation of 600 jobs.  By the time BHP Billiton sold the project they had spent a total of $US3.6 billion on building and then abandoning the project. Project Partners Partners to the project included Comet Resources and Built Environs. See also * Billiton* nickel ore deposits References External links* BHP Billiton Nickel West website
29291154
Natashquan_River
 image_caption                The Natashquan (SVN mail from Gnome.org) is a river in the Canadian provinces of Quebec and and Labrador. It has its source just south of the boundary between the Atlantic and Saint Lawrence watersheds. It flows south-east to the LabradorQuebec border from where it flows southward. In Quebec, the river forms the boundary between the Minganie and Golfe-du-Saint-Laurent Regional County Municipalities before draining into the of Saint Lawrence, about  east from Sept-les. The name is of Innu origin, who call it Nutahquaniu Hipu, meaning river where black bear is hunted.()Together with the River, the Natashquan is one of the most renowned salmon rivers on the North Shore of the Gulf.()There are no bridges crossing the river, although one is being designed for the eastward extension of Route 138.(Genivar, Expertise/projects: Bridge over the Natashquan River, Construction of a bridge on Highway 138, Natashquan, Quebec)GeographyThe Natashquan River is entirely within the Grenville geologic province of the Shield, characterized by a hilly plateau, ranging in altitute from  to , and consisting of felsic and rock (such as gneiss, migmatite and granite), rock (quartzite) and schists in the lower portion, with a few intrusions of mafic rock (diorite and gabbro) in the central part. The river largely runs through narrow valleys, and is fed by about 30 tributaries, of which the most significant are in downstream order: the Lejamtel, Mercereau, Mahkunipiu, Mistanipisipou, East Natashquan, Pehatnaniskau, Dor, West Natashquan, and Akaku Rivers.(The last  of the river forms a large sandy estuary, separated from the gulf by Natashquan Point and Cape Tiennot. Sainte-Hlne Island (le Sainte-Hlne) is located at the very mouth of the river.The climate of the basin is subarctic continental, with a short growing season. The upper portion has a cold subhumid climate, whereas the lower part is humid.(HistoryIn 1534, Cartier sailed by the area and named Cape Thiennot after a ship captain that had settled at that location. The river was mapped in 1684 by Jolliet who called it Noutascoan. Bellin identified it as Grand R. Natachquoin on his map of 1744, while the 1776 map by Carver showed Great Natashkwen.(From as early as 1710, a trading post was established on the left (south) bank of the Natashquan River and later on the opposite bank (at the rivers mouth at present-day Natashquan FN Reserve) to conduct fur trade with the indigenous Innu people. The post was acquired by the Bay Company in the middle of the 19th century, but abandoned circa 1914 due to lack of profitability.()ConservationAn area of  is being considered for protection in a biodiversity reserve. The reserve, mostly within the Petit-Mcatina unorganized territory, will extend  along the Natashquan River southward from the LabradorQuebec border and also include  of the East Natashquan River.( Furthermore, some  is under study to be included in a new park, the Natashquan-Aguanus-Kenamu National Park.(Ministre du Dveloppement durable, de lEnvironnement et des Parcs, Quebec - Parc national Natashquan-Aguanus-Kenamu project)The landscape of proposed reserve is deemed to have great beauty, exceptional value, recognized heritage interest, and considerable cultural interest. Therefore, the reserve is meant to protect favourable salmon habitats, biodiversity of aquatic and riparian habitats, and old-growth forests. It will also manage sustainable harvesting of fur-bearing animals and develop tourism opportunities, while prohibiting mining, forestry, and hydro-electric development.(ReferencesExternal links* Geology of the Natashquan RiverNatashquan
29322067
Ardis_Furnace
 designated_other1_color  CornflowerBlueThe Ardis Furnace is an abandoned experimental furnace located at the northeast corner of Aragon and Antoine Streets (accessible from US-2) in Mountain, Michigan. The Ardis Furnace was designated a Michigan State Historic Site in 1971 and placed on the Register of Historic Places in 1972.(DescriptionThe furnace as originally built was a huge metal tube,  long and  in diameter, lined with firebrick and installed at a slight incline.  The tube was held in place by a series of concrete supports of graduated height.(  The tube was rotated with an electric motor, and refined iron was collected at the lower end of the tube.(However, after the project was abandoned the furnace fell into disrepair, and only the ruins of the concrete supports remain.(HistoryIn 1908, Iron Mountain resident John T. Jones built this experimental blast furnace to test the Step Furnace Process he developed to extract iron from low-grade ore.()  Jones named it the Ardis Furnace after his daughter.  The furnace was intended to produce a more nearly pure pig iron from the ore than is obtainable by the usual smelting process as practiced with less fuel usage,( and was described in Joness 1908 patent, nunmber 890,234, Method for treating iron ore.()The Ardis Furnace was initially a huge success, and Jones turned down multiple million-dollar offers for his patent.( Additional furnaces were built in Michigan and Michigan, with the belief that the on-site refining of ore would save tremendously in shipping costs.(However, after some time, problems began to surface.  The firebrick lining the iron tube was unable to withstand the heat of the reaction.(  Jones brought in consulting eingineers, and some improvements were made, but the fundamental heat problem was unsolved.  Jones poured more money into the project, but within two years had exhausted his personal fortune, losing everything including his house.(  The furnace was dismantled and sold for scrap,( and the project abandoned.(  Jones moved on to other mining projects as a consultant,( and although the Ardis Furnace was unsuccessful, elements of the technology were incorporated into later operations which successfully extracted iron from low-grade ore.(In the early 1970s, plans were made to demolish the remains of the Ardis Furnace.(  However, the local Menominee Range Historical Foundation petitioned to save the structure, and the Hanna Mining Company bought it and presented it to the Foundation.  The Ardis Furnace was placed on the Register of Historic Places in 1972.John T. JonesJohn Tyler Jones was born on September 14, 1847 in Pennsylvania, the son of Welsh Immigrant Thomas J. Jones and his wife Margaret Williams.()  At the age of 13, Jones began working with his father, and was soon a skilled mechanic and engine operator.  In 1870, he moved to Pennsylvania and set up the Keel Ridge Furnace,( and ran the operation for the next ten years.()  Through this time, iron was becoming increasingly scarce and the quality of the ore lower.  Jones experimented with several techniques, teaching himself chemistry along the way.(In 1881, Jones moved to Michigans Peninsula and assumed management of mines there for the Kimberly Company.  In 1883, he moved to Iron Mountain.(  He later started the Hamilton mine, prospected in America, and worked in other mines around the country.( His various endeavors made Jones wealthy.(  He built an impressive home on a 140-acre estate on the shore of Iron Mountains Lake Antoine, furnished with all modern improvements and conveniences.(  Perhaps the most interesting aspect of the home was the large attached greenhouse, constructed from the wheel made for the 1893 Chicago Exposition.(From written material posted at the Ardis Furnace site by the Menominee Range Historical Foundation.)()In 1870, Jones married Rachel Milligan of Pittsburg; the couple had seven children: Albert Graham, Elmer William, Caroline, Rachel A., Ruth, Arthur, and Leah Ardis.( After losing his fortune in the Ardis Furnace experiment, Jones moved in with his son and worked as a mining consultant.( Jones died in 1928 while visiting his sister in Pennsylvania.(References
29340413
West_Fleetham
West Fleetham is a small hamlet in Northumberland, England situated about 4 miles from Seahouses and 2 miles from the railway station.It originally had two working water mills fed by the Nanny stream these were fed by means of a sluices and a sluice gate the remnants of which can still be seen in the woods surrounding the stream.The sluice gate was unusual as it had fitted a water wheel that drove a generator which in turn fed power to the nearby house which also had a shed full of batteries to act as a store, the installation was made by the local garage owner (Mr Ord) whose wife still lived there until the 1970s.There is a quarry pond in the village that no one seems to know much about and was used at one time as a dump for rubbish and old cars and now is a popular wildlife habitat.To the North of the village is the disused Chathill to Seahouses Railway route marked by its cutting and bridge; this closed in 1951 when it became unprofitable.In the fields surrounding the village are signs or ancient agriculture from the standing stone to the ridged contours of the fields showing strip agriculture and the dark patches of old coal mining.
29360478
Cuencas_Mineras
 footnotes                File:Escucha - Cuencas Mineras - Teruel.jpg|thumb|left|View of Escucha in Cuencas MinerasCuencas Mineras is a comarca in Aragon, Spain. It is located in Province, in the mountainous area of the Ibrico.The administrative capital is Utrillas, with 3,346 inhabitants the largest town of the comarca, but the historical and cultural center is Montalbn.(Region of Cuencas Mineras) This comarca owes its name to certain mining zones in its area. Some municipal terms of Cuencas Mineras are part of the region of Aragon. The main mountain range in the area is de San Just.Municipal terms*Alcaine *Aliaga *Anadn *Blesa *del Olivar *de Cabra *de Aragn *de Almudn *Escucha *Fuenferrada *de Jarque *Hoz de la Vieja *del Comn *de la Val *Josa *Maicas *del Ro *de Jarque *Montalbn *Muniesa *Obn *de Arroyos *Plou *Salcedillo *de los Baos *de las Arcas *Utrillas *del Rebollar de la Sierra *del Ro Martn *Zoma   See also*AragonReferences(External links* Cuencas Mineras - Gran Enciclopedia Aragonesa* Comarcas de Aragn - Cuencas Mineras*Cuencas Mineras  - Tourism MenerasMinerasMinerasMineras de AragnMinerasMinerasMinerasru:-
29380512
Swedes
Swedes () are a Scandinavian nation and group native to Sweden, mostly inhabiting Sweden and the other countries, with descendants living in a number of countries.EtymologyMost scholars agree that Suiones and the attested Germanic forms of the name derive from the same Proto-Indo-European reflexive pronominal root, , as the Latin suus. The word must have meant ones own (tribesmen). In modern Scandinavian, the same root appears in words such as svger (brother-in-law) and svgerska (sister-in-law). The same root and original meaning is found in the ethnonym of the Germanic tribe Suebi, preserved to this day in the name Schwaben.(Noreen, A. Nordens ldsta folk- och ortnamn (i Fornvnnen 1920 sid 32).)( name  pokorny>Pokorny. Indogermanisches Etymologisches Woerterbuch. 1959)(Hellquist, Elof. 1922. Svensk etymologisk ordbok. Svear. http://runeberg.org/svetym/1003.html)(Bandle, Oskar. 2002.)HistoryOriginsFile:Scandinavia-12th century.png|left|thumb|200px|Sweden in the 9th century. Svealand in yellow, Gtaland in blue and Gotland in green.Sweden enters proto-history with the Germania of Tacitus in AD 98. In Germania 44, 45 he mentions the Swedes (Suiones) as a powerful tribe (distinguished not merely for their arms and men, but for their powerful fleets) with ships that had a prow in both ends (longships). Which kings (kuningaz) ruled these Suiones is unknown, but mythology presents a long line of legendary and semi-legendary kings going back to the last centuries BC. As for literacy in Sweden itself, the runic script was in use among the south Scandinavian elite by at least the 2nd century AD, but all that has come down to the present from the Roman Period is curt inscriptions on artefacts, mainly of male names, demonstrating that the people of south Scandinavia spoke Proto-Norse at the time, a language ancestral to Swedish and other Germanic languages.In the 6th century Jordanes named two tribes he calls the Suehans and the Suetidi who lived in Scandza. These two names are both considered to refer to the same tribe. The Suehans, he says, has very fine horses just as the Thyringi tribe (alia vero gens ibi moratur Suehans, quae velud Thyringi equis utuntur eximiis). Sturluson wrote that the contemporary Swedish king Adils (Eadgils) had the finest horses of his days. The Suehans were the suppliers of black fox skins for the Roman market. Then Jordanes names the Suetidi which is considered to be the Latin form of Svitjod. He writes that the Suetidi are the tallest of men together with the Dani who were of the same stock. Later he mentions other Scandinavian tribes for being of the same height.Originating in semi-legendary Scandza, believed to be somewhere in modern Gtaland, Sweden, a Gothic population had crossed the Sea before the 2nd century AD, reaching Scythia at the coast of the Sea in modern Ukraine where Goths left their archaeological traces in the culture. In the 5th and 6th centuries, they became divided as the Visigoths and the Ostrogoths, and established powerful successor-states of the Empire in the peninsula and Italy.(Goth (people). Britannica Online Encyclopedia.) Gothic communities appear to have survived intact in Crimea until the late 18th century.(Ingemar Nordgren (2004). The Well Spring of the Goths: About the Gothic Peoples in the Nordic Countries and on the Continent. iUniverse. p. 520 ISBN 0595336485)Viking and Middle AgesFile:Eric the victorious.jpg|thumb|left|the Victorious praying to Odin, Eric was the first king to rule over both the Swedes and the Goths.The Swedish Age lasted roughly between the 8th and 11th centuries. During this period, it is believed that the Swedes expanded from eastern Sweden and incorporated the Geats to the south.(The Columbia Encyclopedia, Sixth Edition. 200105) It is believed that Swedish Vikings and Gutar mainly travelled east and south, going to Finland, the Baltic countries, Russia, Belarus, Ukraine the Sea and further as far as Baghdad. Their routes passed through the Dnieper down south to Constantinople, on which they did numerous raids. The Emperor Theophilos noticed their great skills in war and invited them to serve as his personal bodyguard, known as the guard. The Swedish Vikings, called Rus are also believed to be the founding fathers of Rus. The Arabic traveller Fadlan described these Vikings as following:  The adventures of these Swedish Vikings are commemorated on many runestones in Sweden, such as the Runestones and the Runestones. There was also considerable participation in expeditions westwards, which are commorated on stones such as the Runestones. The last major Swedish Viking expedition appears to have been the ill-fated expedition of the Far-Travelled to Serkland, the region south-east of the Sea. Its members are commemorated on the Runestones, none of which mentions any survivor. What happened to the crew is unknown, but it is believed that they died of sickness.;The Kingdom of SwedenIt is not known when and how the kingdom of Sweden was born, but the of Swedish monarchs is drawn from the first kings who ruled both Svealand (Sweden) and Gtaland (Gothia) as one province with Erik the Victorious. Sweden and Gothia were two separate nations long before that into antiquity. It is not known how long they existed, Beowulf described semi-legendary wars in the 6th century.;Cultural advancesDuring the early stages of the Scandinavian Viking Age, Ystad in Scania and Paviken on Gotland, in present-day Sweden, were flourishing trade centres. Remains of what is believed to have been a large market have been found in Ystad dating from 600700 AD.( In Paviken, an important centre of trade in the Baltic region during the 9th and 10th century, remains have been found of a large Viking Age harbour with shipbuilding yards and handicraft industries. Between 800 and 1000, trade brought an abundance of silver to Gotland, and according to some scholars, the Gotlanders of this era hoarded more silver than the rest of the population of Scandinavia combined.(Sawyer, Birgit and Peter Sawyer (1993). Medieval Scandinavia: from Conversion to Reformation, Circa 8001500. University of Minnesota Press, 1993. ISBN 0-8166-1739-2, pp. 150153.)Ansgar is usually credited for introducing Christianity in 829, but the new religion did not begin to fully replace paganism until the 12th century. During the 11th century, Christianity became the most prevalent religion, and from 1050 Sweden is counted as a Christian nation. The period between 1100 and 1400 was characterized by internal power struggles and competition among the Nordic kingdoms. Swedish kings also began to expand the Swedish-controlled territory in Finland, creating conflicts with the Rus who no longer had any connection with Sweden.(Bagge, Sverre (2005) The Scandinavian Kingdoms. In The New Cambridge Medieval History. Eds. Rosamond McKitterick et al. Cambridge University Press, 2005. ISBN 0-521-36289-X, p. 724: Swedish expansion in Finland led to conflicts with Rus, which were temporarily brought to an end by a peace treaty in 1323, dividing the Karelian peninsula and the northern areas between the two countries.);Feudal institutions in SwedenExcept for the province of Skane, on the southern most tip of Sweden which was under Danish control during this time, feudalism never developed in Sweden as it did in the rest of Europe.(Franklin D. Scott, Sweden: The Nations History (University of Minnesota Press: Minneapolis, 1977) p. 58.) Therefore, the peasantry remained largely a class of free farmers throughout most of Swedish history. Slavery (also called thralldom) was not common in Sweden,(Trldom. Nordisk familjebok / Uggleupplagan. 30. Tromsdalstind  Urakami /159160, 1920. (In Swedish)) and what slavery there was tended to be driven out of existence by the spread of Christianity, the difficulty in obtaining slaves from the lands east of the Baltic Sea, and by the development of cities before the 16th century(Scott, p. 55.) Indeed, both slavery and serfdom were abolished altogether by a decree of King Magnus Erickson in 1335. Former slaves tended to be absorbed into the peasantry and some became laborers in the towns. Still, Sweden remained a poor and economically backward country in which barter was the means of exchange. For instance, the farmers of the province of Dalsland would transport their butter to the mining districts of Sweden and exchange it there for iron, which they would then take down to the coast and trade the iron for fish they needed for food while the iron would be shipped abroad.(Scott, pp. 5556.)File:Gustav Vasa i Mora.jpeg|right|thumb|Vasa starts a revolution in Dalarna. After the War of Liberation Sweden is a free nation in 1523 after 126 years of the Danish-dominated Union.;The Plague in SwedenIn the 14th century, Sweden was struck by the Death. The population of Sweden was decimated.(Scott, pp. 5657.) During this period the Swedish cities also began to acquire greater rights and were strongly influenced by German merchants of the League, active especially at Visby. In 1319, Sweden and Norway were united under King Magnus Eriksson, and in 1397 Queen I of Denmark effected the personal union of Sweden, Norway, and Denmark through the Union. However, Margarets successors, whose rule was also centred in Denmark, were unable to control the Swedish nobility.;Minors and RegentsA large number of children inherited the Swedish crown over the course of the kingdoms existence, consequentlyreal power was held for long periods by regents (notably those of the Sture family) chosen by the Swedish parliament. King II of Denmark, who asserted his claim to Sweden by force of arms, ordered a massacre in 1520 of Swedish nobles at Stockholm. This came to be known as the blood bath and stirred the Swedish nobility to new resistance and, on 6 June (now Swedens national holiday) in 1523, they made Vasa their king.(Scott, p. 121.) This is sometimes considered as the of modern Sweden. Shortly afterwards he rejected Catholicism and led Sweden into the Reformation. Economically, Gustav Vasa broke the monopoly of the Hanseatic League over Swedish Baltic Sea trade.(Scott, p. 132.)The Hanseatic League had been officially formed at Lbeck on the sea coast of Northern Germany in 1356. The Hanseatic League sought civil and commercial privileges from the princes and royalty of the countries and cities along the coasts of the Baltic Sea.(Robert S. Hoyt & Stanley Chodorow, Europe in the Middle Ages (Harcourt, Brace & Jovanovich, Inc.: New York, 1976) p. 628.) In exchange they offered a certain amount of protection. Having their own navy the Hansa were able to sweep the Baltic Sea free of pirates.(John B. Wolfe, The Emergence of European Civilization (Harper & Row Pub.: New York, 1962) pp. 5051.) The privileges obtained by the Hansa included assurances that only Hansa citizens would be allowed to trade from the ports where they were located. They also sought agreement to be free of all customs and taxes. With these concessions, Lbeck merchants flocked to Stockholm, Sweden and soon came to dominate the economic life of that city and made the port city of Stockholm into the leading commercial and industrial city of Sweden.(Scott, p. 52.) Under the Hanseatic trade 2/3 of Stockholms imports consisted of textiles and 1/3 of salt. Exports from Sweden consisted of iron and copper.(Scott)However, the Swedes began to resent the monopoly trading position of the Hansa (mostly German citizens) and to resent the income they felt they lost to the Hansa. Consequently, when Gustav Vasa or I broke the monopoly power of the Hanseatic League he was regarded as a hero to the Swedish people. History now views Gustav I as the father of the modern Swedish nation. The foundations laid by Gustave would take time to develop. Furthermore, when Sweden did develop, freed itself from the Hanseatic League and entered its golden era, the fact the peasantry had traditionally been free meant that more of the economic benefits flowed back to them rather than going to a feudal landowning class.(Scott, pp. 156157.) This was not the case in other countries of Europe like Poland were the peasantry was still bound by serfdom and a strong feudalistic land owning system.Swedish EmpireFile:Swedish Empire in Early Modern Europe (1560-1815).png|thumb|upright|The Empire between 1560 and 1815During the 17th century Sweden emerged as a European great power. Before the emergence of the Swedish Empire, Sweden was a very poor and scarcely populated country on the fringe of European civilization, with no significant power or reputation. Sweden rose to prominence on a continental scale during the tenure of king Gustavus Adolphus, seizing territories from Russia and PolandLithuania in multiple conflicts, including the Years War.During the Thirty Years War, Sweden conquered approximately half of the Holy Roman states. Gustav Adolphus planned to become the new Roman Emperor, ruling over a united Scandinavia and the Holy Roman states, but he died at the Battle of Ltzen in 1632. After the Battle of Nrdlingen, Swedens only significant military defeat of the war, pro-Swedish sentiment among the German states faded. These German provinces excluded themselves from Swedish power one by one, leaving Sweden with only a few northern German territories: Pomerania, Bremen-Verden and Wismar. The Swedish armies may have destroyed up to 2,000 castles, 18,000 villages and 1,500 towns in Germany, one-third of all German towns.()In the middle of the 17th century Sweden was the third largest country in Europe by land area, only surpassed by Russia and Spain. Sweden reached its largest territorial extent under the rule of Charles X after the of Roskilde in 1658.( A Political and Social History of Modern Europe V.1./Hayes... Hayes, Carlton J. H. (18821964), Title: A Political and Social History of Modern Europe V.1., 2002-12-08, Project Gutenberg, webpage: Infomot-7hsr110.)(However, Swedens largest territorial extent lasted from 1319 to 1343 with Magnus Eriksson ruling all of the traditional lands of Sweden and Norway.)The foundation of Swedens success during this period is credited to Is major changes on the Swedish economy in the 16th century, and his introduction of Protestantism.( Gustav I Vasa  Britannica Concise (biography), Britannica Concise, 2007, webpage: EBConcise-Gustav-I-Vasa.) In the 17th century, Sweden was engaged in many wars, for example with the Commonwealth with both sides competing for territories of todays states, with the disastrous of Kircholm being one of the highlights.() One-third of the Finnish population died in the devastating famine that struck the country in 1696.(Finland and the Swedish Empire. Source: U.S. Library of Congress) Famine also hit Sweden,(Agricultural Yields and Years of Famine  Sweden. Hans Hgman.) killing roughly 10% of Swedens population.(Elizabeth Ewan, Janay Nugent (2008) Finding the family in medieval and early modern Scotland. Publishing. p. 153 ISBN 0-7546-6049-4)The Swedes conducted a series of invasions into the Commonwealth, known as the Deluge. After more than half a century of almost constant warfare, the Swedish economy had deteriorated. It became the lifetime task of Charles son, Charles XI, to rebuild the economy and refit the army. His legacy to his son, the coming ruler of Sweden Charles XII, was one of the finest arsenals in the world, a large standing army and a great fleet. Swedens largest threat at this time, Russia, had a larger army but was far behind in both equipment and training.File:Battle of Lutzen.jpg|thumb|Death of II Adolf at the Battle of LtzenAfter the Battle of Narva in 1700, one of the first battles of the Northern War, the Russian army was so severely decimated that Sweden had an open chance to invade Russia. However, Charles did not pursue the Russian army, instead turning against Poland-Lithuania and defeating the Polish king II and his Saxon allies at the of Kliszow in 1702. This gave Russia time to rebuild and modernize its army.After the success of invading Poland, Charles decided to make an invasion attempt of Russia which ended in a decisive Russian victory at the of Poltava in 1709. After a long march exposed to cossack raids, Russian Tsar the Greats scorched-earth techniques and the cold Russian climate, the Swedes stood weakened with a shattered morale and enormously outnumbered against the Russian army at Poltava. The defeat meant the beginning of the end for the Swedish Empire.File:Martens Poltava.jpg|thumb|left|The of Poltava in 1709. In the years following Poltava, Russia occupied all the Swedish annexations on the Baltic coast and even Finland.Charles XII attempted to invade Norway 1716; however, he was shot dead at  Fredriksten fortress in 1718. The Swedes were not militarily defeated at Fredriksten, but the whole structure and organization of the Norwegian campaign fell apart with the kings death, and the army withdrew.Forced to cede large areas of land in the of Nystad in 1721, Sweden also lost its place as an empire and as the dominant state on the Baltic Sea. With Swedens lost influence, Russia emerged as an empire and became one of Europes dominant nations. As the war finally ended in 1721, Sweden had lost an estimated 200,000 men, 150,000 of those from the area of present-day Sweden and 50,000 from the Finnish part of Sweden.(Losses statistics at Militaria. (Swedish))In the 18th century, Sweden did not have enough resources to maintain its territories outside Scandinavia, and most of them were lost, culminating with the 1809 loss of eastern Sweden to Russia which became the highly autonomous Grand Principality of Finland in Russia.In interest of reestablishing Swedish dominance in the Baltic Sea, Sweden allied itself against its traditional ally and benefactor, France, in the Wars. Swedens role in the of Leipzig gave it the authority to force Denmark-Norway, an ally of France, to cede Norway to the King of Sweden on 14 January 1814 in exchange for northern German provinces, at the of Kiel. The Norwegian attempts to keep their status as a sovereign state were rejected by the Swedish king, XIII. He launched a military campaign against Norway on 27 July 1814, ending in the of Moss, which forced Norway into a personal union with Sweden under the Swedish crown, which lasted until 1905. The 1814 campaign was the last war in which Sweden participated as a combatant. Swedish troops partake in peace-keeping missions and currently have forces deployed in Afghanistan and Kosovo.Modern historyFile:Farewell to home, Gteborg, 1905.jpg|thumb|upright|Swedish emigrants boarding ship in Gothenburg in 1905There was a significant population increase during the 18th and 19th centuries, which the writer Tegnr in 1833 attributed to the peace, the (smallpox) vaccine, and the potatoes.() Between 1750 and 1850, the population in Sweden doubled. According to some scholars, mass emigration to America became the only way to prevent famine and rebellion; over 1% of the population emigrated annually during the 1880s.( Einhorn, Eric and John Logue (1989). Modern Welfare States: Politics and Policies in Social Democratic Scandinavia. Praeger Publishers, p. 9: Though Denmark, where industrialization had begun in the 1850s, was reasonably prosperous by the end of the nineteenth century, both Sweden and Norway were terribly poor. Only the safety valve of mass emigration to America prevented famine and rebellion. At the peak of emigration in the 1880s, over 1% of the total population of both countries emigrated annually.)Nevertheless, Sweden remained poor, retaining a nearly entirely agricultural economy even as Denmark and Western European countries began to industrialize.((Koblik, Steven (1975). Swedens Development from Poverty to Affluence 17501970, University of Minnesota Press, pp. 89, In economic and social terms the eighteenth century was more a transitional than a revolutionary period. Sweden was, in light of contemporary Western European standards, a relatively poor but stable country. ... It has been estimated that 7580% of the population was involved in agricultural pursuits during the late eighteenth century. One hundred years later, the corresponding figure was still 72%.)Many looked towards America for a better life during this time. It is believed that between 1850 and 1910 more than one million Swedes moved to the United States.(Einhorn, Eric and John Logue (1989), p. 8.)In the early 20th century, more Swedes lived in Chicago than in Gothenburg (Swedens second largest city).(Ulf Beijbom, European emigration, The House of Emigrants, Vxj, Sweden.) Most Swedish immigrants moved to the United States, with a large population in Minnesota, with a few others moving to other parts of the United States and Canada.Despite the slow rate of industrialization into the 19th century, many important changes were taking place in the agrarian economy because of innovations and the large population growth.(Koblik, pp. 910.) These innovations included government-sponsored programs of enclosure, aggressive exploitation of agricultural lands, and the introduction of new crops such as the potato.( Because the Swedish peasantry had never been enserfed as elsewhere in Europe,(Sweden: Social and economic conditions (2007). In Encyclopdia Britannica. Encyclopdia Britannica Online. Retrieved 19 February 2007.) the Swedish farming culture began to take on a critical role in the Swedish political process, which has continued through modern times with modern Agrarian party (now called the Centre Party).(Koblik, p. 11: The agrarian revolution in Sweden is of fundamental importance for Swedens modern development. Throughout Swedish history the countryside has taken an unusually important role in comparison with other European states.) Between 1870 and 1914, Sweden began developing the industrialized economy that exists today.(Koblik, p. 90. It is usually suggested that between 1870 and 1914 Sweden emerged from its primarily agrarian economic system into a modern industrial economy.)Strong grassroots movements sprung up in Sweden during the latter half of the 19th century (unions, temperance groups, and independent religious groups), creating a strong foundation of democratic principles. In 1889 The Swedish Social Democratic Party was founded. These movements precipitated Swedens migration into a modern parliamentary democracy, achieved by the time of World War I. As the Revolution progressed during the 20th century, people gradually began moving into cities to work in factories and became involved in socialist unions. A communist revolution was avoided in 1917, following the re-introduction of parliamentarism, and the country was democratized.World WarsSweden remained officially neutral during World War I and World War II, although its neutrality during World War II has been disputed.(Koblik, pp. 303313.)(Nordstrom, p. 315: Swedens government attempted to maintain at least a semblance of neutrality while it bent to the demands of the prevailing side in the struggle. Although effective in preserving the countrys sovereignty, this approach generated criticism at home from many who believed the threat to Sweden was less serious than the government claimed, problems with the warring powers, ill feelings among its neighbours, and frequent criticism in the postwar period.) Sweden was under German influence for much of the war, as ties to the rest of the world were cut off through blockades.( The Swedish government felt that it was in no position to openly contest Germany,( and therefore made some concessions.() Sweden also supplied steel and machined parts to Germany throughout the war. However, Sweden supported Norwegian resistance, and in 1943 helped rescue Danish Jews from deportation to camps. Sweden also supported Finland in the War and the War with volunteers and materiel.Toward the end of the war, Sweden began to play a role in humanitarian efforts and many refugees, among them many Jews from Nazi-occupied Europe, were saved partly because of the Swedish involvement in rescue missions at the internment camps and partly because Sweden served as a haven for refugees, primarily from the countries and the states.( Nevertheless, internal and external critics have argued that Sweden could have done more to resist the Nazi war effort, even if risking occupation.(Nordstrom, pp. 313319.)Post-war eraSweden was officially a neutral country and remained outside NATO or pact membership during the cold war, but privately Swedens leadership had strong ties with the United States and other western governments.Following the war, Sweden took advantage of an intact industrial base, social stability and its natural resources to expand its industry to supply the rebuilding of Europe.(Nordstrom, pp. 335339.) Sweden was part of the Plan and participated in the Organization of Economic Co-operation and Development (OECD). During most of the post-war era, the country was governed by the Social Democratic Party largely in cooperation with trade unions and industry. The government actively pursued an internationally competitive manufacturing sector of primarily large corporations.(Sweden, like countries around the globe, entered a period of economic decline and upheaval, following the oil embargoes of 197374 and 197879.(Nordstrom, p. 344: During the last twenty-five years of the century a host of problems plagued the economies of Norden and the West. Although many were present before, the 1973 and 1980 global oil crises acted as catalysts in bringing them to the fore.) In the 1980s pillars of Swedish industry were massively restructured. Shipbuilding was discontinued, wood pulp was integrated into modernized paper production, the steel industry was concentrated and specialized, and mechanical engineering was robotized.(Krantz, Olle and Lennart Schn. 2007. Swedish Historical National Accounts, 18002000. Lund: Almqvist and Wiksell International.)Between 1970 and 1990 the overall tax burden rose by over 10%, and the growth was low compared to other countries in Western Europe. The marginal income tax for workers reached over 80%. Eventually government spent over half of the countrys domestic product. Sweden GDP per capita ranking declined during this time.(Globalization and Taxation: Challenges to the Swedish Welfare State. By Sven Steinmo.)Recent historyFile:Tratado de Lisboa 13 12 2007 (081).jpg||thumb|right|Sweden joined the European Union in 1995 and signed the Treaty in 2007.A bursting estate bubble caused by inadequate controls on lending combined with an international recession and a policy switch from anti-unemployment policies to anti-inflationary policies resulted in a fiscal crisis in the early 1990s.(Englund, P. 1990. Financial deregulation in Sweden. European Economic Review 34 (23): 385393. Korpi TBD. Meidner, R. 1997. The Swedish model in an era of mass unemployment. Economic and Industrial Democracy 18 (1): 8797. Olsen, Gregg M. 1999. Half empty or half full? The Swedish welfare state in transition. Canadian Review of Sociology & Anthropology, 36 (2): 241268.) Swedens GDP declined by around 5%. In 1992, there was a run on the currency, with the central bank briefly jacking up interest to 500%.()()The response of the government was to cut spending and institute a multitude of reforms to improve Swedens competitiveness, among them reducing the state and privatising public services and goods. Much of the political establishment promoted EU membership, and the Swedish referendum passed with 52% in favour of joining the EU on 13 November 1994. Sweden joined the Union on 1 January 1995.Sweden remains non-aligned militarily, although it participates in some joint military exercises with NATO and some other countries, in addition to extensive cooperation with other European countries in the area of defence technology and defence industry. Among others, Swedish companies export weapons that are used by the American military in Iraq.() Sweden also has a long history of participating in international military operations, including most recently, Afghanistan, where Swedish troops are under NATO command, and in EU sponsored peacekeeping operations in UN protectorate Kosovo, and Herzegovina, and Cyprus. Sweden held the chair of the Union from 1 July to 31 December 2009.Language240px|thumb|right|West Germanic languagesNorth Germanic languagesThe native language of the Swedes in Swedish () a North Germanic language, spoken by approximately 10 million people,( gives the number of 8,789,835, but is based on data from 1986. Sweden has currently a population of 9.2 Mio (2008 census), and there are about 290,000 native speakers of Swedish in Finland , based on data from 2007), leading to an estimate of about 9 to 10 Mio.) predominantly in Sweden and parts of Finland, especially along its coast and on the land islands. It is, to a considerable extent, mutually intelligible with Norwegian and to a lesser extent with Danish (see especially Classification).  Along with the other North Germanic languages, Swedish is a descendant of Norse, the common language of the peoples living in Scandinavia during the Viking Era. It is currently the largest of the North Germanic languages by numbers of speakers.Swedish, used by most people, is the national language that evolved from the Central Swedish dialects in the 19th century and was well established by the beginning of the 20th century. While distinct regional varieties descended from the older rural dialects still exist, the spoken and language is uniform and standardized. Some dialects differ considerably from the standard language in grammar and vocabulary and are not always mutually intelligible with Standard Swedish. These dialects are confined to rural areas and are spoken primarily by small numbers of people with low mobility. Though not facing imminent extinction, such dialects have been in decline during the past century, despite the fact that they are well researched and their use is often encouraged by local authorities.GeneticsAccording to recent genetic analysis, both mtDNA and Y chromosome polymorphisms showed a noticeable affinity between Swedes and other Germanic ethnic groups.(http://hpgl.stanford.edu/publications/EJHG_2002_v10_521-529.pdf) For the global genetic make-up of the Swedish people and other peoples (see also (scs.uiuc.edu) and (nationalgeographic.com)).In Patrilineage through the Y haplogroups of their DNA , the Swedes are most diverse and strongly of Haplogroup I1d1 in over 40% of the population tested in different studies,followed by R1a1a and R1b1a2a1a1 with over 20% each one and haplogroup N1c1 with over 5% at different regional variance. The rest are among haplogroups J and E1b1b1 and other less common ones.(http://www.scs.uiuc.edu/~mcdonald/WorldHaplogroupsMaps.pdf)Among Mitochondrial haplogroups the Swedes are in matrilineagestrongly of haplogroup H in a 25-30%,followed by haplogroup U at a 10% or more,with haplogroup J and T, K at around 5% each one.Another detailed nuclear genetic study has also implied that Swedes largely share genetics with Finns.(The similarity between Finns and Swedes in allele and haplotype frequencies indicates that these two populations may be descended from the same central European source populationas has been suggested by Sajantila and Pbo (1995) http://www.ajhg.org/AJHG/fulltext/S0002-9297(07)60270-5)Geographic distributionThe largest area inhabited by Swedes, as well as the earliest known original area inhabited by their linguistic ancestors, is in the country of Sweden, situated on the eastern side of the Peninsula and the islands adjacent to it, situated west of the Sea in Europe. The Swedish-speaking people living in near-coastal areas on the north-eastern and eastern side of the Baltic Sea also have a long history of continuous settlement, which in some of these areas possibly started about a millennium ago. These people include the Swedish-speakers in Finland  speaking Swedish dialect commonly referred as Swedish (finlandssvenska which is part of East-Swedish dialect group) and the almost exclusively Swedish-speaking population of the Islands speaking in a manner closer to the adjacent dialects in Sweden than to adjacent dialects of Finland Swedish. Estonia also had an important Swedish minority until the 20th century. Smaller groups of historical descendants of 18th20th-century Swedish emigrants who still retain varying aspects of Swedish identity to this day can be found in the Americas (especially Minnesota and Wisconsin, see Americans) and in Ukraine.Currently, Swedes tend to emigrate mostly to the Nordic neighbour countries (Norway, Denmark, Finland), English speaking countries (USA, UK), Spain and Germany.(Flest svenskar tros bo i USA, Norge och Finland. Drefter fljer Danmark, Storbritannien, Spanien och Tyskland.)Historically, the Kingdom of Sweden has been much larger than nowadays, especially during The Era of Great Power (Empire) in 16111718. Finland belonged to Sweden until 1809. Since there was no separate Finnish nationality at those times, it is not unusual that sources predating 1809 refer both to Swedes and Finns as Swedes. This is particularly the case with Sweden, where some of the Swedish settlers were of Finnish origin.CultureCuisineSwedish food has traditionally been practical and sustaining. A typical old fashioned meal consists of boiled potatoes, some kind of meat or fish, a sauce and some vegetables. Fish has historically been very important. Swedes are among the heaviest coffee drinkers in the world, second only to Finland. Brewed coffee is dominant. For meals cider, beer, milk, juice, or water is standard. Swedish cider is sweeter and more fruity than foreign ciders, and is enjoyed in almost as large quantities as beer is.FilmSwedish cinema is one of the most widely-known national film industries in the world. The silent period saw the flourish of the gifted visionaries Stiller and Sjstrm, who brought international attention to Swedish filmmaking and its particular vision of the world.Bergman, regarded as one of the most influential filmmakers of the 20th Century, emerged as a prominent figure in world cinema during the 1950s with his existential epic Seventh Seal, which he followed with a host of critically revered psychological dramas. Two of his films in particular, Persona and and Whispers, received unparalleled critical adoration and put Sweden in the map as a one of the most progressive cinematic entities. The revered naturalist Troell as well as the socially conscious Widerberg would quickly follow Bergman as the countrys foremost visual artists.Famous actresses and actors include Bergman, Garbo, von Sydow, Skarsgrd, Skarsgrd, Thulin, Olin, Lundgren and Stormare.MusicFile:Abba 28011977 15 200.jpg|right|upright|thumb|Fltskog at the opening concert of ABBAs European & Australian Tour in Oslo, 28 January 1977.Singing is popular in Sweden, and of its 9,000,000 inhabitants, 600,000 belong to various choirs. (http://www.sweden.se/templates/cs/FactSheet____11973.aspx)Three of the worlds leading songwriters, Elofsson, Martin and RedOne live in Sweden.In popular music, the group ABBA became the essence of Swedish music during the 1970s and early 1980s. Later Roxette emerged, mostly performing joyful songs in the late 1980s and early 1990s. This band was also successful in the USA. Europe, of Base and Cardigans are Swedish pop groups that have been popular in the world.It can be noted that Spears had at least one of her early albums produced in Sweden, and so did Jovi and the Boys.Indie pop/rock is very big in Sweden. Especially Gothenburg has spawned a great deal of prominent bands and artists thanks to labels such as Sincerely Yours, Service and Luxury. Notable Swedish indie bands and artists include Lekman, Knife, Is All, Concretes, Daniel, Tough Alliance, Bjorn and John, Ray, Popsicle, Studio, The Embassy, Honeydrips, Brainpool, Air France, jj, Alme, Pacific! etc.In contrast to the large pop music scene in Sweden, they also boast one of the most prolific metal scenes in the world.  Gothenburg is famed in the scene for the death metal sound.  Many of these bands such as Flames, Tranquillity, the Gates, Haunted, as well as Stockholms Amarth and Opeth have seen growing commercial success throughout Europe and the United States. Melodic death metal is quite a broad genre with many variations, but with its more obvious roots in traditional death metal, metal and metal such as Maiden. Still, many bands are influenced by genres as broad as Swedish music, music, electronica, music, progressive music and even music.  Sweden is known for in the extreme metal community for its famous late 80s-early 90s death metal scene, spawning important bands as Entombed, Dismember, Grave and Unleashed as well as more obscure, brutal bands as God Macabre, Obscurity, Treblinka (later Tiamat) and Grotesque. Highly influential band Bathory also had a huge impact on the then-to-come black metal scene of Norway and the 1990s with albums Bathory (1984), The Return (1985), and Under the Sign of the Black Mark (1987), as well as being the first Viking Metal band.There is a notable hip hop scene. This culture has spawned a new sociolect/dialect (see Swedish), so named after the Rinkeby suburb).Sweden has produced several notable opera singers. In the 1850s, Lind (a.k.a. the Swedish Nightingale) toured the United States, and the price of admission for her performances was at a rate never before seen. In the 1950s, Bjrling was one of few non-Italian opera singers, and he is to this day a household name in opera circles.Other Swedish bands and artists that seem to manage the international crowd better than others are Ark, Dungen, Gonzlez,  Diao, Sounds, Hives, Neverstore, Hotnights, Robyn, Tages, Mascots, Shanes etc. However, there are a lot of other bands and artists that dominate the national music scene, such as Kent, Hellstrm and Winnerbck.Literatureliterature is vibrant and active. Sweden ranks joint fifth in the list of countries with most Prize laureates in literature. Famous Swedish writers and poets are Lindgren, Lagerlf, Strindberg, Sderberg, Transtrmer, Boye, Larsson etc.ArchitectureImage:Oxie kyrka.jpg|left|thumb|Medieval countyside church in Oxie, Scania with the typical stair-like gables.Before the 13th century most buildings were made of brick, but a shift began towards stone. Early Swedish stone buildings are the Romanesque churches on the country side. As so happens, many of them were built in Scania and are in effect Danish churches. This would include the magnificent Cathedral from the 11th century and the somewhat younger church in Dalby, but also many early Gothic churches built through influendes of the League, such as in Ystad, Malm and Helsingborg.Cathedrals in other parts of Sweden were also built as seats of Swedens bishops. The Cathedral is of bricks from the 14th century, and the Cathedral in the 15th. In 1230 the foundations of the Linkping Cathedral were made, the material was there limestone, but the building took some 250 years to finish.Among older structures are also some significant fortresses and other historical buildings such asat  Castle, Manor and Eketorp fortress on the island land, the Nykping fortress and the Visby ring wall.Image:Kalmar Castle.jpg|right|150px|thumb|The Castle.Around 1520 Sweden was out of the Ages and united under King Vasa, who immediately initiated grand mansions, castles and fortresses to be built. Some of the more magnificent include the Kalmar fortress, the Castle and the one at Vadstena.In the next two centuries, Sweden was designated by architecture and later the rococo. Notable projects from that time include the city Karlskrona, which has now also been declared a World Heritage Site and the Palace.1930 was the year of the great Stockholm exhibition, which marked the breakthrough of Functionalism, or funkis as it became known. The style came to dominate in the following decades. Some notables projects of this kind were the Million Programme, offering affordable but anti-human living in large apartment complexes.ClothingCurrent clothing is very internationally influenced, but traditional Swedish costumes are sometimes used on special occasions, such as Midsummer.Sweden has in late years taken an interest in the fashion industry, through headquartering famous brands like Hennes & Mauritz (operating as H&M), Lindeberg (operating as JL), Gina Tricot, of Sweden, Jeans and K within its borders. These companies, however, are largely made up of buyers who import fashionable goods from throughout Europe and the Americas, continuing the trend of Swedish business toward multinational economic dependency like many of its neighbours.A new breed of smaller w Swedish fashion labels like Orving, Last Season, molly, WESC, Whyred, Hope, Nakkna, Velour, Wester, Sjstedt, Unwind Clothing, Avenue Shoe Repair, Acne, Monday, Jeans and Local Firm are emerging and getting recognition.(Det svenska modeundret - Elle)(Stockholmfashiondays.com - The Local Firm - a/w 2008)ArtsThe oldest remains of Swedish art are found in the churches: frescos, altar pieces and baptismal founts. Little unique beauty is generally attributed to these, except for occasional. The motifs evolve around religious beliefs, focused on purgatory, the devil, Christ, and Mary.In the 19th century, the painter Larsson (18531919) shaped the image of the idyllic countryside home with his nave picturesque illustrations.Science and technologyFile:AlfredNobel adjusted.jpg|thumb|upright|Nobel, inventor of dynamite and institutor of the Prize.In the 18th century Swedens revolution took off. Previously, technical progress had mainly come from mainland Europe.In 1739, the Swedish Academy of Sciences was founded, with people such as Linnaeus and Celsius as early members. Many of the companies founded by early pioneers are still remain major international brands. Daln founded AGA, and received the Nobel Prize for his valve. Nobel invented dynamite and instituted the Prizes.Magnus Ericsson started the company bearing his name, Ericsson, still one of the largest telecom companies in the world. Wenstrm was an early pioneer in current and is along with Serbian inventor Tesla credited as one of the inventors of the three-phase electrical system.(The traditional engineering industry is still a major source of Swedish inventions, but pharmaceuticals, electronics and other high-tech industries are gaining ground. Pak was an invention for storing liquid foods, invented by Wallenberg. Losec, an ulcer medicine, was the worlds best-selling drug in the 1990s and was developed by AstraZeneca. More recently Lans invented the Identification System, a worldwide standard for shipping and civil aviation navigation. A large portion of the Swedish economy is to this day based on the export of technical inventions, and many large multinational corporations from Sweden have their origins in the ingenuity of Swedish inventors.()Swedish inventors hold a total of 33,523 patents in the United States as of 2007, according to the States Patent and Trademark Office. As a nation, only ten other countries hold more patents than Sweden.(Patents By Country, State, and Year  All Patent Types(December 2007)http://www.uspto.gov/web/offices/ac/ido/oeip/taf/cst_all.htm) See also * Sweden* of Swedes* of Swedish actors* of Swedish film directors* of Swedish scientists* of Swedish sportspeople* diaspora* of Germanic peoplesReferences External links * The Global Etiquette Guide: Sweden* VisitSweden - Swedens official website for tourism and travel information ar:av:az:svelilrbe:be-x-old:bs:veanibg:cs:vdovda:Svenskere(Ethnie)et:Rootslased(etnia)eo:Svedoj(peuple)hr:veaniSwediait:Svedesihe:ka:lv:Zviedrilt:vedaihu:Svdekmk:arz:(volk)ja:pl:Szwedzipt:Suecosro:Suedeziru:sah:sk:vdisl:vedisr:sh:veanifi:Ruotsalaisetsv:Svenskartr:svelileruk:Thy inbat-smg:vedzh:
29397303
Upper_Tribunal
The Upper Tribunal is part of the justice system of the Kingdom. It was created in 2008 as part of a programme, set out in the Courts and Enforcement Act 2007, to rationalise the tribunal system, and to provide a common means of handling appeals against the decisions of lower tribunals. It is administered by Majestys Courts and Tribunals Service.The Upper Tribunal is a superior of record, giving it equivalent status to the High Court and meaning that it can both set precedents and can enforce its decisions (and those of the Tribunal) without the need to ask the High Court (or the of Session in Scotland) to intervene.() It is also the first (and only) tribunal to have the power of review.()Chambers and JurisdictionThe Tribunal currently consists of four Chambers, structured around subject areas (although the Administrative Appeals Chamber has a broad remit). Different jurisdictions have been transferred into the Tribunal in a programme which began in 2008 and is continuing.Administrative Appeals ChamberThe Administrative Appeals Chamber hears appeals against decisions of the General Regulatory Chamber (except in Charity cases), the Health, Education and Social Care Chamber, the Social Entitlement Chamber, and the War Pensions and Armed Forces Compensation Chamber of the Tribunal, and applications for review of First-tier Tribunal decisions in Criminal Injuries Compensation cases. The Chamber may also deal with judicial review cases transferred to the Upper Tribunal from the High Court.()The Chamber also hears appeals about decisions of the Safeguarding Authority to prevent someone from working with children or vulnerable adults, and decisions of the Commissioners concerning operators of goods vehicles and service vehicles, and premises used as operating centres.Tax and Chancery ChamberThe Tax and Chancery Chamber hears appeals against decisions of the Tribunal in Tax or Charity cases, and appeals against decision notices issued by the Services Authority (for example, regarding authorisation and permission, penalties for market abuse, or disciplinary matters) and the Regulator.()The Chamber may also hear applications for review of some decisions made by Revenue and Customs, the Regulator, the Charity Commission, the Services Authority and the of England, decisions relation to banking regulations and to the assessment of compensation or consideration under the (Special Provisions) Act 2008, and certain cases relating to the proceeds of crime.Lands ChamberThe Lands Chamber decides disputes concerning land, including the purchase of land blighted by the proposals of a public authority, compensation for land compulsorily purchased and or the value of which has been affected by public works (such noise from an airport), and compensation for mining subsidence, coast protection works, reservoirs, and land drainage works.()The Chamber also hears appeals from decisions of Revenue and Customs in which the value of land is disputed, from Tribunals concerning the value of land for non-domestic rates purposes, from Valuation Tribunals and Residential Property Tribunals.Finally, the Chamber also hears applications to discharge or modify restrictions on the use of land (covenants) and applications for notices relating to the to light.Immigration and Asylum ChamberThis Chamber hears appeals against decisions made by the Tribunal in matters of immigration, asylum and nationality.()JudiciaryThe judiciary of the Upper Tribunal comprises Judges and other Members. Senior legally qualified members of former tribunals (now abolished and transferred into the First-tier and Upper Tribunals) became Judges of the Upper Tribunal when their jurisdiction was transferred, whilst some lay members (generally experts in the subject matter of the former tribunal) became other Members. New Judges and Members are appointed by the Appointments Commission.()In addition, the following may also sit as Judges of the Upper Tribunal:(Sections 5 and 6 of the Tribunals, Courts and Enforcement Act 2007, Legislation.gov.uk, Retrieved 10 November 2010)* Chamber President or a Deputy Chamber President of the Tribunal* Court of Appeal judges * of Session judges * Court judges* circuit judges and sheriffs* district judges and district judges (Magistrates Courts)The President of Tribunals is currently Lord Justice Carnwath, who is the first to hold this role.() Each Chamber of the Upper Tribunal is headed by a Chamber President.(Section 7 of the Tribunals, Courts and Enforcement Act 2007, Legislation.gov.uk, Retrieved 10 November 2010)()In most cases, decisions are made by a Judge (or in the case of the Lands Chamber, a Member) sitting alone, although in cases involving complex issues of law or expertise, a larger bench consisting of more than one Judge, or a Judge and one or more Members, may hear the case.()()Appeal against decisions of the Upper TribunalAppeals against decisions of the Upper Tribunal can be made to the Court of Appeal (in England and Wales) or the of Session (in Scotland).()External sites* Upper Tribunal, Tribunals ServiceReferences
29420696
Germans_in_India
related people There is a small community of Germans in India consisting largely of expatriate professionals from Germany and their families as well as students at Indian universities.HistoryEarly immigrationThe first Germans to arrive in India were missionaries. Ziegenbalg, sent by IV of Denmark, came to eastern India for the propagation of the Gospel in the early 1700s. He along with Heinrich Pltschau became the first Protestant missionaries to India when they arrived at Tranquebar on July 9, 1706.(http://www.bautz.de/bbkl/z/ziegenbalg.shtml) In the late 1800s Nagel came to the Coast. He learned the Malayalam language and wrote several hymns.(http://www.holypal.com/profiles/blogs/v-nagel-missionary-to-gods-own) Gundert (1814-1893) also worked as a missionary scholar in Malayalam-speaking areas, where he translated the Bible into Malayalam.  He also prepared a grammar of Malayalam and a bilingual dictionary and established two periodicals in Malayalam.Modern EraIn recent years, many German expatriates have either permanently moved or established long-term residence in India. Today, German expatriates have a strong presence in India mainly in the mining and heavy engineering sector. The availability of skill the importance of intellectual property rights is well established in India at all levels  statutory, administrative and judicial. Therefore, doing business in India is a great opportunity for Germans whether in small and medium scale industries that want to go global.(Germans say India safer bet than China) German graduates, frustrated by the tight job market back in Germany, are taking up positions in India. The booming Indian economy offers opportunities for young Germans(Unemployed German graduates head to India) Chennai has a small German community and they have integrated well with the local population and they mainly work in the printing, tailoring and food production industries. Both Madras and University have significant numbers of German students and teachers. IIT Madras was also built with German assistance .(The German connection)Notable people* Bhabha - Attorney and lecturer in law at Law School* Desai - Indian novelist* Desai - Indian author* Gundert - Missionary scholar* Mirza - Indian model and actress* Nagel - German missionary inMalabar* Mary Prema - Superior General of the of Charity of Calcutta* Kronschnabl - current President and Country Head of India* Ziegenbalg - German missionary in TranquebarSee Also* relations* in GermanyReferences
29432674
Bejeweled_3
Digital download, DVD-ROMBejeweled 3 is a puzzle game developed and published by Games. It is the fifth game of the multi-selling Bejeweled franchise yet the officially third title. The game was released as a digital download on December 7, 2010, featuring a variety of 4 new gameplay modes (plus 4 old ones from Bejeweled 2), high-definition graphics and sounds as well as all-new 65 badges to achieve in game.()GameplayThe core objective of the game is essentially the same as the previous installments in the series. Players are supposed to swap one gem with an adjacent one to form a chain of three or more gems of the same color. When this occurs the gems disappear and a new bunch of gems which are randomly generated drop from above to fill up the empty space. When falling gems automatically line-up a chain reaction known as a cascade is caused. Unlike earlier versions, players can now matching other gems during a chain reaction. In addition to high-definition graphics, new sound effects and the ability to match more than one set of gems at one time (a key feature that debuted in Blitz).() Bejeweled 3 also has a badge system, with some of the badges reserved for the most elite gem matchers.(8 modes of gameplay are available in the game including 4 new modes as well as 4 traditional modes from Bejeweled 2. These are:( Standard Modes ;Classic:The classic Bejeweled gameplay mode from previous installments of the game. All players have to do is continuously match a row containing of three or more gems by swapping one gem with its adjacent counterpart. The game ends when there are no more possible moves.(();Zen:One of the new additions is a special Zen Mode (similar 2s Endless Mode), where players can play the game without end, as calming music and positive affirmations play in the background. This mode is tailored to relax players with relaxing aural tones, ambient sounds and breath modulation. Players can continue playing this mode endlessly as the replacement gems in the game are randomly generated in a way such that there is always one more move for the player. There is also a special breath modulation mode which features a tracking line which moves back and forth, it produces several breathing patterns which players are encouraged to match the breathing pattern. The overall objective of this is to slow the breathing rate of the player so as to allow the player to calm down and de-stress. This mode was created by PopCap in conjunction with scientists which uses biofeedback to help players relax. The Zen Mode also includes a wide variety of aural tones which include tones which are outside the range of human hearing. One tone is played into one ear, while a different tone is played into the other so as to trick the brain into hearing a different frequency. This is done in order to facilitate meditation as well as induce brain waves which are usually associated with deep sleep or dreaming. The scientific efficacy of this has not been established and has been referred to as science.()(;Lightning:It is essentially a trial mode where players have to get as many points as possible within a 60 seconds timeframe. Players can increase their time limit by lining up special gems, or by creating chains at a fast pace to gain a Blazing Speed bonus.( Players may feel familiar with this Lightning Mode as it already appeared as Blitz Mode in Twist and being almost exactly the same with Blitz gameplay.(;Quest:A series of 40 puzzles and 11 mini-games( which include rescuing special butterfly gems, digging through diamond mines, battling ice storms as well as others. These are specially tailored puzzles which have an objective other than the standard Bejeweled gameplay.()( Secret Modes Secret Modes arent visually available as players have to earn some specific achievements to unlock them. They are: Butterflies, Diamond Mine, Ice Storm, and Poker.(;ButterfliesThis mode features butterflies that move up one space every turn, and have to be matched with gems of their own color to be collected. The aim is to collect as many butterflies as possible before a butterfly reaches the top, where a spider is waiting. The game ends when a butterfly flies up above the game screen and is caught by the spider. Reaching level 5 in Zen mode will unlock this mode.(;Diamond MineThis mode features mining for gold, treasures and crystals. The gameplay consists of a digging machine that moves 2 rows further down underground every time all dirt above the 6th row is cleared. Dirt is cleared when gems immediately adjacent to it when matched, or detonated. The game starts with 1 minute and 30 seconds, and 30 seconds is added to the clock every time the digging machine moves down (or 90 seconds of the whole screen is cleared of dirt in one move, for instance, matching two hypercubes). The game ends when the time runs out. Finishing 4 minigames in Quest mode unlocks this mode.(;Ice StormThis mode features rising columns of ice that extrude from the bottom of the screen upwards. The aim of this mode is to stop the ice columns from reaching the top of the board, which freezes the game board, ending the game. Making matches above or below ice columns decrease the height of them, and making a vertical match in the relevant column will shatter the ice completely. As matches are made, a meter fills up and increases the multiplier by x1 and pushes all ice columns down every time it is filled. Once an ice column has reached the top, a skull sign appears over it and a secondary ice column rises up. Once this hits the top, the board freezes and the game is ended. Earning 100,000 points in Lightning mode will unlock this mode.(;PokerThis mode features a poker-style game play. There is a pack of cards alongside a games board, and a score table. Every time a match is made, a card is turned over with its gem on it. After five moves, the resulting hand is evaluated and score is added to the table respectively. For example, five gems of the same color would be the best hand, a flush. Making a match where two sets of gems on it will produce a card with a gem (the gem that was selected) and a smaller gem of the secondary match at its corner. This card can be use as both gems. Matching a flame gem or a star gem will increase the score for that hand, and matching a hypercube produces a wildcard that adjusts itself to produce the best possible outcome. Every so often, a skull appears on one of the outcomes starting with the outcome that yields the least score. If the player was to get this outcome, a coin is flipped with a 50% chance of ending the game. Players can remove skulls by filling up a meter that increases with each hands, better hands filling it up more. Reaching level 5 in Classic mode will unlock this mode.(GemsEight types of gems appear in Bejeweled 3, although three only appear in some modes:;Normal GemA normal gem, which forms the basis of the game.;Flame GemA Flame Gem, which appears to be a gem on fire, forms when a player matches four gems in a row. When matched, it explodes all gems adjacent horizontally, vertically, or diagonally.(;Star GemA Star Gem, a shining gem with a four-pointed star in the middle, forms when a player makes a T, + or L shape. When matched, it explodes every gem in its row and column.(;HypercubeA Hypercube is formed by matching five gems in a row. When swapped with another gem, it detonates every gem of that color. If it is swapped with another Hypercube, it detonates every gem on the board. (Additionally, The 2 Hypercubes that were used to match will return after all the gems on the screen explode.) If it is exploded, it detonates every gem that is the same color as the one that detonated it. It appears as a spinning box with mystic markings on the surface, with the various colors of gems swirling around on its surface.(;Supernova GemA Supernova gem forms when dropping gems produce a row of six gems; it appears as a flaming star gem. When matched, it detonates every gem in its row and column, and every adjacent gem in the rows and columns surrounding it.( The Supernova first appeared in Bejeweled Twist.;Time Gem (Lightning Mode only)Time gems drop from above, and have electric sparkles, which almost resemble the Lightning Gem from Bejeweled Twist. When matched, they add either 5 or 10 seconds (as stated on the gem) to the next round of Lightning mode. If unmatched at the end of the round, a 5-second gem becomes a flame gem, while a 10-second gem becomes a star gem.(;Bomb Gem (Time Bomb games in Quest Mode)A bomb gem contains a regular gem framed in a sea-mine-like black ball with spikes protruding from it. In its center, a number shows how many seconds or turns remain until it explodes, ending the game; it must be matched before it reaches zero.( The Bomb Gem also appeared in the previous Bejeweled game - Bejeweled Twist, but had a more passive role.;Butterfly (Butterfly Mode and Butterflies games in Quest Mode)A Butterfly gem has the appearance of a squashed gem sprite with wings. It acts like a normal gem, except that it flies up one square every turn, swapping with the gem above it. In modes where butterflies appear, a spider awaits at the top of the board. The game ends when a butterfly gem flies up to the top of the board and is captured by the spider.(DevelopmentOn October 29, 2010 Bejeweled 3s game trailer silently appeared on its official YouTube channel.() Then on November 1, 2010 it was officially announced by PopCap Games to the media, which is approximately six years after the release of the previous numbered installment.(Talking about the game, Jason Kapalka co-founder and chief creative officer at PopCap and co-creator of Bejeweled said: The challenge in creating a new version of Bejeweled is to innovate and keep it fresh and exciting without losing touch with the gameplay that millions of people love. So were very careful when we make changes to the core game, which is why it can take so long! ... Weve worked hard to make sure Bejeweled 3 retains the classic appeal of the earlier games while bringing a host of exciting new features to the table. The games Zen Mode was at one point considered for helping people to quit smoking, where the game would try to give the player hints on how to stop their addiction to smoking. However, PopCap decided to remove it as having the slightest mention of smoking would result in an ESRB rating mentioning tobacco use. It was replaced with bad habits.(The games soundtrack was composed by Hajba and Brandon.Bejeweled 3 became available in retail and online for $19.99 on December 7th, 2010, on PopCap Games and their exclusive partners.(on June 21 2011 it was announced that bejeweled 3 will come to the PSN Xbox live arcade and Nintendo DS later this year.ReferencesExternal links*Bejeweled 3 Homepage*PopCap Games Homepage3
29464683
Saints_John,_Colorado
Saints John, originally called Coleyville, is a former silver-mining town in County, Colorado, USA.  About a mile from the town of Montezuma, Saints John was the site of one of the first silver discoveries in Colorado.  Although no longer a town, it still has several inhabitants.HistoryA prospector named Coley discovered silver in 1863 or 1864 on the slope of Glacier Mountain, and built a crude furnace to extract silver from the ore.  Other prospector followed, including John Cullom, who discovered the Saints John Lode.  In 1867, he sold the Saints John lode to the Boston Silver Mining Company, which built an ore mill, next to which grew the town, originally called Coleyville.(Robert L. Brown, Jeep Trails to Colorado Ghost Towns (Caxton Press, 1963) 188-189.)(T. S. Lovering (1935) Geology and Ore Deposits of the Montezuma Quadrangle, Colorado, US Geological Survey, Professional Paper 178, p.66-67.) In the 1870 census, the town name had changed to Saints John, which had a population of 71, which made it the largest town in Summit County.(Ninth Census-Volume I, The Statistics of the Population of the United States (1872) p.96.)The fortunes of the town followed those of the Saints John mine.  The mine ceased working in 1928.(T. S. Lovering (1935) Geology and Ore Deposits of the Montezuma Quadrangle, Colorado, US Geological Survey, Professional Paper 178, p.104.)GeographyThe site of Saints John is at , at an altitude of  mean sea level. The site accessible by dirt road from Montezuma.(US Board of Geographic Names, Saints John, accessed 3 November 2010.)See also* of ghost towns in ColoradoReferences(External links* Colorado Lifestyle, Saints John and Wild irishman Mine Snowshoe.
29482135
Abraham_Curry
 footnotes           Abraham (or Abram) Van Santvoord Curry (February 19, 1815  October 19, 1873) is considered the founding father of Carson City, Nevada.() A native of the state of New York, he traveled to the West Coast during the Gold Rush and settled in Nevadas Eagle Valley, where Carson City was established.()Curry served as an assemblyman of the Territorial Legislature from 1862 to 1863 and was a territorial senator from 1863 to 1864.() He was also the first superintendent of the City Mint and the first warden of State Prison. Curry donated  of land for the site of the State Capitol,() for which the state prison quarry provided the stone for its construction.()Curry spent the final years of his life building facilities for the and Truckee Railroad in Carson City. Though he had achieved prominence in Nevada, his wife claimed that he had only one dollar in his pocket when he died in 1873.(BiographyAbraham Van Santvoord Curry was born on February 19, 1815 in the hamlet of South Trenton, New York. He was the first son of Campbell Curry and Elvira Skinner Curry, who were married in South Trenton. On August 1, 1835, Curry married Mary Ann Cowen, who was then eighteen years old, in New York. Their first child and only son, Charles A. Curry, was born on June 10, 1836. After a year in Ogdensburg, the family moved several times and settled in Ohio in 1848. The Currys later had six daughters. By 1852, Curry was working in Cleveland, Ohio as a commercial merchant and later became an agent for the Michigan Southern Railroad.(Travel to the WestAfter his daughters, Elvira and Jane, were each married, Curry and his son Charles took a steamship from New York City that sailed around Horn to San Francisco between 1854 and 1855. In 1856, the two were in the mining town of Red Dog, where Curry opened a alley and established the first branch tribe of the Order of Red Men in California. He met future business partners Benjamin F. Green, John J. Musser, and Francis Frank Marion Proctor in the nearby town of Downieville.(Settlement in Nevada refnum  87000501()In 1858, Curry traveled by stagecoach with Green, Musser, and Proctor, from California to the town of Genoa after news had spread that the western part of Territory had been abandoned by Mormon settlers returning to Lake City because of the War. Currys $1000 offer to buy a corner lot on which build a store in Genoa was refused for being insufficient.( After finding real estate in Genoa to be expensive, Curry moved on to the more sparsely inhabited Eagle Valley.()Curry partnered with Musser and Proctor to purchase the Eagle Ranch trading post and 865 acres of the surrounding valley for a payment of $300 in coins out of a total sale price of $1,000.( Musser and Proctor, who were both attorneys, worked to carve a separate territory from Utah, while Curry promoted the newly founded Carson City.() Curry set aside and donated  of land for the site of the State Capitol.(In July 1859, Musser became president and Proctor became vice-president of the constitutional convention to establish the Territory of Nevada. Curry served as the delegate from Eagle Valley.( In 1859, the discovery of the Lode east of Carson City was made public, bringing tens of thousands of miners into the area.() In 1861, Curry built a 100-foot stone hotel on top of warm springs about two miles east of the city center. A large wooden eagle was placed on the top of the hotel.(Image:Nevada State Capitol, 1875.jpg|thumb|200px|left|Curry donated the site upon which the State Capitol was built.(In 1862, the Territorial Legislature leased the Warm Springs Hotel from Curry to hold meetings and detain prisoners. The legislature had been using the prison quarry to provide stone material for the Nevada State Capitol while keeping costs down. In 1864, the territorial legislature paid $80,000 to acquire the hotel along with 20 acres (8.1 ha) of land from Curry, who was appointed the first warden of the facility that would become known as State Prison. In October of that year, Nevada became a state and the newly written constitution established the Governor of Nevada as the ex-officio warden of the prison.(In 1865, the States Congress approved the establishment of a branch of the States Mint in Carson City. Curry was named one of the planning commissioners and became the first superintendent when the City Mint began operating in 1870. Later that year, Curry left the Mint to accept a commission to supervise the building of an engine house and machine shop for the and Truckee Railroad. Construction began in 1872 with stone provided by the prison quarry. Following its completion on July 4, 1873, the engine house hosted a celebratory grand ball.( The Pacific Railroad stated that the shops built in Carson City equaled or exceeded their own locomotive facilities in California.()In 1871, Curry had also designed and built a home for his family in Carson City, where he would spend the last two years of his life.(Death and legacyImage:Ccmint.jpeg|thumb|Curry was the first superintendent of the City Mint.(Three months after the completion of the railroad project, Curry died of a stroke on October 19, 1873. In homage to its first superintendent, the Carson City Mint was closed that day. He was buried in Lone Mountain Cemetery in the largest funeral ever held in Carson City.( A popular legend recounts that he had left only one silver dollar in his pocket for his wife Mary at the time of his death.()Abraham Currys house was passed down to his daughter Elvira, who in turn passed it on to her son W. H. Cowan, in 1902. The house remained in the family until 1919, and is presently used as a private law office.( The house is reportedly haunted by his spirit.(Abraham Currys funeral procession has been reenacted as part of Carson Citys annual Ghost Walk event, which is traditionally held during the weekend before Halloween and Day.()Other offices and affiliations*Founding member, Order of Odd Fellows, Carson Encampment No. 2. (1867)*Member, Lodge No. 1, Carson City*Surveyor of Ormsby County (18711873)(See also*of Nevada*of reportedly haunted locations in the United States*Register of Historic Places listings in Carson City, NevadaReferencesFurther reading***External links*Abraham Curry: The Father of Carson City at the official City, Nevada website*Abraham Curry at the Carson City Convention & Visitors Bureau*Abraham Curry at the Carsonpedia*Abraham Curry at the Online Nevada Encyclopedia*Abraham Curry House at the Park Service
29497907
John_C_Climie
John C Climie was a Scottish-born engineer who worked in Australia and New Zealand. He may have been working in Melbourne as early as 1856, when Austin, Climie & Co called for tenders for erecting a dwelling house for A. Grant at 193 Lonsdale St East,(M Lewis, Architects Index) while he was resident in Caulfield near Melbourne by 1859.(Victorian Government Gazette, No 177 Tuesday November 8, 1859 p. 2396)He described himself as a surveyor who engaged in architectural work on occasion, and a Civil and Mining Engineer.(M Lewis,  Architects Index, citing Lyall, The Architectural Profession (p 52), University of Melbourne) He designed and supervised construction of the Creek Bridge on the Heidelberg Road in 1863-4 and prepared the design for the 1869 stone arch bridge over Deep Creek Bulla, having won the 25 competition prize.  The Inspector General of Roads and Bridges had recommended Climies alternative design for an iron girder bridge on stone piers.  At the time he won the Bulla competition he was working as part of Robertson and Climie, Architects and Civil Engineers, at 13 Bourke Street West.  In 1870 he had a Mr Snowball as partner, and was also the Melbourne Agent for Fairlie Locomotives. He moved to Tasmania to take the position as Engineer for Launceston to Hobart Railway,(The Locomotives of the Tasmanian Main Line Railway Park, M.A. Australian Railway Historical Society Bulletin, November, 1939 p48-51)(The Mercury Hobart, Tasmania, Saturday 28 June 1873) as well as the Emu Bay Railway in 1878.(Burnie Heritage Study)  while other Tasmanian projects included the Emu Bay railway, the Table Cape lighthouse(Lighthouses of Tasmania) and the survey for the tramway from Strahan, Macquarie Harbour, to the Tin Mines at Mount Heemskirk.(TASMANIA. HOUSE OF ASSEMBLY. TRAMWAY : (No. 90.) Report on Survey of proposed by Mr. J. C. Climie, CE. laid upon the Table by the Minister of Lands, and ordered by the House to be printed, August 16, 1882)  He also advertised for tenders for construction of several buildings, including a parsonage in Tasmania, and in 1870 (soon after the completion of the Bulla bridge), for a hotel and store at Sunbury for William Winter.(M Lewis, Architects Index, entries for JC Climie)Climie moved to Zealand, where he was received with some suspicion, perhaps because he took a high level position as City Engineer for the town of Wellington from a local candidate. His brother Daniel, was also an engineer in New Zealand, (Mount Climie, New Zealand was surveyed and named by one of them) while his son Mr J. L. Climie, married Alice Price, eldest daughter of Mr H. G. Price, of the Lands and Surrey Department, Napier.(Observer, Rrahi XXVIII, Putanga 39, 13 Pipiri 1908, Page 8) A continuing link may be preserved in the current engineering firm of Climie & Co. in New Zealand.(Wellington Evening Post, Volume XV, Issue 127, 1 June 1877, Page 3)References
29501096
Manchester_Collieries
Manchester Collieries was a mining company formed in 1929 from a group of independent companies operating on the Coalfield. The Mining Industry Act of 1926 attempted to stem the post-war decline in coal mining and encourage independent companies to merge in order to modernise and better survive the economic conditions of the day. Robert Burrows of the Atherton company Fletcher Burrows proposed a merger of several independent companies operating to the west of Manchester. The merger was agreed and took place in March 1929.()Constituent companiesThe constituent companies of Manchester Collieries in 1929 were Burrows and Company who owned the Howe Bridge, Gibfield and Chanters Collieries in Atherton, Knowles and Sons, the and Kersley Coal Company, John Speakman and Sons owners of Colliery in Leigh, Collieries who operated pits in Hulton, Walkden and Mosley Common and the and Tyldesley Collieries Company who had pits in Astley and Tyldesley.() Not all the companies in the area joined the new company. The Coal Company remained independent until nationalisation in 1947 but other companies were acquired in the 1930s after the government introduced quotas in the Mines Act 1930. Ramsdens Collieries was taken over in 1935; its Pit closed the same year and the Nelson three years later. Colliery, in Bradford,  Manchester, owned by a subsidiary of Fine Cotton Spinners, was acquired in 1935. The West Leigh Colliery Company and the Coppull Coal Company were bought before 1939.()Manchester CollieriesUp to 1929 most coal was cut by hewers, men using picks and shovels, but Manchester Collieries began a program of mechanisation increasing its production of machine-cut coal from 17% to 98% in 16 years. The movement of coal underground was also mechanised, and ponies were no longer used for underground haulage after 1932.() Mining was a dangerous industry but Manchester Collieries aimed to make the job as safe as possible, and training was a major priority. Some entrants attended local technical colleges and after 1942 some were sent to university. The company was considered to be a generous employer; workers at its pits were on average 1s 6d per shift better off than miners working for other employers, and it built pithead baths and canteens at its pits.(Central railwaysThe collieries were linked by an extensive system of mineral lines linked to workshops at Walkden Yard. The collieries were linked to mainline railways at Ellenbrook and Sandersons Sidings on the Loopline, at Astley Green sidings on the and Manchester Railway, at Walkden Low Level on the line to Bolton, at Walkden High Level on the and Wigan Railway and at Linnyshaw Moss on the Manchester to Bolton Line. There were canal tips at Boothstown and Worsley on the Canal.()NationalisationAt Nationalisation in 1947 Manchester Collieries employed 14,868 workers on the Coalfield. Some of the surface workers were women, known as pit brow lasses, who sorted coal on the screens at the pit head.() As their coal seams were exhausted, the older collieries closed.(References;Notes;Bibliography****
29513352
Rmulo_Souza_Orestes_Caldeira
 pcupdate  October 16, 2010Rmulo Souza Orestes Caldeira (Pelotas, 22 May 1987), commonly known as Rmulo, is a Brazilian footballer who plays as right-back. He plays for A club Fiorentina.CareerOn 10 July 2010, Rmulo was presented as a reinforcement of the Cross. The debut for mining took place on 22, against Fluminense.On 13 April 2011, Rmulo joined Atltico Paranaense on loan from Cruzeiro.()On 29 June 2011, Rmulo joined Fiorentina after his return form Atltico Paranaense to Cruzerio.(Comunicato Stampa violachannel.tv)Career statistics:(Correct )ReferencesSouza Orestes Caldeiraja:Souza Orestes Caldeira
29527040
Mount_Whaleback_mine
 closing year The Mount Whaleback mine is an ore mine located in the Pilbara region of Australia, 6 kilometres west of Newman.(MINEDEX website: MT Whaleback search result accessed: 6 November 2010)The mine is majority-owned (85 percent)(BHP Billiton Annual report 2010 BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010) and operated by Billiton, and is one of seven iron ore mines the company operates in the Pilbara. The company also operates two port facilities at Hedland, Nelson Point and Finucane Island, and over 1,000 kilometres of rail in the Pilbara.(BHP Billiton is the second-largest iron ore mining company in the Pilbara, behind Rio Tinto and ahead of the Metals Group.(Western Australian Mineral and Petroleum Statistic Digest 2009 of Mines and Petroleum website, accessed: 8 November 2010) As of 2010, BHP employs 8,000 people in its Pilbara operations.(About BHP Billiton Iron Ore BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010)OverviewFile:Iron ore Pilbara.jpg|180px|thumb|left|Iron ore mines in the Pilbara region.The Mount Whaleback deposit was discovered in 1957 by Stan Hilditch but not publicised until 1960, when the Australian Government lifted the embargo on iron ore exports it had put in place because of concerns the mineral was in short supply.(Newman Sydney Morning Herald, published: 8 February 2004, accessed: 10 November 2010) The first mine to develop was the mine in 1965 and a railway line, the railway, as well as port facilities at Finucane Island were constructed. On 1 June 1966, the first shipment of iron ore from the Pilbara left on board of the Harvey S. Mudd.(History of the Iron Ore Industry and the Pilbara BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010)BHPs operations in Newman date back to 1968, when the Mount Whaleback mine was opened, the biggest single-pit Open-pit iron ore mine in the world, developed originally by States company Pacific.( The mine is 1.5 kilometres wide, more than five kilometres long and is scheduled to eventually reach a depth of 0.5 kilometres.(Mining and Processing BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010)(Iron fact sheet - Australian Resources and Deposits Australia website, accessed: 7 November 2010) A new town, Newman, was constructed, as well as a 426 kilometre railway line, the Newman railway. The first train left Newman on 1 January 1969 and the first shipment of Newman ore left port on 1 April 1969 on board of the Osumi Maru.( Newman remained a closed company town until 1981.(Ore from the mines is transported by rail to Port Hedland through two independent railways. The Mount Newman railway carries ore from Mount Whaleback, Orebodies 18, 23 and 25, Jimblebar, Yandi and Area C. The mine is serviced by the separate, shorter Goldsworthy railway.(Rail BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010)Ore from the Mount Whaleback and the other Newman mines, as well as the Yandi mine is transported to the port at Nelson Point, while ore from Area C and Yarrie goes to Finucane Island. Ore is transported through an 1.16 kilometre long tunnel from Nelson Point to the port at Finucane Island. The average loading time for a ship is 30 hours and 800 ships are loaded annually at Port Hedland.(Ports BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010)The mine can be visited on a 1.5 hour tour.(Attractions Newman website, accessed: 10 November 2010)ReferencesExternal links* BHP Billiton website* MINEDEX website Database of the of Mines and Petroleum
29540451
Arizona_Department_of_Mines_and_Mineral_Resources
The Arizona Department of Mines and Mineral Resources (ADMMR) is a government agency in the state of Arizona that has the purpose of promoting and developing the states mineral resources. The department was established in 1939 as the Arizona Department of Mineral Resources.(Bobby J. Bonner, Mining in Arizona, Becoming Arizona website, December 8, 2009)The ADMMR engages in technical research, field investigations, education, and information dissemination. As one of its educational activities, it operated the Mining and Mineral Museum until July 2010, when responsibility for the museum was transferred to the Historical Society pursuant to a state law enacted in May 2010.(Changes in the Department of Mines and Mineral Resources, Arizona Department of Mines and Mineral Resources, July 29, 2010) The ADMMR has no regulatory functions.(About DMMR, Arizona Department of Mines and Mineral Resources website) Regulation of exploration and mining on Arizonas state trust land is under the jurisdiction of the Minerals Section of the State Land Department.(Mineral Management Program, Arizona State Land Department website)See alsoThe Arizona Bureau of Mines, a separate agency formed in 1915,( was a predecessor agency of the Geological Survey.(http://cip.lib.az.us/index.cfm?eventViewRepository&oid627&cid0)ReferencesExternal links* 
29549127
Area_C_mine
 closing year The Area C mine is an ore mine located in the Pilbara region of Australia, 92 kilometres west-north-west of Newman.(MINEDEX website: Area C search result accessed: 6 November 2010)The mine is majority-owned (85 percent)(BHP Billiton Annual report 2010 BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010) and operated by Billiton, and is one of seven iron ore mines the company operates in the Pilbara. The company also operates two port facilities at Hedland, Nelson Point and Finucane Island, and over 1,000 kilometres of rail in the Pilbara.( The Area C mine is part of the Mount Goldsworthy joint venture, together with the Yarrie and mine, with the later being in care and maintenance since 2007.(BHP Billiton is the second-largest iron ore mining company in the Pilbara, behind Rio Tinto and ahead of the Metals Group.(Western Australian Mineral and Petroleum Statistic Digest 2009 of Mines and Petroleum website, accessed: 8 November 2010) As of 2010, BHP employs 8,000 people in its Pilbara operations.(About BHP Billiton Iron Ore BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010)OverviewFile:Iron ore Pilbara.jpg|180px|thumb|left|Iron ore mines in the Pilbara region.The Area C mine was officially opened on 30 October 2003 by the then-of Western Australia, Gallop, but ore was railed from the mine to the port already on 16 August.(BHP Billitons Area C Mine Officially Opened BHP Billiton website, published: 30 October 2003, accessed: 10 November 2010) However, bulk samples of the ore had been mined and send to customers since late 2001.(The Australian Mines Handbook - 2003-04 edition, editor: Ross Louthean, publisher: Louthean Media Pty Ltd, page: 241) The mine was initially scheduled to produce 15 million tonnes of iron ore annually.(This month in mining: BHP Billiton commits to major iron ore project Engineering and Mining Journal, published: May 2002, accessed: 12 November 2010)Ore from the BHP mines is transported by rail to Port Hedland through two independent railways. The Newman railway carries ore from Mount Whaleback, Orebodies 18, 23, 25 and 29, Jimblebar, Yandi and Area C. The Yarrie mine is serviced by the separate, shorter railway.(Rail BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010)Ore from the Mount Whaleback and the other Newman mines, as well as the Yandi mine is transported to the port at Nelson Point, while ore from Area C and Yarrie goes to Finucane Island. Ore is transported through an 1.16 kilometre long tunnel from Nelson Point to the port at Finucane Island. The average loading time for a ship is 30 hours and 800 ships are loaded annually at Port Hedland.(Ports BHP Billiton website, accessed: 10 November 2010)Mining operations within BHP throughout the Pilbara were briefly suspended in September 2008 to focus on safety after two fatalities at the Yandi mine within 10 days of each other.(BHP suspends WA iron works after second mining death Australian, published: 5 September 2008, accessed: 12 November 2010)ReferencesExternal links* BHP Billiton website* MINEDEX website Database of the of Mines and Petroleum
29560516
Burtville,_Western_Australia
Burtville is a abandoned town in the Goldfields-Esperance region of Australia, located  south west of the Leonora.In 1897, Gold was discovered in the area by two prospectors, B. Frost and J. Trugurtha. The surveyor, J. Rowe, planned the town lots in accordance with the Goldfields Act in 1901. The settlement was initially known as Merolia which is the Australian name for the district.()The town was eventually named after the son of the first justice of the Western Australian Court, Burt. Alfred Earle Burt was the chief warden of the Mount Margaret Golfields.The town was gazetted as Merolia in 1902 but was regazetted to compliment Alfred Burt later the same year.The population of the town and district rose to approximately 400 by 1903 as a result of gold mining. The town also had a water supply from a government well and a sealed pan sanitation system. A police station was opened in 1903 along with a school and two hotels. A ten stamp state battery and five stamp battery known as The Burtville Ore Reduction works  were operated within the town from 1903 to 1906. Another privately owned ten stamp battery that allowed public access known as The sons of Westralia was also operating at the time.()By 1916 the population had reduced to 45 and the police station was closed.All that remains of the town today is the enterance door arch of one of the towns hotels.()References
29573508
Chileoptilia
Chileoptilia yaroella is a moth of the Gracillariidae family. It is known from Chile.(Global Taxonomic Database of Gracillariidae (Lepidoptera))The larvae feed on macrantha. They feed on the flowers of their host plant. It lives inside the flowers, moving from one flower to the other. No mining stage was observed.Referencesvi:Chileoptilia
